
#Q What does the word cretin refer to?
^ An idiot
A Cyst on the brain stem
B None of these
C An idiot
D Swelling of the cerebrum caused by spinal fluid

#Q Leaves of Grass
^ Walt Whitman
A Carl Sandberg
B T.S. Eliot
C Robert Frost
D Walt Whitman

#Q At The Mountains of Madness
^ H.P. Lovecraft
A H.P. Lovecraft
B Peter Straub
C Edgar Allan Poe
D C.S. Lewis

#Q Ape and Essance; Eyeless in Gaza; Point Counter Point
^ Aldous Huxley
A J.D. Salinger
B Aldous Huxley
C Maya Angelou
D William Butler Yeatts

#Q 1984; Animal Farm
^ George Orwell
A Herman Hesse
B Rudyard Kipling
C George Orwell
D Aldous Huxley

#Q Return of the Native; Jude the Obscure; Far From the Madding Crowd
^ Thomas Hardy
A Thomas Hardy
B William Faulkner
C Rudyard Kipling
D James Dickey

#Q The Antichrist; The Gay Science; Beyond Good and Evil; Thus Spoke Zarathustra
^ Frederick Nietzche
A none of these
B Frederick Nietzche
C Amari Baraka
D Stephen King

#Q What language can Harry Potter speak?
^ Parseltounge
A Goblin
B English
C Mermish
D Parseltounge

#Q Cornelia Fudge is the Minister of Magic.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Hermione was supposed to turn into this person after drinking the Polyjuice Potion.
^ Millicent Bulstrode
A Millicent Bulstrode
B Crabbe
C Millie Vanilli
D Pansy Parkins

#Q What was Hagrid buying in Knockturn Alley?
^ Flesh-Eating Slug Repellent
A Flesh-Eating Slug Attractor
B Fresh-Skin Slug Repellent
C Flesh-Eating Ant Repellent
D Flesh-Eating Slug Repellent

#Q This book by James Joyce was forbidden by the US authorities for 15 years, because it was considered obsene. The ban was lifted in 1933.
^ Ulysses
A Ulysses
B Portrait of the Artist
C Dubliners
D Fanny Hill

#Q This book about the life of a prostitute was written by John Cleland. It has been banned in the past due to frank sexual descriptions.
^ Fanny Hill
A Candide
B Lysistrata
C Fanny Hill
D Decameron

#Q This book tells the story of two women who meet and fall in love with each other. They openly declare their homosexuality to family and friends. Thats why the Kansas school system ordered the removal of all copies of this book from high school libraries.
^ Annie on My Mind
A Daddys Roommate
B Andersonville
C Annie on My Mind
D Catch 22

#Q This book led Austin Miles to the courts in 1992.  Miles was sued because his book was ...a vitriolic attack upon organized Christianity.
^ Dont Call Me Brother
A Leaves of Grass
B Dictionary of American Slang
C Jerusalem Delivered
D Dont Call Me Brother

#Q This book by Judy Blume was censored as it discussed adolescent sexuality in too much detail.
^ Forever
A Grapes of Wrath
B Lolita
C Freedom and Order
D Forever

#Q This book by George Orwell was banned as it was pro-communist.
^ 1984
A The Sun Also Rises
B Coming Up for Air
C 1984
D Deliverance

#Q This Lewis Carrolls work was banned in China because in it humans and animals used the same language.
^ Alices Adventures in Wonderland
A Sylvie and Bruno
B Alices Adventures in Wonderland
C Through The Looking Glass
D The Hunting of the Snark

#Q Its translation into local languages was forbidden in Burma.
^ The Bible
A The Quran
B The Cabala
C Arabian Nights
D The Bible

#Q This book was censored in 1985 in Cairo, Egypt as it contained obscene passages which posed a threat to the countrys moral fabric.
^ Arabian Nights
A Arabian Nights
B Don Quixote
C Analects
D Brave New World

#Q An edition of Miltons works was bound in:
^ Human skin
A Human skin
B Golden plates
C Bears fur
D Used newspapers

#Q Binding books with human hide was a common practice once. Why?
^ Because the narrative in the book was about the story of the hides owner
A Because of lack of any other proper material
B Because this sold the books more quickly than anything
C Because the narrative in the book was about the story of the hides owner
D Because it was fashionable at the time

#Q The name of Cruella de Vil from 101 Dalmatians is meaningful because:
^ She wants the puppies for their fur
A She actually likes cats and not dogs
B She is the owner of the dalmatians
C She doesnt give them any food
D She wants the puppies for their fur

#Q Who is the Shakespearean villain who had his own brother executed and innocent children killed because they were hindrances to his kingly ambition?
^ Richard III
A Edmund
B Richard III
C Aaron the Moor
D Othello

#Q According to psychologists villains in fairy-tales actually have an important role for the childrens mind formation, namely:
^ They help children decide what is bad
A They help children decide what is bad
B They make the story really funny
C They are interesting models of behaviour
D They always lose the battle

#Q The famous evil female Baba Yaga comes from:
^ Russian folklore
A A Norse legend
B An Uzbekistanian fairy-tale
C A Moroccan song
D Russian folklore

#Q Harry Potter is concidered malicious literature by some, because:
^ It is about witchcraft
A Most of its characters are strange beings
B Its characters are mainly clad in black clothes
C It comprises too many volulmes
D It is about witchcraft

#Q It turns out that people like reading about crime. The top-selling English-language author of all time is:
^ Agatha Christie
A Agatha Christie
B Ben Johnson
C Edgar-Allan Poe
D Virginia Woolf

#Q Who wrote about the early whodunit archetype, inspector Auguste Dupin?
^ Edgar Allan Poe
A Georges Sands
B Edgar Allan Poe
C Washington Irving
D Nathaniel Hawthorne

#Q Dr. Alex Delaware is the creation of which of these authors?
^ Jonathan Kellerman
A Jonathan Kellerman
B Kathy Reichs
C Faye Kellerman
D Ross McDonald

#Q Robert B. Parker completed Raymond Chandlers unfinished final novel, Poodle Springs.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Kathy Reichs has written some great mysteries, where the primary character is Forensic Archaeologist, Kay Scarpetta.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q What is the name of Colin Creevys brother, who appears in the book Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix?
^ Dennis Creevy
A Carson Creevy
B Darian Creevy
C Dennis Creevy
D James Creevy

#Q Why was Hagrid missing in the beginning of Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix?
^ He went hunting giants.
A He went hunting unicorns.
B He went looking for Dumbleodre.
C He went looking for Sirius Black.
D He went hunting giants.

#Q What did Hermione do to Ron before she stormed out of the charms classroom in Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince?
^ She charmed little yellow birds to fly at Ron and peck him.
A She charmed a desk to fly over to Ron.
B She charmed pencils to fly and poke Ron.
C She charmed little yellow birds to fly at Ron and peck him.
D She charmed a chair to fly across the room at Ron.

#Q Draco Malfoy cries in a book of the Harry Potter series.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Did Crabbe and Goyle ever become friends with Harry, Ron and Hermione in the Harry Potter books?
^ No
A Yes
B No

#Q Harry liked Cho in the book Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q In Harry Potter and the Philosophers Stone, before Harry went to fight Professor Quirrel and He-Who-Must-Not-Be-Named, Hermione helped him with a task that involved what?
^ A set of potions sent from Professor Snape
A A chess set by Professor Flitwick
B An ancient textbook sent from Professor Binns
C A set of potions sent from Professor Snape
D A dragon sent from Hagrid

#Q What was the name of the handsome, selfish teacher in Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets?
^ Professor Gilderoy Lockhart
A Professor Gilderoy Lockhart
B Professor Godric Gryffindor
C Professor Severus Snape
D Professor Cedric Diggory

#Q In Harry Potter and the Philosophers Stone, what was the password to the Gryffindor tower during Halloween?
^ Pig snout
A Pig snout
B Fairy lights
C None of these
D Zebras tail

#Q In Harry Potter and the Philosophers Stone, who gave Nearly-Headless Nick the rejection letter from the Headless Hunt?
^ Sir Patrick Delaney-Podmore
A Sir Delaney Patrick-Podmore
B Sir Sturgis Podmore
C Sir Patrick Delaney-Podmore
D Sir Bloody Baron

#Q In the Harry Potter series, who created the Ravenclaw House when Hogwarts was built?
^ Rowena Ravenclaw
A Rowena Ravenclaw
B Ronald Ravenclaw
C Rowana Ravenclaw
D Ricky Ravenclaw

#Q What was the name of the child who delivered Ron his parcels in Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire?
^ Nigel
A Creevy
B Dennis
C Collin
D Nigel

#Q Filch is a wizard in the Harry Potter books.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Who took over the Fat Ladys job after she was scared out of her portrait in Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban?
^ Sir Cadogan
A Sir Cadogan
B Trolls
C Sirius Black
D Sir Delaney Patrick-Podmore

#Q Who lost the list of passwords for the Gryffindor tower in Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban?
^ Neville Longbottom
A Dean Thomas
B Neville Longbottom
C Ron Weasley
D Padma Patil

#Q In Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince, who was bitten by the werewolf Fenfir Greyback?
^ Bill
A Ron
B Bill
C Charlie
D Percy

#Q Who killed Dumbledore in Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince?
^ Professor Snape
A Professor Binns
B Lucius Malfoy
C Professor Snape
D Bellatrix Lestrange

#Q What is James Potter called by Lily Evans in Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix?
^ A selfish, bullying toerag
A A bullying, selfish git
B A big-headed git
C A selfish, bullying toerag
D An ignorant git

#Q What house was Cho Chang in, as explained in Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban, Order of the Pheonix, and Goblet of Fire?
^ Ravenclaw
A Griffyndor
B Slytherin
C Hufflepuff
D Ravenclaw

#Q Who gave Dudley a pigs tail using a pink umbrella in the book Harry Potter and the Philosophers Stone?
^ Rubeus Hagrid
A Draco Malfoy
B Rubeus Hagrid
C Vernon Dursley
D Harry Potter

#Q Does Harry arrive at Privet Drive with Dumbledore in the first book of the Harry Potter series?
^ No
A No
B Yes

#Q In Harry Potter and the Philosophers Stone, after getting off the Hogwarts Express, how did Harry and his fellow First Years get to the castle?
^ by boat across the lake
A by boat across the lake
B on their broomsticks
C in a flying car
D walking

#Q Who saved Harry from Voldemort in the Forbidden Forest in the first volume of the Harry Potter series?
^ Firenze
A Firenze
B Fred and George Weasley
C Albus Dumbledore
D Hermione Granger

#Q In Harry Potter and the Philosophers Stone, Severus Snape bewitches Harrys broom during the Quidditch match between Gryffindor and Sytherin.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Why were Harry and Hermione at the top of the tallest astronomy tower when they were caught by Filch in Harry Potter and the Philosophers Stone?
^ They were giving Norbert to Charlies friends.
A They were giving Norbert to Charlies friends.
B They were having a meal.
C They were fighting Death Eaters.
D They were doing their homework.

#Q It is stated in the first book of the Harry Potter series that Harry received his first Nimbus Two Thousand broom in the second year of his education at Hogwarts.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q What was Harry Potters first Famous Witch and Wizards card according to the first volume of the series?
^ Albus Dumbledore
A Godric Gryffindor
B Albus Dumbledore
C Helga Hufflepuff
D Merlin

#Q Did Harry, Ron and Hermione encounter a Venomous Tentacula in the first book of the series, after dropping through the trapdoor that Fluffy was guarding?
^ No
A Yes
B No

#Q Who gave Harry his invisibility cloak in Harry Potter and the Philosophers Stone?
^ Dumbledore
A Dumbledore
B Molly Weasley
C Hermione
D Hagrid

#Q In which Stephen King story do we meet the evil Randall Flagg?
^ The Stand
A Salems Lot
B It
C Rose Madder
D The Stand

#Q In which Stephen King story do we meet a banker from Maine named Andy Dufresne?
^ Shawshank Redemption
A Shawshank Redemption
B Children of the Corn
C Cujo
D Needful Things

#Q Paul Edgecomb is a character in which Stephen King story?
^ The Green Mile
A Misery
B Dolores Claiborne
C Graveyard Shift
D The Green Mile

#Q Jud Crandall and Louis Creed are characters in which Stephen King story?
^ Pet Sematary
A Christine
B Pet Sematary
C The Lawnmower Man
D Night Shift

#Q In which Stephen King story do we meet a red-headed character named Malachai?
^ Children of the Corn
A Children of the Corn
B The Tommyknockers
C Firestarter
D The Shining

#Q In which Stephen King story are we introduced to a recovering alcoholic named Jack Torrance?
^ The Shining
A The Shining
B Creepshow
C The Boogeyman
D Thinner

#Q Billy Halleck, a rather rotund lawyer, is a character from which Stephen King story?
^ Thinner
A Insomnia
B Thinner
C Rose Madder
D Storm of the Century

#Q The paraplegic Marty Coslaw is a character in which Stephen King story?
^ Silver Bullet
A The Stand
B Bag of Bones
C Night Shift
D Silver Bullet

#Q In which Stephen King story to we meet the intriguing stranger Andre Linoge?
^ Storm of the Century
A Misery
B Salems Lot
C Carrie
D Storm of the Century

#Q The former nurse Annie Wilkes is a character from which Stephen King story?
^ Misery
A Dolores Claiborne
B Rose Madder
C Firestarter
D Misery

#Q Pennywise is introduced to us in a storm sewer from which Stephen King story?
^ It
A Creepshow
B Pet Sematary
C It
D Needful Things

#Q Johnny Smith is a character that awakens from a coma in which Stephen King story?
^ The Dead Zone
A The Green Mile
B The Dead Zone
C The Tommyknockers
D Graveyard Shift

#Q Arnie Cunninghams character is a nerdy high school student from which Stephen King story?
^ Christine
A Children of the Corn
B Christine
C Cujo
D Carrie

#Q What fantasy series tells us first about a sword, then about the elfstones and finally about a wishsong?
^ Shannara
A Shannara
B Dragon Riders of Pern
C Sword of Truth
D Chronicles of Narnia

#Q In this sci-fi story, a young boy is given advanced training and then tricked into destroying an invading an alien fleet.
^ Enders Game
A Enders Game
B The Boat of a Million Years
C Wisdom Beyond Fear
D Harsh Reality

#Q Which author describes the worlds of the Belgariad and the Malloreon?
^ David Eddings
A David Eddings
B Terry Goodkind
C J. R. R. Tolkien
D Robert Jordan

#Q The fictional spice-drug Melange has a central role in which Sci-fi epic?
^ DUNE
A The Black Legion
B The Pirates of Orion
C War of the Worlds
D DUNE

#Q This fantasy series features channelers, who can control the One Power, a mighty force that comes from the True Source, and is separated into two halves: a male part -saidin, and a female one - saidar.
^ The Wheel of Time
A The Wheel of Time
B Running with the Demon
C Ring World
D Corinthia

#Q This series depicts a unicorn-riding wizard, who is actually a contestant in a game show, in the futuristic world of Proton.
^ Apprentice Adept
A Endless Recursion
B Xanth
C Apprentice Adept
D The Divided Wolrd

#Q This popular fantasy series tells the story of a small human-like character, sent on a mission to save the world. He has to destroy an item of dark and terrible power by casting it into the fires of the mountain, where it was made.
^ Lord of the Rings
A The Wheel of Time
B The Chronicles of Narnia
C The Sword of Truth
D Lord of the Rings

#Q Which Fantasy Series tells the story of  the War Wizard, Richard Rahl?
^ The Sword of Truth
A The Wheel of Time
B Greystone Trilogy
C The Sword of Truth
D Battle Mage Trilogy

#Q Which sci-fi classic features the story of an alien invasion thwarted by earths microorganisms?
^ War of the Worlds
A Speaker for the Dead
B Close Encounters
C 2001: Space Odyssey
D War of the Worlds

#Q Which fantasy series by C.S. Lewis includes a book entitled The Voyage of the Dawn Treader?
^ The Chronicles of Narnia
A The Magic of Xanth
B The Chronicles of Narnia
C Lord of the Rings
D The Pirates of Psion

#Q In the novel Gone with the Wind, what is Scarlett O Haras first name?
^ Katie
A Scarlett
B Carreen
C Melanie
D Katie

#Q Which war is described in the novel Gone with the Wind?
^ The Civil War
A The war in Iraq
B The war of 1812
C The Revolutionary War
D The Civil War

#Q In the novel Gone with the Wind, what was the name of Scarletts first house -- the house she had her childhood in and loved more than anything?
^ Tara
A Tara
B Leps
C Ward
D Yern

#Q How many children did Scarlett have in the novel Gone with the Wind?
^ 3
A 3
B 4
C 1
D 6

#Q In the novel Gone with the Wind, what were the names of the two slaves Scarletts father bought, and what relationship did they have?
^ DIlcey and Prissy, mother and daughter
A Dilcey and Prissy, cousins
B DIlcey and Prissy, mother and daughter
C Mammie and Prissy, sisters
D Mammie and Dilcey, best friends

#Q In the novel Gone with the Wind, Scarletts father bought two slaves from Raif Tarleton.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q In the novel Gone with the Wind, Dilcey had two children.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Name the 19th century novel, which begins with the following sentence: ‘It is a truth universally acknowledged, that a single man in possession of a good fortune, must be in want of a wife.’
^ Pride and Prejudice
A Sense and Sensibility
B North and South
C Pride and Prejudice
D Vanity Fair

#Q This quote is from a novel which focuses on the myth of hedonism: ‘The only way to get rid of a temptation is to yield to it. Resist it, and your soul grows sick with longing for the things it has forbidden to itself, with desire for what its monstrous laws have made monstrous and unlawful.’  Name the novel.
^ The Picture of Dorian Gray
A Lady Chatterleys Lover
B The Picture of Dorian Gray
C A Portrait of the Artist As a Young Man
D Ulysses

#Q The following quote is from a novel which describes a society, characterized mainly by the lack of freedom: ‘Freedom is the freedom to say that two plus two make four. If that is granted, all else follows.’  Name the novel.
^ 1984
A A Good man in Africa
B 1984
C Lord of the Flies
D Heart of Darkness

#Q The main character from this literary work by Philip Roth addresses the following words to his domineering and meticulous Jewish mother: ‘Because to be bad, Mother, that is the real struggle: to be bad and to enjoy it. That is what makes men of us boys.’
^ Portnoys Complaint
A Portnoys Complaint
B My Life As a Man
C The Sun Also Rises
D The Catcher in the Rye

#Q In this novel, with the following sentences, David Lodge sums up the fact that his Catholic characters ceased to believe in the existence of hell: ‘At some point in the nineteen-sixties, Hell disappeared. No one could say for certain when this happened. First it was there and then it wasn’t.
^ How Far Can You Go
A The Remains of the Day
B How Far Can You Go
C The Bloody Chamber
D The Silence in the Garden

#Q The following quote is from a literary work by Kurt Vonnegut in which the characters search for an important and dangerous substance called ‘ice-nine’: ‘Beware of the man who works hard to learn something, learns it, and finds himself no wiser than before. He is full of murderous resentment of people who are ignorant without having come by their ignorance the hard way.’  Name the literary work.
^ Cats Cradle
A Breakfast of Champions
B Cats Cradle
C Catch-22
D Slaughterhouse 5

#Q The following speculation is from a novel set in the gloomy Fen Country of East Anglia: ‘Realitys not strange, not unexpected. Reality doesnt reside in the sudden hallucination of events. Reality is uneventfulness, vacancy, flatness. Reality is that nothing happens. How many of the events of history have occurred, ask yourselves, for this and for that reason, but for no other reason, fundamentally, than the desire to make things happen?’  Can you name the novel?
^ Waterland
A Times Arrow
B Last Orders
C Waterland
D Sugar and Rum

#Q This quote is from a novel by Somerset Maugham, which tells the story of a young man searching for the meaning of life:  ‘It is an illusion that youth is happy, an illusion of those who have lost it; but the young know they are wretched, for they are full of the truthless ideals which have been instilled into them and each time they come in contact with the real they are bruised and wounded.
^ Of Human Bondage
A Of Human Bondage
B Theatre
C Sons and Lovers
D Dombey and Son

#Q In this novel, the following words are said by the protagonist, Isadora Wing, who is in pursuit of liberation: ‘I was nobody’s baby now. Liberated. Utterly free. It was the most terrifying sensation I’d ever known in my life. Like teetering on the edge of the Grand Canyon and hoping you’d learn to fly before you hit the bottom.
^ Fear of Flying
A A Good Man Is Hard to Find
B Editha
C Tropic of Cancer
D Fear of Flying

#Q This is a quote from a novel in which the action takes place in a mental institution: ‘You have to laugh at the things that hurt you just to keep yourself in balance, just to keep the world from running you plumb crazy.’  Name the novel.
^ ‘One Flew Over the Cuckoo’s Nest’
A ‘One Flew Over the Cuckoo’s Nest’
B Lost in the Funhouse
C Something Happened
D The Winter of Our Discontent

#Q After Dr. Seuss used 236 different words to write The Cat in the Hat, his publisher, Bennett Cerf, bet $50 that Seuss could not write a book of only fifty words. Seuss won the bet with this book in 1960.
^ Green Eggs and Ham
A Hop on Pop
B Theres a Wocket in My Pocket!
C Green Eggs and Ham
D One Fish Two Fish Red Fish Blue Fish

#Q Published in January 1990, this is the last book written and illustrated by Dr. Seuss. In the US, its a popular graduation gift.
^ Oh, the Places Youll Go!
A My Book about ME
B I Am NOT Going to Get Up Today!
C Oh, the Places Youll Go!
D Fox in Socks

#Q The plot of this 1984 Seuss satire has been likened to the war between Blefuscu and Lilliput in Jonathan Swifts Gullivers Travel and their war over which end of an egg is supposed to be cracked.
^ The Butter Battle Book
A The Butter Battle Book
B Oh Say Can You Say?
C Green Eggs and Ham
D Theres a Wocket in My Pocket!

#Q Youre a Mean One, Mr. Grinch, one of the most famous songs from the 1966 animated TV special How the Grinch Stole Christmas!, was sung by the narrator Boris Karloff.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q The title of this 1956 Dr. Seuss book has become a popular phrase used to introduce an opinion.
^ If I Ran the Circus
A If I Ran the Circus
B Oh Say Can You Say?
C If I Ran the Zoo
D And to Think That I Saw It on Mulberry Street

#Q Published in 1937, this is Dr. Seusss first book. Its main character Marco is based on Marco McClintock, the son of Mike McClintock, Seuss editor, and Helene McClintock, to whom he dedicated the book.
^ And to Think That I Saw It on Mulberry Street
A Theres a Wocket in My Pocket!
B And to Think That I Saw It on Mulberry Street
C Horton Hatches the Egg
D The Cat in the Hat

#Q In this 1954 Dr. Seuss book the moral of the story (and a repeated phrase throughout the book) is: a persons a person no matter how small. This was the first of two Seuss books starring this kind-hearted elephant.
^ Horton Hears a Who!
A Hop on Pop
B Theres a Wocket in My Pocket!
C Horton Hears a Who!
D Hooper Humperdink...? Not Him!

#Q This 1971 Dr. Seuss book about a mossy,  bossy creature, the Once-ler and the Truffula trees has been banned by some schools and libraries for its anti-forestry industry content.
^ The Lorax
A The Butter Battle Book
B Horton Hears a Who!
C Fox in Socks
D The Lorax

#Q What book by Dr. Seuss contains the quote: When a Fox is in the bottle where the Tweetle Beetles battle with their paddles in a puddle on a noodle-eating poodle, THIS is what they call......a Tweetle Beetle Noodle Poodle Bottled Paddled Muddled Duddled Fuddled Wuddled Fox In Socks, Sir!?
^ Fox in Socks
A The 500 Hats of Bartholomew Cubbins
B If I Ran the Circus
C Fox in Socks
D Oh, the Places Youll Go!

#Q Voyage of the Dawn Treader was written by this author.
^ C S Lewis
A T S Elliot
B C S Lewis
C Lewis Carrol
D Brothers Grimm

#Q This famous childrens poet wrote Where the Sidewalk Ends and The Giving Tree.
^ Shel Silverstien
A Dr Seuss
B none of these
C Lewis Carrol
D Shel Silverstien

#Q Dante Alighieri (1265-1321) probably began this work in 1306. Its first canto begins with: Midway upon the journey of our life I found myself within a forest dark, for the straightforward pathway had been lost.
^ The Divine Comedy
A Troilus and Cressida
B The Divine Comedy
C The Decameron
D Gargantua and Pantagruel

#Q The Canterbury Tales is a collection of stories written by Geoffrey Chaucer. It recounts the tales told by individuals on a pilgrimage to the shrine of Saint Thomas Becket at Canterbury Cathedral. Which of the following was not a character in this work?
^ Tax Collector
A Physician
B Reeve
C Tax Collector
D Yeoman

#Q In the novel Don Quixote by Spanish author Miguel de Cervantes Saavedra, who is the witty squire and companion to Alonso Quixano?
^ Sancho Panza
A Aldonzo Lorenzo
B Antonio de la Gandara
C Che Guevara
D Sancho Panza

#Q In this tragic play by William Shakespeare, three witches tell a general in the army of King Duncan that he will never be vanquishd until Great Birnam wood to high Dunsinane Hill shall come against him.
^ Macbeth
A The Tempest
B Macbeth
C Hamlet
D Titus Andronicus

#Q This 1971 novel by Anthony Burgess relates the story of a fifteen-year-old boy named Alex, who, with his gang members (known as droogs) roam the streets at night, committing violent crimes for enjoyment.
^ A Clockwork Orange
A Helter Skelter
B A Clockwork Orange
C Fahrenheit 451
D Catcher in the Rye

#Q The famous line In the room the women come and go, talking of Michelangelo is from the poem The Love Song of J. Alfred Prufrock by this influential 20th century poet.
^ T. S. Eliot
A W. H. Auden
B Robert Browning
C Robert Frost
D T. S. Eliot

#Q This great work of Russian literature by Fyodor Dostoevsky features the character Raskolnikov, an impoverished St. Petersburg student who kills an unscrupulous pawnbroker.
^ Crime and Punishment
A Dead Souls
B And Quiet Flows the Don
C The Brothers Karamazov
D Crime and Punishment

#Q This novel by Charles Dickens, published in 1850, is considered his most autobiographical. It begins with: Whether I shall turn out to be the hero of my own life, or whether that station will be held by anybody else, these pages must show. Characters include Wilkins Micawber and Uriah Heep.
^ David Copperfield
A Great Expectations
B David Copperfield
C A Tale of Two Cities
D Bleak House

#Q As Gregor Samsa awoke one morning from uneasy dreams he found himself transformed in his bed into a gigantic insect is the opening line to this famous work of German fiction by Franz Kafka.
^ The Metamorphosis
A The Metamorphosis
B Thus Spoke Zarathustra
C As I Lay Dying
D Heart of Darkness

#Q This novel by Charlotte Brontë includes the character Mr. Rochester, whose wife is a violent lunatic.
^ Jane Eyre
A Jane Eyre
B Wuthering Heights
C A Room with a View
D The Turn of the Screw

#Q Fifteen men on the dead mans chest— Yo-ho-ho, and a bottle of rum! is a famous line from Treasure Island, a novel by this author published in 1883.
^ Robert Louis Stevenson
A James Fenimore Cooper
B Robert Louis Stevenson
C Ralph Waldo Emerson
D William Makepeace Thackeray

#Q Death be not proud, though some have called thee mighty and dreadfull, for, thou art not so is a portion of a work by this poet who lived from 1572-1631.
^ John Donne
A John Milton
B John Donne
C Lord Byron
D William Blake

#Q In what 1851 novel would you find the characters Ishmael, Captain Ahab, Queequeg and Starbuck?
^ Moby Dick by Herman Melville
A Voyage of the Dawn Treader by C. S. Lewis
B Heart of Darkness by Joseph Conrad
C Moby Dick by Herman Melville
D The Jungle by Upton Sinclair

#Q This early Anglo-Saxon work, possibly from the 800s, features the antagonist Grendel, a descendant of Cain who invades the mead-hall of the Danes and eats the men within. The title character ultimately beheads Grendel and keeps it as a trophy.
^ Beowulf
A Oedipus Rex
B Morte Arthure
C Beowulf
D Epic of Gilgamesh

#Q In Stephen Kings novel Bag of Bones, what is the location of the Noonans summer home?
^ Sarah Laughs
A Sarah Laughs
B Black House
C Parilloud
D Lewiston

#Q What is the name of Dolores Claibornes wealthy employer in the Stephen King novel Dolores Claiborne?
^ Vera Donovan
A Jamie ONeal
B Selena Cook
C Joe St. George
D Vera Donovan

#Q In the horror novel Misery, Annie Wilkes was referred to by the newspapers as what?
^ The Dragon Lady
A The Dragon Lady
B The Baby Slayer
C The Black Widow
D Misery

#Q What is Stephen Kings first published novel?
^ Carrie
A Salems Lot
B Carrie
C The Stand
D The Shining

#Q What novel did Stephen King and Peter Straub co-author in 1983?
^ The Talisman
A Twilight Eyes
B The Talisman
C Black House
D Shadowland

#Q In the novel Cristine, Dennis decides he does not like Christine, because, while sitting in it, he has a vision of the car and the surroundings as they would be in 1957 when the car was new.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Once in a kingdom called Delain, there was a king with two sons. Delain was a very old kingdom and it had had hundreds of kings, perhaps, even thousands... is the beginning of what book?
^ The Eyes of the Dragon
A The Stand
B The Dark Tower I: The Gunslinger
C The  Dark Tower IV: The Wizard and the Glass
D The Eyes of the Dragon

#Q In the novel Pet Semetary, what is the name of the Creeds cat that is buried and returns to life?
^ Church
A Jud
B Church
C Gage
D Louis

#Q Who fell into the lake?
^ Dennis
A Neville
B Colin
C Hermione
D Dennis

#Q George used the Jelly-Legs curse on Goyle.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q On what day did Percy say he would have the report ready for Mr Crouch?
^ Tuesday
A Monday
B Thursday
C Friday
D Tuesday

#Q Goblet of Fire started a series of deaths in the books. Who died in Goblet of Fire?
^ Cedric Diggory
A Wormtail
B Padfoot
C Dumbledore
D Cedric Diggory

#Q Harry rescued Hermione from the Merpeople.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Where do Harry Potter and Ron leave the chocolate cakes for Crabbe and Goyle to find?
^ At the end of the banister
A On the Floor
B At the end of the banister
C Floating near the entrance to the Slytherin Common Room
D Floating mid-air in the exit of the Great Hall

#Q In chapter one of Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban, Harry has Snapes essay on Sleeping Draughts hidden under the floorboard.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q In chapter 7 of Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban, titled The Boggart in the Wardrobe, a severed hand comes out of the wardrobe for Seamus Finnegan.
^ No
A No
B Yes

#Q How long does Dudleys tongue become, after eating Fred and Georges candies, in the fourth book of the Harry Potter series?
^ 1 ft.
A 1 ft.
B 2 ft.
C 2.5 ft.
D 3 ft.

#Q Rons Christmas gift to Dobby in Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire is a tea cozy.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q What room does Harry Potter go to for his hearing in the 5th book of the series?
^ Courtroom 10
A Courtroom 10
B Courtroom13
C Courtroom 11
D Courtroom 7

#Q In chapter 24 of book 5, what breaks Snapes attempt to use Legilimency on Harry Potter?
^ The vision of Cedrics dead body
A Fluffys attack on Harry, Hermione and Ron
B The vision of Cedrics dead body
C Voldemorts re-birth
D The Dementors kiss on Sirius

#Q The weapon that Voldemort wanted in book 5 of the Harry Potter series was Harry.
^ No
A No
B Yes

#Q Who wrote the novel Gone With the Wind?
^ Margaret Mitchell
A Margaret Mitchell
B Pansey OHara
C Ann Marie Tyler
D Jacqueline Susan

#Q In 2000, Alice Randall wrote a new version of Gone With the Wind in which the story is told from the point of view of the slaves. What was the name of this novel?
^ The Wind Done Gone
A Scarletts Troubles
B Went With the Wind
C The Wind Done Gone
D Tomorrow Aint  Another Day

#Q In 1962, the best known music theme from the movie Gone with the Wind often called Taras Theme, was made into a hit record on the pop charts. Which group had a 1962 hit with My Own True Love?
^ The Duprees
A The Coasters
B The Dovells
C The Duprees
D The Shangri-Las

#Q Who portrayed Ashley Wilkes in the popular movie Gone with the Wind?
^ Leslie Howard
A Gary Cooper
B Groucho Marx
C Leslie Howard
D Voctor Jory

#Q Excluding the opening music, the intermission, and exit music, how long does the movie Gone with the Wind run?
^ 222 minutes
A 148 minutes
B 127 minutes
C 180 minutes
D 222 minutes

#Q Three men are given credit as directors of the movie Gone with the Wind. Which one of the following directors is not among them?
^ Raoul Walsh
A Sam Wood
B Raoul Walsh
C George Cukor
D Victor Fleming

#Q The company that produced Gone with the Wind was fined because Rhett  Butler says the word damn in his famous line: Frankly my dear, I dont give a damn.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q How much did David O. Selznick pay for the rights to the book Gone with the Wind?
^ $50,000
A $5,000,000
B nothing
C $5,000
D $50,000

#Q The producer of the movie Gone with the Wind was short of money and needed a male lead. With whom did he make a deal?
^ With his father-in-law
A With his father-in-law
B With Columbia Films
C With his father
D With  United Artists

#Q A TV  sequel to  Gone with the Wind was released in 1994.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Which American author is popularly known as the chronicler of the Jazz Age - the period between World War I and World War II?
^ F. Scott Fitzgerald
A Ernest Hemingway
B John Dos Passos
C John Steinbeck
D F. Scott Fitzgerald

#Q Which novel by Ernest Hemingway was published in Great Britain under the title Fiesta?
^ The Sun Also Rises
A Death in the Afternoon
B A Farewell to Arms
C The Sun Also Rises
D For Whom the Bell Tolls

#Q Which 1929 novel narrates the decline of the distinguished Southern family, the Compsons?
^ The Sound and the Fury by William Faulkner
A East of Eden by John Steinbeck
B The Sound and the Fury by William Faulkner
C Manhattan Transfer by John Dos Passos
D This Side of paradise by F. Scott Fitzgerald

#Q The 1961 publication of this sexually explicit novel led to an obscenity trial in the USA.
^ Tropic of Cancer
A Naked Lunch
B Tropic of Cancer
C A Spy in the House of Love
D On the Road

#Q Which novel, set in the Great Depression of the 1930s, won the the Pulitzer Prize in 1940?
^ The Grapes of Wrath
A The Naked and the Death
B Tortilla Flat
C An American Tragedy
D The Grapes of Wrath

#Q Which of the following is not a character depicted by Joseph Heller in his anti-war novel Catch-22?
^ Papa Monzano
A Papa Monzano
B Major Major Major Major
C Chief White Halfoat
D Dunbar

#Q Humbert Humbert is the protagonist and narrator of which 1955 novel?
^ Lolita
A Lolita
B The Awakening
C In Cold Blood
D Something Happened

#Q Which of these novels is not part of the popular Rabbit series written by John Updike?
^ Rabbit in Love
A Rabbit Redux
B Rabbit in Love
C Rabbit, Run
D Rabbit Is Rich

#Q Which author was not a reperesentative figure of the Harlem Renaissance, an African American cultural movement of the 1920s and early 1930s?
^ Carl Sandburg
A Carl Sandburg
B ZoraNeale Hurston
C Countee Cullen
D Langston Hughes

#Q Who wrote the semi-autobiographical novel Junkie, which gives an account of the lifestyle of heroin addicts in the early 1950s?
^ William S. Burroughs
A Jack Kerouac
B Philip Roth
C Saul Bellow
D William S. Burroughs

#Q In this book, a man loses his memory during the war, falls in love and marries, then hits his head and remembers his former life, forgetting his wife completely.
^ Random Harvest
A Random Harvest
B The Razors Edge
C Round the Bend
D For Whom the Bell Tolls

#Q This novel tells the story of a man that meets his double and changes identities with him.
^ The Scapegoat
A Body Double
B Dead Ringers
C The Scapegoat
D The Silent Partner

#Q A man who searches for inner peace, finally finding it by the side of a river is the protagonist of this 1922 German novel.
^ Siddhartha
A A River Runs Through It
B On the Beach
C In Search of the Miraculous
D Siddhartha

#Q In this book, a man says that he will stop the motor of the world. He does so by removing the creative and visionary leaders from society one by one, tempting them to come live in an utopian society in the wilderness.
^ Atlas Shrugged
A Giant
B Utopia
C Heart of Darkness
D Atlas Shrugged

#Q The main character of this novel can make people disappear from existence with an effort of will.
^ Stranger in a Strange Land
A Steppenwolf
B Stranger in a Strange Land
C The Mote in Gods Eye
D When the Bough Breaks

#Q In this novel, the son of a wealthy man is obsessed with creating more wealth, in a subconscious desire to rebel against his father. In the end, he discovers that he has become his father. During his life, he invests in airplanes and movies, among other things. He has many affairs with beautiful women along the way.
^ The Carpetbaggers
A The Carpetbaggers
B L.A. Confidential
C Valley of the Dolls
D The Tycoon

#Q Electrodes are implanted into the brain of this book’s protagonist in an effort to cure his seizures. But the electrodes fire too often, making him go on a murderous rampage.
^ The Terminal Man
A The Electric Michelangelo
B Altered States
C The Electric Kool-Aid Acid Test
D The Terminal Man

#Q A mild-mannered coward is enlisted to help a group of hardened criminals pull off a museum theft in this 1962 English novel.
^ The Light of Day
A The Light of Day
B The House on the Strand
C The Empty Copper Sea
D The Boomerang Heist

#Q In this novel, an adult man is obsessed with a teenage girl.
^ Lolita
A Obsession
B Rebecca
C Lolita
D Studio Sex

#Q This book tells the story of a pilot and a scientist on an air expedition to Greenland who have separate dreams of being two long-dead lovers.
^ An Old Captivity
A Eaters of the Dead
B An Old Captivity
C The Interpretation of Dreams
D Lost Horizon

#Q Name the movie that ends with the following line: Louis. I think this is the beginning of a beautiful friendship.
^ Casablanca
A Casablanca
B The African Queen
C The Maltese Falcon
D Sahara

#Q They hand in hand, with wandering steps  and slow,
Through Eden took their solitary way is from a work by this author.
^ John Milton
A William Shakespeare
B Geoffrey Chaucer
C James Joyce
D John Milton

#Q Which movie ends with these lines:  Yes! Yes! I believe it. I believe it because I want  to believe it. Gentlemen I give you a toast. Heres my hope that Robert Conway will find his Shangri-La. Heres my hope that we all find our Shangri-La.?
^ Lost Horizon
A Jane Eyre
B Wuthering Heights
C Lost Horizon
D Green Mansions

#Q So we beat on, boats against the current, borne back into the past. was  the last line in a book by this  author.
^ F. Scott Fitzgerald
A Herman Melville
B F. Scott Fitzgerald
C Werner Herzog
D Thomas  Hardy

#Q Mother of Mercy! Is this the end of Rico? is the  last line of this great movie.
^ Little Ceasar
A Little Ceasar
B The Great Santini
C Carlitos Way
D Midnight Cowboy

#Q Which Shakespearean play ends with this line: So thanks to all at once and  to each one, Whom we invite to see us crowned at Scone.
^ Macbeth
A Henry IV, Part I
B Hamlet
C Macbeth
D Othello

#Q Which great movie ends with this line: Victory is Ours!?
^ Duck Soup
A Dr. Strangelove
B Duck Soup
C The Battleship Potempkin
D The Great Dictator

#Q Which great movie ends with this line: The, uh, stuff that dreams are made of. Huh?
^ The Maltese Falcon
A Casablanca
B The Maltese Falcon
C Sahara
D Citizen Kane

#Q Which great movie ends with these lines: O-Lan, you are the Earth.?
^ The Good Earth
A The Day the Earth Stood Still
B Green Mansions
C The Good Earth
D Lost Horizon

#Q Which movie ends with these lines: Hello everybody. This is Mrs. Norman Maine.?
^ A Star is Born
A Citizen Kane
B A Star is Born
C Radio Star
D A Day at the Races

#Q This movie is about a drifter, who works for a cruel boss at a textile mill, and comes across a mutated rat with no eyes or legs.
^ Graveyard Shift
A Cats Eye
B Sometimes They Come Back
C Pet Sematary
D Graveyard Shift

#Q This actress played the little girl, Amanda, in the horror movie Cats Eye.
^ Drew Barrymore
A Drew Barrymore
B Alyssa Milano
C Molly Ringwald
D Patricia Benson

#Q This Stephen King movie is about Jack Torrance, a writer who takes a job as a caretaker for the Overlook Hotel.
^ The Shining
A Misery
B Rose Red
C Pet Sematary
D The Shining

#Q What animal was the main character in the horror movie Cujo?
^ Dog
A Snake
B Alligator
C Cat
D Dog

#Q What actress plays Annie Wilkes in the movie Misery?
^ Kathy Bates
A none of these
B Terri Garr
C Cheryl Ladd
D Kathy Bates

#Q Which novel by Charles Dickens is generally regarded as the first Victorian novel?
^ The Pickwick Papers
A Dombey and Son
B The Pickwick Papers
C David Copperfield
D Barnaby Rudge

#Q This highly symbolic story by Polish-born novelist Joseph Conrad served as a base for the movie Apocalypse Now.
^ Heart of Darkness
A Lord Jim
B The Shadow Line
C An Outcast of the Islands
D Heart of Darkness

#Q Which novel by Thomas Hardy had the subtitle A Pure Woman, which shocked Victorian readers?
^ Tess of the dUrbervilles
A Tess of the dUrbervilles
B The Hand of Ethelberta
C The Return of the Native
D Emma

#Q Which of the Bronte sisters wrote Shirley, a novel set in Yorkshire during the industrial depression?
^ Charlotte
A Emily
B Charlotte
C Elizabeth
D Anne

#Q Which list contains the names of the Bennet sisters, depicted by Jane Austin in Pride and Prejudice?
^ Elisabeth, Jane, Lydia, Kitty, Mary
A Cathrine, Jane, Lydia, Kitty, Mary
B Elizabeth, Ann, Lydia, Kitty, Mary
C Charlotte, Elizabeth, Emily, Mary, Kitty
D Elisabeth, Jane, Lydia, Kitty, Mary

#Q Which of these literary works was written in the form of a long letter while the author was in prison?
^ De Profundis
A De Profundis
B A Room with a View
C The Canterville Ghost
D The Importance of Being Earnest

#Q Which of these books were written by Victorian novelist Mary Anne Evans, commonly known as George Eliot?
^ Middlemarch, The Mill on the Floss, Adam Bede
A The Mill on the Floss, Adam Bede, A Room of Ones Own
B Middlemarch, The Mill on the Floss, Adam Bede
C The Mill on the Floss, Vanity Fair, Adam Bede
D Middlemarch, North and South, Vanity Fair

#Q This novel, which satirizes society in early 19th-century England, opens at Miss Pinkertons Academy for Young Ladies.
^ Vanity Fair
A Jane Eyre
B Wuthering Heights
C Vanity Fair
D The Book of Snobs

#Q This literary work by Mary Shelley, infused with some elements of the Gothic novel, was subtitled The Modern Prometheus.
^ Frankenstein
A Arms and the Man
B The Mortal Immortal
C Frankenstein
D The Last Man

#Q What are the two cities named in the title of Charles Dickens historical novel A Tale of Two Cities?
^ Paris and London
A London and Manchester
B Paris and London
C Dublin and London
D Edinburgh and London

#Q Ahab, Ishmael, Starbuck, Stubb, Queequeg and Elijah were characters in this 1851 novel.
^ Moby Dick
A Eastern Voices
B Genesis
C The Satanic Episodes
D Moby Dick

#Q Jim, Marlowe, Stein, Sherif Ali, Rajah Tunka Allang and Gentleman Brown were characters in this novel.
^ Lord Jim
A Lord Jim
B Darkest Passage
C Eastern Visions
D The Heart of Darkness

#Q The characters in this novel included Charles Marlow, Kurtz, Fresleven, Chief Accountant and General Manager.
^ The Heart of Darkness
A Passage to India
B Lord Jim
C Eastern Visions
D The Heart of Darkness

#Q The characters in this novel included Pierre Bezukov, Natasha Rostovic, Sonya Rostovic, Andrei N. Bolkov and Elene Kuragin.
^ War and Peace
A War and Peace
B The Gulag
C Crime and Punishment
D The Idiot

#Q Jim, Widow Douglas, Miss Watson, The Grangerford and the Shepardsons were characters in this novel.
^ The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn
A Life on the Mississippi
B The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn
C Billy Budd
D The Rise of Silas Lapham

#Q Raskolnikov, Sonya S. and Porfry were characters in this novel.
^ Crime and Punishment
A Crime and Punishment
B Napoleon
C The Idiot
D War and Peace

#Q The characters in this novel included Hester Prynne, Pearl, Roger Chillingworth and Arthur Dimmsdale.
^ The Scarlet Letter
A The Heiress
B Jane Eyre
C The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn
D The Scarlet Letter

#Q The characters in this novel included Wilfred, Rebecca, Rowena, Isaac of York and Prior.
^ Ivanhoe
A The Scarlet Letter
B The Rise of Silas Lapham
C Ivanhoe
D The Day of the Locust

#Q Elizabeth Bennet, Mr. Darcy, Mr. Bennett, Charles Bingley and William Collins were characters in this novel.
^ Pride and  Prejudice
A Wuthering Heights
B Great  Expectations
C Pride and  Prejudice
D Jane Eyre

#Q Clara, Mr. Chiilg, Mr. Creadle, Peggotty and Betsy Trotwood were characters in this novel.
^ David Copperfield
A Pickwick Papers
B Great Expectations
C A Take of Two Cities
D David Copperfield

#Q The characters in this novel included Becky Sharp, Amelia Smedley, George Osborne and Pitt Crawley.
^ Vanity Fair
A The Pillsbury man
B The Scarlet Letter
C Vanity Fair
D The Rise of Sila Lapham

#Q In the novel Jurassic Park,  the zoo-like amusement park is on an island, situated off the shore of what country?
^ Costa Rica
A Costa Rica
B El Salvador
C Honduras
D Mexico

#Q Ian Malcolm, a character from the book Jurassic Park, is an expert in which field?
^ Chaos Theory
A Languages
B Geology
C Chaos Theory
D History

#Q Dennis Nedry was paid by a rival company to sabotage Jurassic Park in the self-titled book.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q The game warden, Muldoon, was killed by raptors in the book Jurassic Park.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q This dinosaur, depicted in the novel Jurassic Park, was a very beautiful carnivore but spat poison to blind its prey.
^ Dilophosaur
A Microceratops
B Styracosaur
C Dilophosaur
D Procompsognathid

#Q What was the occupation of Donald Gennaro, the character in the book Jurassic Park who originally tried to get Jurassic Park shut down?
^ Lawyer
A Paleontologist
B Lawyer
C Mathematician
D Senator

#Q The dinosaurs, featured in Michael Crichtons novel Jurassic Park, were supposedly not able to breed inside the park for what reason?
^ They were all female
A They were all neutered at birth
B They were all female
C They were all male
D They were fed a special drug to keep them from breeding

#Q How many T-Rexes were there in the novel Jurassic Park?
^ 2
A 2
B 3
C 4
D 1

#Q The Institute of Vertebrate Paleontology and Paleoanthropology of the Chinese Academy of Sciences named the new ankylosaurus species Crichtonsaurus in honor of Michael Crichton, the author of Jurassic Park.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Why was a diagonal red line painted on the jeeps in the book Jurassic Park?
^ The triceratops didnt like the red line, therefore they wouldnt charge the jeeps.
A The triceratops didnt like the red line, therefore they wouldnt charge the jeeps.
B It was the symbol of Jurassic Park Theme Park.
C The velociraptors regarded red as a color that signified some larger predator.
D The apatosaurs thought that stripes were an indication of a predator so they stayed away.

#Q In the movie Gone With the Wind Scarlett had three husbands. Who was the first?
^ Charles Hamilton
A Brent Tarleton
B Frank Kennedy
C Charles Hamilton
D Stuart Tarleton

#Q In the film Gone with the Wind, Scarletts first husband died in the early days of the Civil War. What was the cause of his death?
^ Measles and pneumonia
A He died under enemy attack.
B Measles and pneumonia
C Consumption
D Flu

#Q In the film Gone with the Wind, when Rhett and Scarlett came back from their honeymoon they brought a gift for Mammy. What was it?
^ Red silk petticoat
A White silk nightgown
B White silk petticoat
C Red silk petticoat
D Fur coat

#Q The Oscar for Best Actress in a Supporting Role went to which cast member of Gone With the Wind?
^ Hattie McDaniel
A Butterfly McQueen
B Dorothy Dandridge
C Hattie McDaniel
D None of these

#Q Clark Gable won the Oscar for Best Actor for his role as Rhett Butler.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Where did Gone with the Wind character Rhett get the inspiration for his and Scarletts daughters name from?
^ The confederate flag
A A nursery rhyme his mother had sung to him as a child
B The southern skies
C The confederate flag
D Mammy

#Q Which of the following lines from the movie Gone with the Wind was voted as the #1 movie quote by the American Film Institute?
^ Frankly my dear, I dont give a damn.
A After all, tomorrow is another day!
B I dont know nothin bout birthin no babies!
C As God is my witness, Ill never be hungry again!
D Frankly my dear, I dont give a damn.

#Q What was NOT true of Scarletts second husband in Gone with the Wind?
^ He divorced Scarlett to marry her sister, Sue-Ellen.
A The physical affliction he returned from the war with was body lice.
B He died on a mission to avenge Scarletts attack in Shantytown.
C He owned a sawmill.
D He divorced Scarlett to marry her sister, Sue-Ellen.

#Q What was the name of the Atlanta street where fictional character Scarlett OHara lived with Aunt Pittypat?
^ Peachtree
A Weeping Willow
B Elm
C Peachtree
D Southern Pine

#Q There is only one scene in the movie Gone with the Wind that suggests Scarlett has a problem with alcohol consumption.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Which of the following caused the death of Scarlett and Rhetts daughter?
^ She broke her neck while jumping her pony.
A She succumbed to influenza.
B She was a war casualty.
C She mysteriously died in her crib.
D She broke her neck while jumping her pony.

#Q What actress portrayed the character in Gone with the Wind who claimed she knew everythin bout birthin babies when, in reality, she knew nothin?
^ Butterfly McQueen
A Dorothy McDaniel
B Dorothy Dandridge
C Butterfly McQueen
D Hattie McDaniel

#Q Vivian Leigh earned the same amount of money as Clark Gable for her work in Gone With the Wind.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q How many actresses auditioned for the coveted role of Scarlett OHara?
^ 1400
A 1200
B 150
C 2500
D 1400

#Q Vivian Leigh won the Best Actress Oscar for her performance as Scarlett OHara in Gone With the Wind. This was her only Academy Award.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Scarlett OHara wasted much of her life pining after Ashley Wilkes who was played by this actor.
^ Leslie Howard
A Leslie Howard
B Errol Flynn
C George Reeves
D Gary Cooper

#Q The play is the tragedy Man, and the hero, the Conquerer Worm.
^ Edgar Allan Poe
A Edgar Allan Poe
B William Jennings Bryant
C H.P. Lovecraft
D None of these

#Q And Richard Cory, one calm summer night,
Went home and put a bullet through his head.
^ Edwin Arlington Robinson
A John Berryman
B Randall Jarrell
C Edwin Arlington Robinson
D Luke Havergall

#Q From my mothers sleep, I fell into the State.
I hunched in its body till my wet fur froze.
Sis miles from earth, loosed from its dream of life...
When I died they washed me out of the turret with a hose.
^ Randall Jarrell
A Randall Jarrell
B John Crowe Ransom
C Wallace Stevens
D Robinson Jeffers

#Q Success is counted sweetest
by those who never succeed.
To comprehend a nectar
requires the sorest need.
^ Emily Dickinson
A Emily Dickinson
B None of these
C Gertrude Stein
D Hilda Doolittle

#Q A heap of broken images, where the Sun beats...
I will show you fear in a handful of dust.
^ T.S. Eliot
A Gertrude Stein
B Ezra Pound
C Allen Ginsberg
D T.S. Eliot

#Q Pity this busy monster mankind not...
^ e.e. cummings
A Sharon Olds
B Rita Dove
C Marianne Moore
D e.e. cummings

#Q I spit upon this dreadful bankers grave
who shot his heart out in a Florida dawn
O ho alas alas
When will indifference come, I moan  rave
Id like to scrabble till I got right down
away down under the grass
^ John Berryman
A Hart Crane
B None of these
C John Berryman
D Philip Booth

#Q I saw a man pursuing the horizon;
 Round and round they sped.
 I was disturbed at this;
 I accosted the man.
 It is futile, I said.
 You can never —
 You lie, he cried,
 And ran on.
^ Stephen Crane
A Robert Lowell
B Denise Levertov
C Walt Whitman
D Stephen Crane

#Q I have gone out, a possessed witch, 
haunting the black air, braver at night; 
dreaming evil, I have done my hitch 
over the plain houses, light by light: 
lonely thing, twelve-fingered, out of mind. 
A woman like that is not a woman, quite. 
I have been her kind.
^ Anne Sexton
A Gwendolyn Brooks
B Emily Dickinson
C Anne Sexton
D Sylvia Plath

#Q I was ten when they buried you.
At twenty I tried to die
And get back, back, back to you.
I thought even the bones would do.

But they pulled me out of the sack,
And they stuck me together with glue.
And then I knew what to do.
I made a model of you,
A man in black with a Meinkampf look
^ Sylvia Plath
A Anne Sexton
B June Jordan
C Sylvia Plath
D Joyce Carol Oates

#Q Which of these novels is not part of the Forsyte Saga, written by English novelist John Galsworthy?
^ Money
A To Let
B In Chancery
C The Man of Property
D Money

#Q This massive novel, consisting of 18 chapters, chronicles the events of one single day in the life of the protagonist Leopold Bloom.
^ Ulysses
A Ulysses
B Finnegans Wake
C Dubliners
D A Portrait of the Artist as a Young man

#Q Which of these influential 20th century authors was not Irish-born?
^ William Golding
A William Golding
B James Joyce
C William Butler Yeats
D George Bernard Shaw

#Q In 1989, the author of this book and all those involved in its publication were sentenced to death by the Supreme Leader of Iran.
^ The Satanic Verses
A Songs of Enchantment
B Lady Chatterleys Lover
C The Gate at the End of the World
D The Satanic Verses

#Q Which of these English authors was a member of the Bloomsbury group, a literary circle that rejected the Victorian taboos on religious, artistic, social, and sexual matters?
^ Virginia Woolf
A D. H. Lawrence
B George Orwell
C Virginia Woolf
D John Fowles

#Q Which allegorical novel by William Golding features a group of boys stranded on a desert island?
^ Lord of the Flies
A Fire Down Below
B Rites of Passage
C Lord of the Flies
D Darkness Visible

#Q What do George Bernard Shaw, William Butler Yeats, Rudyard Kipling and William Golding have in common?
^ All of them received the Nobel Prize in Literature.
A They were all born in Ireland.
B They were members of The Fabian Society - a British socialist intellectual movement.
C All of them served in WWI.
D All of them received the Nobel Prize in Literature.

#Q Which playwright received the 1938 Academy Award for Writing Adapted Screenplay?
^ George Bernard Shaw
A John Boyd
B George Bernard Shaw
C Harold Pinter
D John Osborne

#Q What name was applied to the group of British playwrights and novelists from the 1950s, which included John Osborne, John Braine, and Alan Sillitoe?
^ The Angry Young Men
A The Rebels
B The Conformists
C The Disappointed Young Men
D The Angry Young Men

#Q This novel focuses on Winston Smith and his attempt to rebel against the totalitarian state in which he lives.
^ Nineteen Eighty-Four
A The Invisible Man
B Nineteen Eighty-Four
C The War of the Worlds
D Animal Farm

#Q Into what creature did Mad Eye Moody turn Draco Malfoy in Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire?
^ A ferret
A A rat
B A ferret
C A toad
D A mouse

#Q Draco Malfoy is a member of this fictional house at Hogwarts which values pure blood heritage.
^ Slytherin
A Ravenclaw
B Slytherin
C Gryffindor
D Hufflepuff

#Q Draco Malfoy is killed by Harry Potter in the last book of the series, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q In which book of the Harry Potter series is Draco Malfoy made Prefect of his house?
^ Order of the Phoenix
A Prisoner of Azkaban
B Order of the Phoenix
C Goblet of Fire
D Half-Blood Prince

#Q In the book Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban, Draco Malfoy was attacked by this kind of creature while in his Care for Magical Creatures class?
^ Hippogryph
A Werewolf
B Blast-Ended Skrewt
C Centaur
D Hippogryph

#Q Draco Malfoy became the master of the Elder Wand which was Dumbledores beloved wand.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Ralph, Piggy, Jack Merridew, Simon, Ron are characters in this novel.
^ The Lord of the Flies
A Lawdy, Lawdy, Miss Claudie
B The Lord of the Flies
C The Lord of the Ring
D Lord Jim

#Q Humbert Humbert, Valeria and Charlotte Haze are characters from this literary work.
^ Lolita
A The Day of the Triffids
B Lolita
C All the Kings Men
D Naked Lunch

#Q Paul Sheldon and Annie Wilkes are characters in this novel.
^ Misery
A Day for Night
B Cujo
C The Long Green Mile
D Misery

#Q What novels includes characters named Sethe, Liz Granacher, Paul D. McKnight, Charlie McKnight?
^ Beloved
A Beloved
B Satanic Verses
C The Color Purple
D A Passage to India

#Q Willie Stark, Anne Stanton, Judge Montague Irving are characters from this novel.
^ All the Kings Men
A All the Kings Men
B Lady Lovelace
C The Sun Also Rises
D The Grapes of Wrath

#Q Ari, Dov, Kitty Fremont, Akiva, Bruce Sutherland are characters in this novel.
^ Exodus
A The Glory
B Ben-Hur
C The Promise
D Exodus

#Q This novel focuses on the lives of Jake Barnes, Brett Ashley, Robert Cohn, Pedro Romero, Bill Gorton, Michael Campbell.
^ The Sun Also Rises
A Ragtime
B The Sun Also Rises
C The Dog Soldiers
D Day of the Locust

#Q Which book includes the characters John Converse, Ray Hicks, Marge Converse?
^ Dog Soldiers
A Dog Soldiers
B Day of the Locust
C The Hearth
D Day In Day Out

#Q What Southern novel centers on the lives of these characters: Jason, Quentin, Candice Compson, Dilsey Gibson?
^ The Sound and the Fury
A Way of the  West
B The Sound and the Fury
C Dog Soldiers
D Day of the Locust

#Q John Singer, Mick Kelly, Biff Brannon, Jack Blount, Dr. Copeland are characters described in this literary work.
^ The Heart is a Lonely Hunter
A Giant
B Strangers on a Train
C Butterflies are Free
D The Heart is a Lonely Hunter

#Q What novel by Erich Maria Remarque was banned in Nazi Germany for insulting the Wehrmacht?
^ All Quiet on the Western Front
A The Night in Lisbon
B Heaven Has No Favorites
C The Black Obelisk
D All Quiet on the Western Front

#Q Name the author of Animal Farm, an anti-Stalinist novella, which was confiscated in Germany by Allied troops.
^ George Orwell
A William Faulkner
B Erich Maria Remarque
C George Orwell
D Boris Pasternak

#Q What novel by Vladimir Nabokov was banned for obscenity in England, Argentina, New Zealand and South Africa?
^ Lolita
A Lolita
B Lips to Lips
C Fanny Hill or Memoirs of a Woman of Pleasure
D Terra Incognita

#Q This book, published in 1988, was banned in Bangladesh, India, Singapore and Iran for blasphemous references and its author Salman Rushdie was condemned to death by former Iranian supreme leader Ayatollah Ruhollah Khomeini.
^ The Satanic Verses
A Midnights Children
B The Satanic Verses
C Shame
D East, West

#Q Who is the author of the book My Struggle (Mein Kampf) which was banned due to anti-Nazi laws?
^ Adolph Hitler
A Hermann Esser
B Joseph Goebbels
C Adolph Hitler
D Benito Mussolini

#Q Which of these books by Henry Miller was banned in the US in the 1930s due to sexually explicit content?
^ All of these
A Black Spring
B All of these
C Tropic of Cancer
D Tropic of Capricorn

#Q This novel, which follows the adventures of junkie William Lee, was banned by Boston courts in 1962.
^ Naked Lunch
A Naked Lunch
B The Cat Inside
C Interzone
D On the Road

#Q What classic satirical novel by Jonathan Swift was banned in Ireland for being wicked and obscene?
^ Gullivers Travels
A A Journal to Stella
B A Modest Proposal
C Gullivers Travels
D Robinson Crusoe

#Q What Pulitzer Prize-winning novel, set during the Great Depression, was banned in some US States for vulgar language?
^ The Grapes of Wrath
A The Call of the Wild
B The Grapes of Wrath
C As I Lay Dying
D The Sound and the Fury

#Q What 2003 best-selling novel by Dan Brown was denounced by Roman Catholics for being anti-Christian?
^ The Da Vinci Code
A Foucaults Pendulum
B The Solomon Key
C Digital Fortress
D The Da Vinci Code

#Q What novel opens with this sentence: I was born in the year 1632 in the city of York, of a good  family thou not of that country, my father being from Bremen, who settled first at Hill.?
^ Robinson Crusoe
A A Tale of Two Cities
B Kidnapped
C The Count of Monte Cristo
D Robinson Crusoe

#Q Last night I dreamt I went to Manderley again is the first sentence of this literary work.
^ Rebecca
A Wuthering Heights
B Emma
C Jane Eyre
D Rebecca

#Q What novel opens with this line: It was a cold day in April and the clock was striking thirteen.?
^ 1984
A Brave New World
B A Clockwork Orange
C The Time Machine
D 1984

#Q This novel opens with the following sentence: You may rejoice to hear that a disaster has accompanied the commencement of an enterprise which you have regarded with such evil foreboding..
^ Frankenstein
A Fahrenheit  451
B Dracula
C The Time Machine
D Frankenstein

#Q To begin at the beginning: It is spring, moonless night in the small town is the opening of this literary work.
^ Under Milk Wood
A Of Mice and Men
B Under Milk Wood
C The Road Not Taken
D The Inferno

#Q You better not tell nobody  but God is the beginning of this novel.
^ The Color Purple
A Gone with the Wind
B The Da Vinci Code
C The Color Purple
D To Kill a Mockingbird

#Q This novel opens with the question Who is John Galt?.
^ Atlas Shrugged
A The Bridges of Madison County
B Atlas Shrugged
C The Metamorphosis
D The Da Vinci Code

#Q All this happened, more or less is the first sentence of this book.
^ Slaughterhouse  Five
A Stalag 17
B Slaughterhouse  Five
C Little Big Man
D The Devils Advocate

#Q Mother died today is the opening of this novel.
^ The Stranger
A Mother Courage and Her Children
B Animal Farm
C The Stranger
D No Exit

#Q Which literary work opens with this line: To be born again, sang Gibreel Farishta tumbling from the heavens, first you have to die.?
^ Satanic Verses
A The Arabian Nights
B The Metamorphosis
C Satanic Verses
D The  1001 Arabian Nights

#Q Finish this quote by Oscar Wilde: Education is an admirable thing ........................
^ but it is well to remember from time to time that nothing that is worth knowing can be taught
A but it is well to remember that it is useless
B but it is well to remember from time to time that nothing that is worth knowing can be taught
C but it is well to remember that it is not for the faint of heart
D but it is well to remember that it requires much energy

#Q A speaker who had a huge opinion of himself gave a long and boring speech after dinner. And then made the mistake of turning to Oscar Wilde, and asking him, How would you have delivered that speech? . What was Oscar Wildes reply?
^ Under an assumed name
A In a dress
B Parcel post
C Under an assumed name
D I wouldnt have

#Q Finish this statement made by Oscar Wilde: America is the only country that went from barbarism to decadence without .............................
^ civilization in between
A shame
B missing a stride
C civilization in between
D looking back

#Q Finish this witty remark made by playwright Oscar Wilde: We are all in the gutter, but some of us ............
^ are looking at the stars
A make the best of it
B are looking at the stars
C are gutter rats
D claw our way out

#Q How does this Oscar Wilde quote end: My wallpaper and I are fighting a duel to the death. ................................ ?
^ One or other of us has got to go
A I will shred it off the walls if I have to
B One or other of us has got to go
C I have counted every flower twice
D One or the other will win the battle

#Q Finish this quote by Oscar Wilde: Anyone who lives within their means suffers from ...................................
^ a lack of imagination
A a lack of friends with money
B a lack of debtors
C a lack of imagination
D a lack of wealthy family members

#Q Finish this line from Oscar Wildes play The Importance of Being Earnest: To lose one parent, Mr Worthing, may be regarded as a misfortune; to lose both ................................
^ looks like carelessness
A is fortunate
B is foolish
C looks like abandonment
D looks like carelessness

#Q Complete this Oscar Wilde quote: We have really everything in common with America nowadays except, of course ..........................
^ language
A language
B class
C the meaning of chips
D they are barbarians

#Q Complete this quote by Oscar Wilde: But what is the difference between literature and journalism?........................................
^ Journalism is unreadable and literature is not read. That is all.
A Literature is art and journalism is rubbish. That is all.
B Journalism is unreadable and literature is not read. That is all.
C Journalism is an account of facts and literature is fiction. That is all.
D Literature is the only thing worth reading. That is all.

#Q Complete this remark made by Irish author Oscar Wilde: There are only two kinds of people who are really fascinating ..................
^ people who know absolutely everything, and people who know absolutely nothing.
A people who owe you money, and people you avoid
B people who know absolutely everything, and people who know absolutely nothing.
C people with a thirst for knowledge, and idiots
D people who care, and people who dont give a damn

#Q The protagonist of this Shakespearean tragedy is a Moor in the service of the Republic of Venice.
^ Othello
A King Lear
B Macbeth
C Othello
D Hamlet

#Q This tragedy, often referred to as The Scottish Play, opens with the appearance of three witches amid thunder and lightning.
^ Macbeth
A Anthony and Cleopatra
B The Tempest
C Macbeth
D King Lear

#Q What Shakespeare play opens with a street brawl in Verona between the servants of two feuding noble families?
^ Romeo and Juliet
A The Taming of the Shrew
B The Two Gentlemen of Verona
C Romeo and Juliet
D The Two Noble Kinsmen

#Q This history play by Shakespeare, focusing on a kings Machiavellian rise to power and subsequent reign of terror, contains the following exchange:
No beast so fierce but knows some touch of pity. 
But I know none, and therefore am no beast.
^ Richard III
A King John
B Julius Caesar
C Henry V
D Richard III

#Q What Shakespearean tragedy, set in Denmark, explores the themes of treachery and revenge?
^ Hamlet
A Hamlet
B Winters Tale
C Romeo and Juliet
D Othello

#Q This comedy by Shakespeare, characterized by a lot of mix-ups and witty dialogue, involves two sets of identical twins.
^ The Comedy of Errors
A As You Like It
B Taming of the Shrew
C The Comedy of Errors
D The Merchant of Venice

#Q One of the major themes of this romantic comedy, incorporating mythological elements, is summed up in Lysanders comment, “The course of true love never did run smooth”.
^ A Midsummer Nights Dream
A The Tempest
B Twelfth Night
C Much Ado About Nothing
D A Midsummer Nights Dream

#Q Shakespeares history play Henry V depicts events occurring immediately before and after the Battle of Agincourt. During which war was this battle fought?
^ the Hundred Years War
A the Austro-Hungarian War
B the Prussian War
C the Hundred Years War
D the War of the Rough Wooing

#Q This pastoral comedy contains one of Shakespeares most quoted monologues, which opens with the lines, All the worlds a stage,
And all the men and women merely players.
^ As You Like It
A The Winters Tale
B A Midsummer Nights Dream
C As You Like It
D The Merry Wives of Windsor

#Q What Shakespearean play features a character who possesses magical powers?
^ The Tempest
A Hamlet
B The Tempest
C Othello
D Richard III

#Q In the novel Pride and Prejudice, how many daughters do Mr. and Mrs. Bennet have?
^ five
A four
B five
C six
D three

#Q Who does Lydia run away with in Jane Austins book Pride and Prejudice?
^ Wickham
A Bingley
B Wickham
C Darcy
D Forster

#Q How many marriage proposals does Elizabeth receive in the book Pride and Prejudice?
^ 3
A 1
B 4
C 3
D 2

#Q Which of these characters from the novel Pride and Prejudice is Elizabeth Bennets neighbour and friend?
^ Charlotte Lucas
A Mrs. Hurst
B Miss Bingley
C Mrs. Gardner
D Charlotte Lucas

#Q Which sister has an uncontrollable cough in the beginning of the novel Pride and Prejudice?
^ Katherine
A Lydia
B Elizabeth
C Mary
D Katherine

#Q Which Bennet sister loves to exhibit her talent at parties according to the novel Pride and Prejudice?
^ Mary
A Katherine
B Lydia
C Jane
D Mary

#Q Which of these professions has Mr. Wickham not tried in the book Pride and Prejudice?
^ Groundskeeper
A Law
B Clergy
C Military
D Groundskeeper

#Q In the book Pride and Prejudice, Mr. Wickham has his wife write a letter to Elizabeth asking for money.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q What is the real name of the American author and humorist whose nickname was a common riverboat phrase, meaning the water is two fathoms?
^ Samuel Clemens
A Theodore Geisel
B Eric Blair
C Samuel Clemens
D William Porter

#Q What was the pen name of Eric Blair, the author of the novel Animal Farm, which satirizes totalitarian government and human stupidity?
^ George Orwell
A Lewis Carroll
B George Orwell
C Daniel Defoe
D O. Henry

#Q This Polish-born novelist, whose surname was Korzeniowski, wrote the influential work Heart of Darkness that inspired the movie Apocalypse Now.
^ Joseph Conrad
A George Eliot
B George Orwell
C Ayn Rand
D Joseph Conrad

#Q Which of these is not the pen name of a female author?
^ Saki
A George Sand
B Saki
C Carson McCullers
D George Eliot

#Q What prominent Victorian author began his career writing humorous sketches for The Morning Chronicle, using the pen-name Boz?
^ Charles Dickens
A D. H. Lawrence
B Charles Dickens
C Thomas Hardy
D Oscar Wilde

#Q How were the authors, writing under the pen names Ellis Bell, Acton Bell and Currer Bell, related?
^ They were sisters.
A They were sisters.
B It was the same person.
C They were brothers.
D They were not related.

#Q Which of these is both the name of a fictional character and a pseudonym used by two co-writers of detective fiction?
^ Ellery Queen
A Mary Westmacott
B Jack Higgins
C Ellery Queen
D Rosamund Smith

#Q Which of the following is one of the six novels by Agatha Christie, written under the pen name Mary Westmacott?
^ Absent in the Spring
A Murder on the Orient Express
B The Body in the Library
C Absent in the Spring
D Death on the Nile

#Q What is the pen name of the Russian-born American novelist known for her best-selling novels The Fountainhead and Atlas Shrugged?
^ Ayn Rand
A Ayn Rand
B Edith Van Dyne
C Pearl S Buck
D Silence Dogood

#Q Which of these is a pseudonym used by Theodor Geisel, the iconic American author of over 60 childrens books including Green Eggs and Ham and The Cat in the Hat?
^ All of these
A All of these
B Rosetta Stone
C Theo. LeSieg
D Dr. Seuss

#Q Finish this popular thought by Mark Twain: Compliments embarass me - I always feel that they...
^ havent said enough.
A make me feel old and too revered.
B praise me insincerely.
C havent said enough.
D give me too much credit for things other people have done.

#Q Which is the correct ending of this quotation by Mark Twain: A classic is something everybody wants to have read and...?
^ nobody wants to read.
A everybody easily understands.
B nobody wants to read.
C nobody has ever willingly read.
D everybody should have already read.

#Q FInish the popular quote by Mark Twain: ...each place has its advantages - heaven for climate and hell for...
^ society.
A seeing ones enemies.
B punishment.
C pleasure.
D society.

#Q What is the correct answer to the following question according to writer an humorist Mark Twain: What’s the difference between a taxidermist and a tax collector?
^ The taxidemist only takes your skin.
A The taxidemist only takes your skin.
B The tax collector is an elected official.
C There is no difference. They both skin you.
D The tax collector has no warm blood.

#Q Finish this humors remark by Mark Twain: The report of my death was...
^ an exaggeration.
A an exaggeration.
B based on rumor and hearsay.
C a bit premature.
D only wishful thinking.

#Q What is the correct ending of the following quote by Mark Twain: Always obey your parents - especially when...?
^ they are present.
A they are in striking distance.
B they are still alive.
C they are present.
D they are younger than you.

#Q Finish this popular thought by humorist and author Mark Twain:Always do right. This will gratify some people and...
^ astonish the rest.
A be an example to others.
B get you into heaven.
C shock the world.
D astonish the rest.

#Q How does this thought by Mark Twain end: Man is the only religious animal. He is the only animal that has the True Religion--?
^ several of them.
A several of them.
B a guilty conscience.
C money.
D and endlessly betrays it.

#Q What is the correct ending of the following thought by Mark Twain: Everybody talks about the weather, but...?
^ no one does anything about it.
A thats all they do...talk.
B no one understands it.
C the weather doesnt really care.
D no one does anything about it.

#Q How does this thought by Mark Twain end: To be good is noble; but to show others how to be good is nobler and...?
^ is no trouble.
A is no trouble.
B saintly.
C practically impossible.
D more rewarding.

#Q Agatha Christie wrote romances under the name Mary Westmacott.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Agatha Christie has been called by the Guinness Book of World Records the 2nd best-selling author of all time.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Three authors were said to have influenced Agatha Christie. Which of these is not one of them?
^ Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
A Anna Katherine Green
B Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
C Sir Arthur Conan Doyle
D Edgar Allen Poe

#Q In 1979, this actress played the part of Agatha Christie in the film Agatha.
^ Vanessa Redgrave
A Caroline Sullivan
B Vanessa Redgrave
C Lynn Redgrave
D Katherine Hepburn

#Q Agatha Christie died in 1985 at the age of 76.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q What was the occupation of Agatha Christies second husband?
^ archaeologist
A naval engineer
B archaeologist
C playwright
D physician

#Q Which detective novel by Agatha Christie introduced Miss Marple to readers?
^ The Murder at the Vicarage
A The Murder at the Vicarage
B Death On The Nile
C Murder on The Orient Express
D And Then There Were None

#Q Agatha Christie met her second husband at a theatre entrance in London, England.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Agatha Christies birth name was Mary Katherine Francis.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q What romantic period author created the Byronic hero, Heathcliff?
^ Emily Bronte
A Lord Byron
B Emily Bronte
C Charlotte Bronte
D Victor Hugo

#Q Who wrote the play, The Jew of Malta?
^ Marlowe
A Shakespeare
B Marlowe
C Gardner
D Jonson

#Q Name the Faulknerian character from As I Lay Dying who states the following: My mother is a fish.
^ Vardaman
A Darl
B Jewel
C Anse
D Vardaman

#Q Kurt Vonnegut created the character Billy Pilgrim in his novel Breakfast of Champions.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Which modern author created the character Ari Ben Canaan?
^ Leon Uris
A Saul Bellow
B Albert Camus
C Leon Uris
D Chaim Potok

#Q Which Shakespearean tragic hero had a run in with cannibals?
^ Othello
A Othello
B Julius Caesar
C Pericles
D Hamlet

#Q Which Faulknerian character confuses his mother with a horse?
^ Jewel
A Cash
B Darl
C Vardaman
D Jewel

#Q Which of these is an innocent and ignorant protagonist created by Dostoevsky?
^ Mischkin
A Forrest Gump
B Mischkin
C Boo Radley
D Lenny

#Q Which philosopher-writer created a character who later renames himself to Prometheus?
^ Ayn Rand
A Nietzche
B Ayn Rand
C Albert Camus
D Voltaire

#Q In which of William Shakespeares tragedies does a minor character disappear in Act III with no explanation given?
^ King Lear
A King Lear
B Macbeth
C Othello
D Hamlet

#Q Which author created a series about a teenager who discovers he is a wizard and goes to Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry?
^ J. K. Rowling
A J. K. Rowling
B James Patterson
C Jules Verne
D J. R. R. Tolkien

#Q Which of the following movies is a remake of a 1954 Japanese movie?
^ The Magnificent Seven
A The Seventh Sign
B Se7en
C The Magnificent Seven
D Seven Sinners

#Q Which of these is not one of the seven dwarfs in Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs, the first American animated feature film?
^ Sleazy
A Dopey
B Doc
C Sleazy
D Happy

#Q The author of the autobiographical account Seven Pillars of Wisdom is popularly known by this name.
^ Lawrence of Arabia
A Lawrence of Arabia
B Robin of Loksley
C J. R. Tolkien
D Dalai Lama

#Q The movie The Seven Year Itch contains the iconic scene, in which Marilyn Monroe has her dress blown up by a passing train. What line does she deliver when this happens?
^ Isnt it delicious?
A Isnt it too windy?
B Isnt this sweet?
C Isnt it fantastic?
D Isnt it delicious?

#Q What book in the popular Harry Potter series contains a chapter titled The Seven Potters?
^ Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
A Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
B Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
C Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince
D Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets

#Q Jean-Jacques Annauds movie Seven Years in Tibet is based on the experiences of Austrian mountaineer Heinrich Harrer, who befriends the Tibetan spiritual leader, known as the Dalai Lama. The word lama is generally translated as guro or teacher. What does the word dalai mean in Mongolian?
^ ocean
A ocean
B mighty
C wise
D spirit

#Q This 1990s song, which is supposed to describe apocalyptic events, ends with the line one day all 7 will die.
^ 7
A 7
B 7 Shades of Black
C Seventh Heaven
D Love Is the Seventh Wave

#Q In the crime thriller Se7en, that deals with a series of murders inspired by the seven deadly sins, Joe Doe, the murderer, admits that he, himself, is guilty of this sin.
^ envy
A wrath
B none of these
C envy
D pride

#Q What bands 7th studio album was titled Seventh Son of a Seventh Son?
^ Iron Maiden
A The Rolling Stones
B Judas Priest
C Iron Maiden
D Led Zeppelin

#Q In the Seinfeld episode The Seven, this character revealed that he wanted to name his first child Seven.
^ George Costanza
A George Costanza
B George Steinbrenner
C Jerry Seinfeld
D Cosmo Kramer

#Q Fannie Flag wrote this 1991 Academy Award-nominated movie, starring Kathy Bates and Jessica Tandy, which was based on her best selling-novel written 4 years earlier.
^ Fried Green Tomatoes
A Misery
B Scent of a Woman
C Driving Miss Daisy
D Fried Green Tomatoes

#Q Based on a Pulitzer prize winning novel by Michael Cunningham this 2002 movie featured Nicole Kidman and Julianne Moore.
^ The Hours
A Home at the End of the World
B The Others
C The Hours
D Mrs Dalloway

#Q This film directed by Taylor Hackford was based on a novel by Andrew Neiderman and featured Keanu Reeves and Charlize Theron.
^ The Devils Advocate
A The Devils Advocate
B Sweet November
C Monster
D The Long Walk Home

#Q This 1999 film, based on the novel The Positronic Man, was co-written by Isaac Asimov and Robert Silverberg and starred Robin Williams. It was nominated for Academy award for best make-up.
^ Bicentennial Man
A S1m0ne
B Bicentennial Man
C A.I.: Artificial Intelligence
D I, Robot

#Q This remake of a Dino Risi film from 1974 was based on the Italian novel Il buio e il miele (Darkness and Honey) by Giovanni Arpino, starred Al Pacino and was nominated for four Academy awards, winning one of them.
^ Scent of a Woman
A The Godfather: Part III
B Carlitos Way
C Scent of a Woman
D The Devils Advocate

#Q This 1994 film, nominated for four Academy Awards and directed and produced by Robert Redford was based on Richard Goodwins book Remembering America: A Voice From the Sixties.
^ Quiz Show
A Promised Land
B Quiz Show
C Ordinary People
D Accelerating America

#Q The biography of Nobel prize winning economist and mathematician John Nash, written by Sylvia Nasar, inspired this 2001 movie directed by Ron Howard, which was nominated for 8 Academy awards and won four of them.
^ Beautiful Mind
A Higher Learning
B Beautiful Mind
C The Missing
D Cinderella Man

#Q This 1990 film featuring Harrison Ford and Brian Dennehy was an adaptation of the Scott Turows novel of the same name about of a prosecutor charged with the murder of his female colleague.
^ Presumed Innocent
A Presumed Innocent
B The Burden of Proof
C The Pelican Brief
D The Fugitive

#Q Based on a 1983 book by Dick King-Smith, this 1995 Australian film directed by Chris Noonan was nominated for seven Academy Awards.
^ Babe
A Shine
B Sophie
C Crocodile Dundee
D Babe

#Q This 1997 science fiction movie directed by Robert Zemeckis was adapted from Carl Sagans novel of the same title.
^ Contact
A Cosmos
B Back to the Future
C Contact
D A.I.: Artificial Intelligence

#Q This authors Pulitzer Prize-winning novel American Pastoral and his 1969 bestseller Portnoys Complaint were both included in Time magazines 100 Best Novels list.
^ Philip Roth
A Philip Roth
B Jack Kerouac
C John Fowles
D Joseph Heller

#Q This novel by Theodore Dreiser, included in Time magazines 100 Best Novels list, tells the story of a young man, Clyde Griffiths and deals with subjects such as religion, abortion and capital punishment.
^ An American Tragedy
A The Stoic
B An American Tragedy
C Death Comes for the Archbishop
D Midnights Children

#Q This Pulitzer Prize-winning novel, set in the fictional tired old town of Maycomb, Alabama, is narrated by six-year-old Scout Finch.
^ To Kill a Mockingbird
A The Prime of Miss Jean Brodie
B To Kill a Mockingbird
C To the Lighthouse
D The Sound and the Fury

#Q This British authors novels Brideshead Revisited and A Handful of Dust both appeared on the list of Time magazines list of 100 Greatest Novels.
^ Evelyn Waugh
A Ian McEwan
B Evelyn Waugh
C Martin Amis
D Salman Rushdie

#Q What allegorical novel, included on Time magazines 100 Greatest Novels list, follows a group of young boys marooned on a desert tropical island?
^ Lord of the Flies
A Native Son
B The Lord of the Rings
C American Pastoral
D Lord of the Flies

#Q This novel by Jack Kerouac, regarded as the defining work of the Beat Generation, is based on the spontaneous trips made by the author and his friends.
^ On the Road
A Naked Lunch
B A Passage to India
C On the Road
D Midnights Children

#Q Midnights Children, one of the books on Time magazines list of 100 Greatest Novels, was written by this author, who was sentenced to death following the publication of one of his literary works.
^ Salman Rushdie
A J.D. Salinger
B Kazuo Ishiguro
C Salman Rushdie
D Zadie Smith

#Q Which of the following acknowledged literary works was left out of the list of 100 Best English-language Novels, published in Time magazine in 2006?
^ all of these
A War and Peace
B Moby Dick
C all of these
D The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn

#Q What novel on Time magazines Best Novels list follows Holden Caulfield, a character that has come to be associated with teenage angst and rebellion?
^ The Catcher in the Rye
A The Moviegoer
B The Blind Assassin
C A Clockwork Orange
D The Catcher in the Rye

#Q What fantasy novel, focusing on the adventures of the Pevensie siblings and set approximately in 1940, appeared on Time magazines 100 Best English-language Novels?
^ The Lion, the Witch and the Wardrobe
A The Lion, the Witch and the Wardrobe
B The Painted Bird
C The Lord of the Rings
D The Chronicles of Prydain

#Q What 18th century English writer depicted Man Friday, whose name has become an expression used to describe a loyal male personal assistant?
^ Daniel Defoe
A Daniel Defoe
B Robert Louis Stephenson
C Johnathan Swift
D Sir Walter Scott

#Q A neurological condition, characterised by altered perceptions of body image and visual illusions, was named after this character from childrens literature.
^ Alice in Wonderland
A Pinocchio
B Peter Pan
C Alice in Wonderland
D Peter Rabbit

#Q This economic term, derived from the name of a folklore hero, refers to income redistribution.
^ Robin Hood effect
A Robin Hood effect
B King Arthur effect
C Sir Galahad effect
D Sir Lancelot effect

#Q Which of these eponyms, derived from Jonathan Swifts novel Gullivers Travels, means a crude person, lacking in intelligence?
^ yahoo
A lilliputian
B struldbrug
C brobdingnagian
D yahoo

#Q Which of these eponyms, derived from the name of a character created by Charles Dickens, is not correctly matched with its definition?
^ Pickwickian - haughty, conceited
A Scrooge - a stingy, miserly person
B Pickwickian - haughty, conceited
C Gradgrind - a person interested only in cold facts
D Fagin - an adult who instructs children in crime

#Q What Nobel Prize-winning author depicted fictional character George F. Babbitt, whose surname has become synonymous with a business or professional man who conforms unthinkingly to dominant middle-class standards?
^ Sinclair Lewis
A William Faulkner
B SAUL BELLOW
C John Steinbeck
D Sinclair Lewis

#Q This authors best-selling novel brought the term Pollyana into the English language to describe an illogically and blindly optimistic person.
^ Eleanor H. Porter
A Harper Lee
B Louisa May Alcott
C Laura Ingalls Wilder
D Eleanor H. Porter

#Q The adjective Falstaffian, meaning jovial and with zest for life, is derived from the name of the fat knight Sir John Falstaff, who is featured in this Shakespearean comedy.
^ The Merry Wives of Windsor
A The Taming of the Shrew
B The Merchant of Venice
C The Merry Wives of Windsor
D The Comedy of Errors

#Q What is the definition of the term dogberrysm, which is derived from Shakespeares play Much Ado About Nothing?
^ the unintentional misuse of a word by confusion with one of similar sound, usually creating a comic effect
A a seemingly small but actually crucial weakness
B trickery or deception
C striving for power at the price of spiritual values
D the unintentional misuse of a word by confusion with one of similar sound, usually creating a comic effect

#Q Tartuffe, whose name has come to mean a hypocrite, especially one who affects religious piety, is the protagonist of a comedy by this playwright.
^ Molière
A Eugène Ionesco
B Molière
C Samuel Beckett
D Cyrano de Bergerac

#Q Earnest Hemingway was born in 1899 in a Chicago suburb, and later attended this high school.
^ Oak Park and River Forest High School
A Fenwick High School
B Oak Park and River Forest High School
C Carl Rogers High School
D Cook County High School

#Q At the age of seventeen Ernest Hemingway began working as a reporter for The Kansas City Star, where he remained for how long?
^ six months
A one year
B six months
C tree years
D one month

#Q On what date was Ernest Hemingway wounded, while performing his duties as a WW I ambulance driver?
^ July 8, 1918
A July 9, 1918
B July 8, 1918
C May 6, 1916
D June 8, 1916

#Q In 1920 Ernest Hemingway accepted a job at this Canadian newspaper, where he met Morley Callaghan.
^ The Toronto Star
A The Ottawa Sun
B The Calgary Sun
C The Quebec Star
D The Toronto Star

#Q In Our Time was first published in 1925 and marked Hemingways American debut.  Which of the following short story titles is not part of this collection?
^ The Killers
A Indian Camp
B The Battler
C The Killers
D Out of Season

#Q In his 1940 novel For Whom the Bell Tolls, Ernest Hemingway tells the story of Robert Jordan, a U.S. guerrilla warrior serving in the Spanish Civil War. who is given the assignment to blow up a bridge near what Spanish city?
^ Segovia
A Segovia
B Valencia
C Madrid
D Barcelona

#Q What Ernest Hemingway novel was published in 1950, following For Whom the Bell Tolls?
^ Across the River and Into the Trees
A Across the River and Into the Trees
B The Sea When Young
C The Garden of Eden
D The Old Mean and the Sea

#Q The Old Man and the Sea brought Ernest Hemingway enormous success and earned him the Noble Prize in Literature in what year?
^ 1954
A 1953
B 1960
C 1954
D 1952

#Q This Ernest Hemingway book, published posthumously, tells the story of a bullfighter named Antonio Ordonez.
^ The Dangerous Summer
A Under Kilimanjaro
B A Movable Feast
C The Dangerous Summer
D Islands in the Stream

#Q Ernest Hemingway belonged to this group of expatriate American writers, who lived in Paris from the end of World War I till the beginning of the Great Depression.
^ The Lost Generation
A The Lost Generation
B The G.I. Generation
C The Greatest Generation
D The Missionary Generation

#Q The novel One Hundred Years of Solitude, written by Nobel Prize-winning author Gabriel García Márquez, was first published in Spanish. What nationality is Márquez?
^ Colombian
A Mexican
B Colombian
C Chilean
D Brazilian

#Q What dystopian novel is set in Oceania, an intercontinental super-state ruled by an enigmatic dictator?
^ Nineteen Eighty-Four
A Nine Tomorrows
B Fahrenheit 451
C Nineteen Eighty-Four
D Twenty Thousand Leagues Under the Sea

#Q Name the author of the 19th century novels A Captain at Fifteen, Around the World in 80 Days and Twenty Thousand Leagues Under the Sea.
^ Jules Verne
A Jules Verne
B Arthur C. Clarke
C Ray Bradbury
D Isaac Asimov

#Q Which of the following novels by Agatha Christie features Belgian detective Hercule Poirot?
^ All of these
A Five Little Pigs
B Murder in Three Acts
C All of these
D One, Two, Buckle My Shoe

#Q This post-World War II satirist wrote a popular anti-war novel, whose title has become a commonly used idiomatic phrase, referring to a a no-win situation or a double bind.
^ Joseph Heller
A Kurt Vonnegut
B Ray Bradbury
C George Orwell
D Joseph Heller

#Q Which one of the main characters, depicted by Alexandre Dumas in The Three Musketeers, has a mysterious past connecting him  with Milady de Winter, the female antagonist of the novel?
^ Athos
A dArtagnan
B Athos
C Portos
D Aramis

#Q The title of Ken Keseys novel One Flew Over the Cuckoos Nest is derived from which of the following?
^ a nursery rhyme
A a country ballad
B a nursery rhyme
C a Shakespearean play
D a short story by a friend of Keseys

#Q What post-modern novel, following the experiences of Billy Pilgrim, contains the prayer, God grant me the serenity to accept the things I cannot change, the courage to change the things that I can, and the wisdom to know the difference”?
^ Slaughterhouse-Five
A Slaughterhouse-Five
B Fahrenheit 451
C Catch-22
D Nineteen Nineteen

#Q What is the name of the fictional submarine, commanded by Captain Nemo, in the novel Twenty Thousand Leagues Under the Sea?
^ Nautilus
A Gotengo
B Thundersub
C Nautilus
D Subatilus

#Q What does the number 451 in the title of Ray Bradburys novel Fahrenheit 451 refer to?
^ the temperature at which books burn
A the temperature at which forests will burn
B the temperature required to melt glass
C None of these
D the temperature at which books burn

#Q This novel by Nevil Shute is set in the future after WWIII. Due to the nuclear fallout, only land in the southern hemisphere is inhabitable.
^ On the Beach
A The Rainbow and the Rose
B On the Beach
C Ruined City
D The Shadowlands

#Q In 1946 this author received the Nobel Prize in Literature. He was born in Württemberg, Germany to a Christian missionary family that worked in India. He is best known for his novel Steppenwolf.
^ Hermann Hesse
A Theodor Mommsen
B Heinrich Böll
C Hermann Hesse
D John Kay

#Q Author Gabriel García Márquez stresses in this 1985 novel that love-sickness is a literal disease causing pain and other physical symptoms.
^ Love in the Time of Cholera
A Love in the Time of Cholera
B Of Love and Other Demons
C Walking with Liberty
D One Hundred Years of Solitude

#Q Originally written in French, this 1949 Samuel Beckett play is about Vladimir and Estragon who expect a man, they barely know, to arrive.
^ Waiting for Godot
A Imaginary Friends
B A Portrait of the Artist as a Young Man
C Endgame
D Waiting for Godot

#Q Published in 1963, The Bell Jar is this poets only novel. It was published under the pseudonym Victoria Lucas.
^ Sylvia Plath
A Esther Greenwood
B Sylvia Plath
C Assia Wevill
D W. D. Snodgrass

#Q In Nathanial Hawthornes The House of the Seven Gables, the destitute Hepzibah Pyncheon lives in the house and supports her brother, Clifford, who has just been released from jail. Why was he in jail?
^ Murder
A Murder
B Burglary
C Kidnapping
D Adultary

#Q This 1857 collection of poems by Charles Baudelaire caused him to be convicted in France of offending the morals of the time, resulting in fines and the banning of 6 of the poems.
^ The Flowers of Evil
A Confessions of an English Opium-Eater
B The Flowers of Evil
C To the Reader
D Artificial Paradises

#Q Who wrote the poem Childe Roland to the Dark Tower Came that inspired Stephen King to write the first novel in The Drak Tower series?
^ Robert Browning
A Robert Browning
B William Shakespeare
C Bram Stoker
D WB Yeats

#Q Stephen Kings novel The Gunslinger was written in five parts and published individually in which of the following?
^ The Magazine of Fantasy and Science Fiction
A Weird Tales
B Playboy
C Realms of Fantasy
D The Magazine of Fantasy and Science Fiction

#Q How long did it take Stephen King to complete the novel The Dark Tower I: The Gunslinger?
^ 12 years
A 5 years
B 12 years
C 3 years
D 10 years

#Q How does the book The Gunslinger by Stephen King begin?
^ The man in black fled across the desert, and the gunslinger followed.
A The Tower was the first thing Roland thought of when he woke and the last he thought of before sleep.
B The man in black fled across the desert, and the gunslinger followed.
C The gunslinger sighted, cocked the pistol and prepared to kill the man in black.
D Roland looked up, the man in black was silhouetted against the sun.

#Q In a saloon, the gunslinger from Stephen Kings self-titled novel hears a crowd singing what tune that is well known in our world?
^ Hey Jude
A Rock Around the Clock
B Oh My Darlin Clementine
C Gimme Shelter
D Hey Jude

#Q In the Novel The Gunslinger, the gunslinger meets a boy called Jake. What is Jakes actual name?
^ John Chambers
A Jack Mort
B John Chambers
C Jake Delgado
D Juan Derer

#Q What are Jakes final words to Roland in the novel The Gunslinger?
^ Go then, there are other worlds than these.
A How come I cant have a gun?
B Well met, Sir
C I have forgotten the face of my father
D Go then, there are other worlds than these.

#Q In the book The Gunslinger, a gas-pump is found in a tunnel under a mountain and is worshipped as a god. What is the gods name?
^ Amoco
A Amoco
B Texaco
C Opec
D Elf

#Q Where does Roland first meet Jake in the novel The Gunslinger?
^ An abandoned way station
A An abandoned diner
B An abandoned hospital
C An abandoned way station
D An abandoned railway station

#Q When Stephen King began to write The Gunslinger, he typed it on bright green paper.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q What was Mark Twains birth name?
^ Samuel L. Clemens
A Booth Tarkington
B Samuel Rogers Clinton
C George F. Scott Harrison
D Samuel L. Clemens

#Q Where was Mark Twain born and where did he die?
^ Missouri and Connecticut
A Connecticut and Missouri
B Missouri and Connecticut
C Missouri and Mississippi
D Mississippi and Connecticut

#Q What was the name of Mark Twains wife?
^ Olivia
A Amelia
B Josephine
C Olivia
D Amy

#Q At the height of his popularity, Mark Twain built one of the oddest and most elaborate homes at that time.  In which eastern city was ythe nineteen-room mansion built?
^ Hartford, Connecticut
A Hartford, Connecticut
B Elmira, New York
C Boston, Massachusetts
D Newport, Rhode Island

#Q It is generally accepted that the Mark Twain House was designed to resemble which of these?
^ a Mississippi riverboat
A a tower
B a medieval castle
C a Gothic cathedral
D a Mississippi riverboat

#Q How many children did Mark Twain and his wife have?
^ 3 daughters and one son
A 3 daughters and one son
B 4 sons
C 2 sons and 2 daughters
D 5 daughters

#Q How many of Mark Twains children outlived him?
^ one
A three
B one
C none
D two

#Q What was Mark Twains opinion about slavery?
^ He was adamantly against it.
A Being a southerner, he saw no evil in it.
B He believed it was a necessary evil
C He kept his true feelings on the subject to himself.
D He was adamantly against it.

#Q What were Mark Twains favourite animals?
^ Cats
A Horses
B Cats
C Birds
D Dogs

#Q Mark Twain made several costly investment mistakes in his lifetime, and even had to declare bankruptcy.  What was the invention in which he refused to invest?
^ The Telephone
A The automobile
B Gold mining in California
C The Paige typesetting machine
D The Telephone

#Q What spell summons an item to the spell caster in the Harry Potter books?
^ Accio
A Anapneo
B Accio
C Aguamenti
D Aparecium

#Q Which spell is used in the Harry Potter novels to unlock a door?
^ Alohomora
A Avada Kedavra
B Homenum Revelio
C Avis
D Alohomora

#Q This charm helps some Harry Potter characters to breathe underwater or just to block out a bad smell.
^ Bubble-Head Charm
A Bubble-Head Charm
B Colloportus
C Anapneo
D Aguamenti

#Q In the Harry Potter series of books, this spell places enormous pressure upon its target and blasts a hole.
^ Deprimo
A Deletrius
B Deprimo
C Defodio
D Descendo

#Q This spell from the Harry Potter books causes objects to swell in size.
^ Engorgio
A Ennervate
B Engorgio
C Growth Charm
D Enlargement Charm

#Q In the Harry Potter series of novels, this charm produces bandages and splints.
^ Ferula
A Ferula
B Tergeo
C Furnunculus
D Flesh Memory

#Q What spell is used in the Harry Potter books to produce fire?
^ Incendio
A Fire Charm
B Flagrate
C Incarcerous
D Incendio

#Q In the Harry Potter books this spell creates a beam of light.
^ Lumos
A Illumino
B Nox
C Muffliato
D Lumos

#Q This spell was used by Hermione to create an exact replica of an object.
^ Geminio
A Geminio
B The Twin curse
C Confundus Charm
D Reparo

#Q This fun little charm from the Harry Potter series produces a lovely bouquet of flowers.
^ Orchideous
A Confringo
B Densaugeo
C Petuniatum
D Orchideous

#Q Entertainment Weeklys choice for the # 1book on the List of New Classics was the story of a father and son who trudge across an ashen American landscape in the wake of  some unnamed apocalypse, fighting off sexually predatory bandits, scavenging for food, uncovering charnel-house horror but always moving forward toward some mirage of a better future. What is the name of this post-apocalyptic novel by Cormac McCarthy?
^ The Road
A There Will Be Blood
B No Country for Young Men
C The Road
D All the Pretty Horses

#Q Most writers dream of making the New York Times Best-Seller List. Which one of these books spent the most weeks on the New York Times Best-Seller List?
^ The Da Vinci Code
A The Lovely Bones
B The Da Vinci Code
C Into Thin Air
D Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire

#Q The book ranked # 9 on the Entertainment Weeklys New Classics List tells the story of a deserting Confederate soldier, Inman, and his journey back to the genteel and lovely Ada. What was the destination for the war weary and lovelorn Inman?
^ Cold Mountain
A Cold Mountain
B Bridges of Madison County
C West Point
D Cold Comfort Farm

#Q This novel, that is over 850 pages, tells the story of cowboy Gus, the strong willed prostitute, Lorena and the evil murderer and rapist, Blue Duck. What is the title of this book that describes a long, long cattle drive?
^ Lonesome Dove
A Lonesome Dove
B All the Pretty Horses
C No Country for Old Men
D New Riders of the Purple Sage

#Q Neil Gaiman, a fantasy and science fiction writer was asked to name his top 10 New Classic Monsters.  Gaimans # 8 choice was a monster found in master horror writer Steven Kings novel It. In what shape did It come to terrorize the children of Derry?
^ Pennywise, the clown
A Buick 8
B Pennywise, the clown
C Cujo
D The Walking Dude

#Q In a book that made the list of Five Memoir Shockers, which sports legend bragged that he had bedded 20,000 ladies?
^ Wilt Chamberlain
A Jim Brown
B Wilt Chamberlain
C Willie Shoemaker
D Joe Namath

#Q Which novel has the opening lines, My name was Salmon, like the fish; first name Susie. I was fourteen when I was murdered on December 6, 1963.?
^ The Lovely Bones
A All She Ever Really Wanted
B The Handmaids Tale
C The Lovely Bones
D Case Histories

#Q On May 11, 1996, eight people died while trying to reach the summit of Mt. Everest, including famed mountain guides Rob Hall and Scott Fischer. Jon Krakauer was one of the survivors. What is the name of Krakauers book that gives his first person account of the events that led to one of the deadest days ever on Mount Everest?
^ Into Thin Air
A Into Thin Air
B Climb
C Everest
D Into the Wild

#Q In 2008, EW.com asked readers for their choice for favorite author of the last 25 years. Which author
received the most votes?
^ J. K. Rowling
A Nora Roberts
B John Grisham
C J. K. Rowling
D Steven King

#Q What is the veterinarians full name in the book All Creatures Great and Small?
^ Dr. James Herriot
A Dr. James Siegfried
B Dr. Calvert James
C Dr. James Tristan
D Dr. James Herriot

#Q In the book All Creatures Great and Small, Mrs. Pumphreys dogs name is Tricki Woo.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q All Creatures Great and Small comprises James Herriots first two novels, If Only They Could Talk and It Shouldnt Happen to a Vet. What is the names of the editions in which the rest of James Herriots other books were published in the United states?
^ All Things Bright and Beautiful, and All Things Wise and Wonderful.
A All Things Clean and Dirty, and All Things Sick and Gross.
B All Things Loud and Annoying, and All Things Quite and Silent.
C All Things Technical and Universal, and All Things Large and Small.
D All Things Bright and Beautiful, and All Things Wise and Wonderful.

#Q In the book All Creatures Great and Small, which of Siegfrieds possessions does Tristan keep destroying?
^ Vehicles
A Vehicles
B Buildings
C Pig pens
D Tools

#Q In All Creatures Great and Small, James wanted to be a small animal surgeon before he became a veterinarian.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q In the book All Creatures Great and Small, what was Angus Griers way of getting all the attention for himself?
^ James would tell him that he was going to do something one way, then Grier would tell him to do it another way which would lead him doing it wrong, and then Grier did it the way James was going to at first.
A James would tell him that he was going to do something one way, then Grier would tell him to do it another way which would lead him doing it wrong, and then Grier did it the way James was going to at first.
B He treated James as a pack mule.
C James killed the animal for Grier and while the owner would go crying, Grier would get a new animal that looked exactly alike and replace it and then pretend he had revived it.
D He sacked James in front of lots of people and acted as if he were a runaway criminal.

#Q In the book All Creatures Great and Small, what was Tristans favorite type of cigarettes?
^ Woodbine
A Woodbine
B Garshaw
C Duncan
D Red Rover

#Q In All Creatures Great and Small, Mr. Worley had six pigs.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Who were William Shakespeares parents?
^ John and Mary Shakespeare
A John and Lyn Shakespeare
B John and Jane Shakespeare
C John and Mary Shakespeare
D William and Mary Shakespeare

#Q How many siblings did William Shakespeare have?
^ 7
A He had no siblings
B 7
C 3
D 1

#Q Where did William Shakespeare grow up?
^ Stratford-upon-Avon
A Bath
B London
C Stratford-upon-Avon
D Manchester

#Q What were the names of William Shakespeares three children, two of whom were twins, a boy and a girl?
^ Susanna, Hamnet and Judith
A Ophelia, Harry and Catherine
B Anne, John and Susan
C Susanna, Hamnet and Judith
D Judith, Hamlet and Juliet

#Q What was the name of Shakespeares theatre, where his acting company performed?
^ The Globe Theater
A The Theatre
B The Oscar Theater
C The Courtyard
D The Globe Theater

#Q What did Shakespeare leave to his wife Anne in his will?
^ his second best bed
A 30 pounds
B all his silver plate
C a silver bowl
D his second best bed

#Q William Shakespeare died April 23, 1616.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Which of these is not one of the many pseudonyms used by American writer Dean Koontz?
^ Chris McCarthy
A Deanna Dwyer
B Owen West
C Brian Coffey
D Chris McCarthy

#Q In what year did Dean Koontzs first novel debut?
^ 1968
A 1981
B 1972
C 1968
D 1977

#Q Dean Koontz is a confirmed bachelor.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Who is Trixie Koontz?
^ Dean Koontz dog
A Dean Koontz dog
B Dean Koontz niece
C Dean Koontz wife
D Dean Koontz pseudonym

#Q Dean Koontz has undergone hair transplant surgery.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q What is Dean Koontzs middle name?
^ Ray
A Roy
B He does not have a middle name.
C Ray
D Ron

#Q What 70s television series did Dean Koontz write an episode for?
^ CHiPs
A CHiPs
B The Love Boat
C Little House on the Prairie
D All In The Family

#Q Which of these is not one of Dean Koontzs pseudonyms?
^ Marion Marquart
A Leonard Chris
B Leigh Nichols
C Marion Marquart
D Richard Paige

#Q Is fictional character Hermione Granger made a prefect?
^ Yes
A No
B Yes

#Q Who does Hermione turn into, using the Polyjuice Potion in Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets?
^ Millicent Bullstrodes cat
A Millicent Bullstrodes cat
B She stays herself.
C Pansy Parkinson
D Ginny Weasleys dog

#Q What is the occupation of Hermiones parents in the Harry Potter books?
^ Dentists
A Dentists
B Waiter/Waitress
C Doctors
D Teachers

#Q Did Hermione punch Ron in Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban?
^ No
A No
B Yes

#Q Which of these statements is true about Hermione Granger from the Harry Potter books?
^ She was born in a muggle family.
A She has green eyes.
B She enjoys drinking the Polyjuice Potion.
C She was born in a muggle family.
D She can turn into a rabbit.

#Q Which of these statements is NOT true about Harry Potter character Hermione Granger?
^ She was named after J.K Rowlings best friend.
A Her parents are dentists.
B She was named after J.K Rowlings best friend.
C She has bushy hair.
D She passes her O.W.L.s

#Q In what book does Hermione develop a crush on Gilderoy Lockhart?
^ Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets
A Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets
B Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
C Harry Potter and the Philosophers Stone
D Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire

#Q In the poem The Rime of the Ancient Mariner, the Ancient Mariner tells his tale to a person he pulls aside from what event?
^ A wedding
A A dance
B A wedding
C A play
D A party

#Q How did the Mariners ship end up in the Antarctic Ocean in the poem The Rime of the Ancient Mariner?
^ It was blown south by a storm.
A They were exploring the Antarctic.
B The ships compass was broken.
C It was blown south by a storm.
D They were shipping supplies to Antarctica.

#Q In The Rime of the Ancient Mariner, what creature brings good luck to the ship and follows it out of the icebergs?
^ An albatross
A A dolphin
B A whale
C A seal
D An albatross

#Q What did the Ancient Mariner from The Rime of the Ancient Mariner do that cursed the crew and the ship?
^ He killed the albatross
A He ate the dolphin
B He drove the whale away
C He killed the albatross
D He wounded the seal

#Q Finish this stanza from the poem The Rime of the Ancient Mariner:
Water, water everywhere,
And all the boards did shrink,
Water, water everywhere,
____________________.
^ Nor any drop to drink.
A Nor any drop to drink.
B And then the ship did sink.
C And boy did that water stink!
D And the men were on the brink.

#Q What did the crew of the ship in The Rime of the Ancient Mariner put around the Mariners neck to shame him?
^ The albatross
A A noose
B A sign that said Kick me
C A rock tied to a rope
D The albatross

#Q What does the Mariner from The Rime of the Ancient Mariner see on the horizon that gives the crew a fleeting sense of hope?
^ Another ship
A Another whale
B Another ship
C Land
D Another albatross

#Q In the poem The Rime of the Ancient Mariner, how many men died onboard the ship when the Moon rose?
^ 200
A 1
B 200
C 75
D 150

#Q How long did the Mariner sail alone after the crew had died in The Rime of the Ancient Mariner?
^ Seven days and seven nights
A One week
B Thirteen days
C Seven days and seven nights
D A fortnight

#Q What creatures does the Mariner watch swimming in the sea beyond the shadow of the ship in The Rime of the Ancient Mariner?
^ Water snakes
A Water snakes
B Dolphins
C Whales
D Schools of fish

#Q What does the Mariner do that begins to lift the curse in the poem The Rime of the Ancient Mariner?
^ He blesses the water snakes and says a prayer.
A He swims with the whales.
B He rides on the back of a dolphin.
C He blesses the water snakes and says a prayer.
D He clicks his heels three times saying Theres no place like home!

#Q What happens after the Mariner from The Rime of the Ancient Mariner awakes after a blessed sleep?
^ A storm ravages the ship.
A A wind blows out of the East..
B A storm ravages the ship.
C He eats breakfast.
D He drinks some sea water.

#Q In the English poem The Rime of the Ancient Mariner, which dead crew member helped the Mariner pull on a rope after the crew rose from the dead?
^ The Mariners nephew
A The ships cook
B The Mariners nephew
C The captain of the ship
D The Mariners best friend

#Q In the beginning of Part 6 of The Rime of the Ancient Mariner, who is having a conversation with whom?
^ The First Voice and the Second Voice
A The mariner and the Second Voice
B The First Voice and the Second Voice
C The mariner and the ghost
D The albatross and the whale

#Q Where does the wind blow the ship after the conversation in the beginning of Part 6 of The Rime of the Ancient Mariner is over?
^ Back to the Mariners home country
A To the North Pole
B Back to the Mariners home country
C To the South Pole
D To a strange new country

#Q Who was in the boat that rowed nearer the Mariners ship in the harbor at the end of the poem The Rime of the Ancient Mariner?
^ The Pilot, his son, and the Hermit
A The Pilot and his wife
B The Pilot, by himself
C The Pilot, his daughter, and the Hermit
D The Pilot, his son, and the Hermit

#Q At the end of the poem The Rime of the Ancient Mariner, the man who the Mariner told his story to does what?
^ Goes home, and gets up the next morning wiser than before
A Goes back to the wedding
B Goes with the Mariner back to the ship
C Goes home, and gets up the next morning wiser than before
D Goes back to the party

#Q What Shakespeare historical play was being performed at the Globe Theatre in 1613 when a fire broke out from a misguided theatrical cannon shot?
^ Henry VIII
A The Tempest
B Richard II
C Henry IV Part II
D Henry VIII

#Q Sporting a male pseudonym, what female French novelist maintained a romantic relationship with Frederic Chopin from 1837-1847?
^ George Sand
A George Eliot
B George Sand
C Elizabeth Barrett Browning
D George Orwell

#Q A.A. Milne created the character of Christopher Robin as one of Winnie-the-Pooh’s best friends and based him on his real life son, Christopher Robin Milne.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Known as the “Sage of Concord”, what American Transcendentalist owned the land where Henry David Thoreau built his cabin near Walden Pond in Massachusetts?
^ Ralph Waldo Emerson
A Nathaniel Hawthorne
B Herman Melville
C Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
D Ralph Waldo Emerson

#Q What best-selling American author, born Howard Allen O’Brien, created the vampire Lestat de Lioncourt?
^ Anne Rice
A Anne Rice
B Dean Koontz
C Stephen King
D Stephenie Meyer

#Q Based on Audrey Niffenegger’s novel, this 2009 movie starring Eric Bana and Rachel McAdams chronicles a romance over time between Henry DeTamble and Clare Abshire.
^ The Time Travelers Wife
A The Time Travelers Wife
B Sunshine Cleaning
C The International
D Duplicity

#Q With characters such as Fiver, Bigwig, and General Woundwort, what Richard Adams heroic fantasy novel follows the story of a small group of rabbits?
^ Watership Down
A Lord of the Flies
B The Bureaucrats
C Watership Down
D Rabbit, Run

#Q Often coming in at number one on 100 Best Novels of the 20th Century lists, what is the name of the James Joyce book that depicts a day in the life of Leopold Bloom?
^ Ulysses
A Dubliners
B Ulysses
C Finnegans Wake
D A Portrait of the Artist as a Young Man

#Q This Jacquelyn Mitchard’s novel, which was the first book chosen for Oprah’s Book Club in 1996, was made into a 1999 Michele Pfeiffer and Treat Williams movie.
^ The Deep End of the Ocean
A The Heart of a Woman
B Song of Solomon
C Shes Come Undone
D The Deep End of the Ocean

#Q Which 19th century epistolary novel by Wilkie Collins is considered to be the first modern detective novel in the English language?
^ The Moonstone
A A Study in Scarlet
B The Count of Monte Cristo
C Murder on the Orient Express
D The Moonstone

#Q Which anti-war science fiction novel by Kurt Vonnegut follows the journeys through time of American soldier, Billy Pilgrim, mostly set in Dresden, Germany?
^ Slaughterhouse Five
A Cats Cradle
B Mother Night
C Breakfast of Champions
D Slaughterhouse Five

#Q What is the slang term used for romance novels in literature?
^ Bodice Rippers
A Chick Lit
B Torrid Teasers
C Moonlighters
D Bodice Rippers

#Q This small publishing company is noted for its defence for freedom of speech. Can you name the publishing company that took on the United States Postal Service for the right to publish Lady Chatterleys Lover?
^ Grove Press
A Random House
B Simon  Schuster
C Doubleday
D Grove Press

#Q In 1972 Kathleen Woodiwiss published a historical romance that took a historical romantic couple actually into the bedroom. Can you name the book that begins the saga of the Birmingham Family?
^ The Flame and the Flower
A The Wiz of Fifth Avenue
B Rebeccas
C The Flame and the Flower
D The Sword and Shield

#Q With what book did Erica Jong debut in 1973 that introduced the character Isadora Zelda White Strollerman Wing and Isadoras search for emotional and sexual fulfilment?
^ Fear of Flying
A J
B Fear of Flying
C Wings of a Dove
D Coffee Tea or Me

#Q What is the name of the mythical land that is the basis of Piers Anthonys most famous fantasy book series?
^ Xanth
A Xanth
B Dinotopia
C Oz
D Garran

#Q What was the title of Piers Anthonys famous horror novel written in 1990?
^ Firefly
A Firefly
B Hasan
C Ghost of Space
D For Love of Evil

#Q Which one of these fantasy books by Piers Anthony is not part of a series?
^ Mercycle
A Ogre, Ogre
B Juxtaposition
C Mercycle
D On a Pale Horse

#Q Who did Piers Anthony collaborate with to write the Kelvin of Rudd series?
^ Robert E. Margroff
A R.L. Stine
B Mercedes Lackey
C Stephen King
D Robert E. Margroff

#Q Which of these is not a book from the Apprentice Adept series by Piers Anthony?
^ Prostho Plus
A Phaze Doubt
B Unicorn Point
C Prostho Plus
D Split Infinity

#Q Piers Anthonys fantasy land of Xanth looks strikingly similar to what southern state of the USA?
^ Florida
A Louisiana
B Florida
C Georgia
D Mississippi

#Q Piers Anthony wrote a historical/fantasy novel about Native Americans called Tatham Mound.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q What is Piers Anthonys real last name?
^ Jacob
A Jacob
B Martin
C Rourque
D Dillingham

#Q Apart from writing a bestselling horror fiction, he also worked as an acting and business manager of Irvings Lyceum Theatre, London. Who is he?
^ Bram Stoker
A Nathaniel Hawthorne
B James Joyce
C William Hope Hodgson
D Bram Stoker

#Q This French writers grandmother was an Afro-Caribbean slave who married a white nobleman.
^ Alexandre Dumas
A Victor Hugos
B Jules Vernes
C Voltaires
D Alexandre Dumas

#Q She wrote her only best-seller novel bedridden, with a broken ankle only for her amusement, keeping it secret from her friends. Who is she?
^ Margaret Mitchell
A George Elliott
B Jane Austen
C Emily Bronte
D Margaret Mitchell

#Q What was the name of the only brother of the sister authors Charlotte, Emily and Anne Bronte?
^ Branwell
A Branwell
B Arthur
C Edward
D Edmund

#Q According to many scholars, Miguel Cervantes penned the first modern novel. What is its title?
^ Don Quixote
A Don Quixote
B The Iliad
C The Impossible Dream
D La Galatea

#Q Which of the following Irish writers did not receive the Nobel Prize for Literature in the 20th century?
^ James Joyce
A Seamus Heaney
B Samuel Beckett
C William Butler Yeats
D James Joyce

#Q Ernest Hemingway fictionalized his experiences of World War I in this book which tells the story of an American soldier, Lt. Fredric Henry, who falls in love with a British nurse, named Catherine Barkley.
^ A Farewell to Arms
A The Sun Also Rises
B A Farewell to Arms
C For Whom the Bell Tolls
D The Old Man and the Sea

#Q What white whale does Captain Ahab seek in Herman Melvilles novel Moby Dick?
^ Sperm Whale
A Sperm Whale
B Blue Whale
C Pilot Whale
D Killer Whale

#Q English Baron George Bulwer-Lytton liked to use the words the last in the titles of his books. Which of the following books was not written by him?
^ The Last of the Mochicans
A The Last of the Mochicans
B The Last Days of Pompeii
C The Last Days of the Barons and Harold
D The Last Days of the Saxon Kings

#Q Who penned the childrens story The Old Man of Lochnager?
^ Prince Charles
A Eric Clapton
B Prince Charles
C Harold Wilson
D David Beckham

#Q The novel The Drawing of the Three begins seven days after the end of The Gunslinger novel.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q In the opening scene of The Drawing of the Three Roland is attacked by a strange creature. What type of creature of our world did it resemble?
^ Lobster
A Lobster
B Bear
C Raven
D Lion

#Q In the book The Drawing of the Three, during his battle with the creature on the beach Roland suffers a loss. What is it?
^ All of these
A His right middle finger
B All of these
C His right index finger
D Most of his right big toe

#Q The first door described in the book The Drawing of the Three leads Roland to Eddie Dean, a heroin addict in the process of smuggling some drugs. What is the label on this first door?
^ The Prisoner
A The Punisher
B The Prisoner
C The Pusher
D The Poisoner

#Q The second door in the novel The Drawing of the Three leads to Odetta Holmes, a black woman who is involved with the civil rights movement. She has a split personality that leads to some interesting confrontations with her new companions. What is the label on the second door?
^ The Lady of Shadows
A The Twins
B The Lady of Shadows
C Good Lies in Dark Places
D The Darkness of Detta

#Q In the novel The Drawing of the Three, Roland doesnt find another companion through the third door. Instead he finds an adversary named Jack Mort who is closely linked to some of Rolands companions. What was the label on the third door?
^ The Pusher
A The Poisoner
B The Pusher
C The Prisoner
D The Pensioner

#Q Rolands encounter with Jack Mort in The Drawing of the Three caused the characters of Odetta Holmes and Detta Walker to merge together. What was the name of the woman who was formed from this fusion?
^ Susannah
A Susan
B Susannah
C Hannah
D Shannon

#Q In the novel The Drawing of the Three, Roland tells his companions they are all essential members of his group, but uses a special word meaning one made from many or sharing the same destiny. What is that word?
^ Ka-tet
A Ka-lel
B Ka-tet
C Ka-zaa
D Ka-boom

#Q In the novel The Drawing of the Three, when in New York Roland hunts for ammunition for his guns and it is revealed that they take .38 Long Colt cartridges.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q What is the first name of Mary Shelleys character Frankenstein, who creates a humanoid creature by stitching together pieces of human corpses?
^ Victor
A Ernest
B Volfgang
C William
D Victor

#Q This fictional scientific genius, who travels in a submarine, was featured in the novels Twenty Thousand Leagues Under the Sea and The Mysterious Island.
^ Nemo
A Captain Duncan
B Nautilus
C Pierre Aronnax
D Nemo

#Q Which author wrote a novella, centered around a good-natured doctor who transforms into a cruel and remorseless person after drinking a potion?
^ Robert Louis Stevenson
A Robert Louis Stevenson
B Arthur Conan Doyle
C Walter Scott
D Thomas Hardy

#Q What Jules Verne novel features Thomas Roch, a genius inventor, who created a powerful weapon?
^ Facing the Flag
A Facing the Flag
B Master of the World
C From the Earth to the Moon
D Twenty Thousand Leagues Under the Sea

#Q H. G. Wells sci-fi novel The Island of Doctor Moreau focuses on experiments involving which of the following?
^ vivisection
A X-rays
B potions
C explosives
D vivisection

#Q Which of these stories is not part of the childrens series The Mad Scientists Club?
^ The Penultimate Peril
A The Unidentified Flying Man of Mammoth Falls
B The Voice in the Chimney
C The Penultimate Peril
D The Strange Sea Monster of Strawberry Lake

#Q Which of these literary characters has a condition called dextrocardia (heart on the right side of the chest)?
^ Dr. Julius No
A Doctor Death
B Dr. Jekyll
C Dr. Moreau
D Dr. Julius No

#Q What character, depicted by English writer H. G. Wells, discovers a formula capable of rendering a human being invisible?
^ Griffin
A Dr. Moreau
B Dr. Montgomery
C Griffin
D Professor Lidenbrock

#Q In Don DeLillos novel, White Noise, professor Jack Gladney finds out that his wife participates in an experimental study of a new psychoactive drug, called Dylar. Which of the following does this medication treat?
^ the fear of death
A the fear of reality
B the fear of death
C the fear of the future
D the fear of being alone

#Q Who does Dr. Faustus summon, after he sells his soul to the devil for power and knowledge, in the play The Tragical History of Doctor Faustus?
^ Helen of Troy
A Adam and Eve
B Achilles
C Hector
D Helen of Troy

#Q In what year did Ernest Hemingway die?
^ 1961
A 1955
B 1960
C 1961
D 1971

#Q For which book did Ernest Hemingway win a Pulitzer Prize in 1953?
^ The Old Man and the Sea
A For Whom the Bell Tolls
B A Farewell to Arms
C Islands in the Stream
D The Old Man and the Sea

#Q Ernest Hemingways mother dressed him in girls clothing when he was little.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Ernest Hemingway served in the army.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Margaux Hemingway was Ernest Hemingways daughter.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Margaux Hemingway never appeared in a movie with her sister.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Mariel Hemingway is Margaux Hemingways mother.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Mariel Hemingway is famous for playing the role of Tracy in what 1979 Woody Allen film?
^ Manhattan
A Star 80
B Personal Best
C The Contender
D Manhattan

#Q Mariel Hemingway never starred in a Superman movie.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Elizabeth Hadley Richardson married Ernest Hemingway in 1935.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q The Hemingways have a history of suicides.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q The novel Wizard and Glass picks up where Dark Tower III: The Waste Lands left off.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q In the book Wizard and Glass, the gunslingers and Oy disembark from the monorail train at which station?
^ Topeka
A Tower Heights
B Topeka
C Hambry
D Grand Central Station

#Q What is the name of the Kansas City baseball team whose stadium the ka-tet pass on their journey in the novel Wizard and Glass?
^ Monarchs
A Royals
B Twisters
C Monarchs
D Eagles

#Q In Wizard and Glass, one night, Roland begins to tell the rest of the ka-tet the story of his earlier life. At what age did he earn his guns to become the youngest ever gunslinger?
^ 14
A 13
B 12
C 15
D 14

#Q When Roland first left Gilead in the novel Wizard and Glass, he was accompanied by two of his close friends. What were their names?
^ Cuthbert Allgood and Alain Johns
A Cuthbert Allgood and Jamie De Curry
B Jamie De Curry and Sheemie Ruiz
C Cuthbert Allgood and Alain Johns
D Alain Johns and Sheemie Ruiz

#Q In the book Wizard and Glass, Roland and his original ka-tet travel to the Barony of Mejis on order of Rolands father. What task had they been instructed to carry out?
^ Gather information about agents of John Farson and their activities
A Destroy the oil-fields of Mejis
B Count how many horses were held within the Barony
C Gather information about agents of John Farson and their activities
D Capture the Wizards Glass

#Q In the book Wizard and Glass, Roland and his young friends defeat a troop of Farsons men by making them ride into a canyon which houses a thinny - an eerie dimensional hole through which people can travel across dimensions.  What is the name of the canyon?
^ Eyebolt
A Thunderbolt
B Screamer
C Thunderclap
D Eyebolt

#Q During the battle in the book Wizard and Glass, Roland captures the Wizards Glass, a malevolent crystal ball that shows him visions of his future. What colour is the Wizards Glass?
^ Pink
A No colour at all
B Black
C Green
D Pink

#Q The author of the best-selling novel, The Call of the Wild, was a war reporter, covering the Russo-Japanese War. Can you guess his name?
^ Jack London
A Jack London
B Jonathan Swift
C O Henry
D Charles Dickens

#Q The novel entitled Cosette ou le Temps des Illusions (Cosette or the Time of Illusions), written by Francois Ceresa, is sequel to what Victor Hugo novel?
^ Les Miserables
A Remembrance of Things Past
B Madame Bovary
C Les Miserables
D The Three Musketeers

#Q Robert Southey, one of the English Lake Poets, became known for what fairy tale?
^ Goldilocks and the Three Bears
A Little Red Riding Hood
B Ali Baba and the Forty Thieves
C Goldilocks and the Three Bears
D Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs

#Q Famous fiction characters Tom Sawyer and Huckleberry Finn were from the small town of St. Petersburg, which was modeled by Mark Twain after his home town. Where was St. Petersburg?
^ Hannibal, Missouri
A Jackson, Mississippi
B Lincoln, Nebraska
C Boston, Massachusetts
D Hannibal, Missouri

#Q Stephen King wrote about half of this novel in room 217 of the Stanely Hotel in Colorado.
^ The Shining
A Misery
B The Shining
C Bag of Bones
D Black House

#Q What is Romeos last name in Shakespeares play Romeo and Juliet?
^ Montague
A Montague
B Boleyn
C Capulet
D Valentine

#Q Who did Ralph Nader criticize in his book Unsafe at Any Speed, published in 1965?
^ Auto Industry
A Internet
B Video Games
C Olympic Swimmers
D Auto Industry

#Q On Friday 13th in 2006, American author Lemony Snicket released his last book of A Series of Unfortunate Events, featuring the Baudelaire children. How many books does the series contain?
^ 13
A 12
B 14
C 13
D 11

#Q Why is Joseph K. arrested in Franz Kafkas popular novel, The Trial?
^ The reason is never explained.
A The reason is never explained.
B He was accused of robbing a bank
C Murder of his step-father
D Treason

#Q What novel by Jane Austen was originally titled Elinor and Marianne?
^ Sense and Sensibility
A Persuasion
B Emma
C Sense and Sensibility
D Pride and Prejudice

#Q What was the title of Dorothy Parkers first poetry collection?
^ Enough Rope
A The Fan
B Resume
C Enough Rope
D Death  Taxes

#Q Dorothy Parker was a recluse all her life.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Dorothy Parker wrote the script for what famous 1937 movie starring Janet Gaynor?
^ A Star Is Born
A Rebecca
B The Awful Truth
C Meet The Press
D A Star Is Born

#Q Martin Rothschild was Dorothy Parkers uncle.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q What was Dorthy Parkers last film project?
^ The Fan - 1949
A Ziegfied Follies - 1946
B A Star Is Born - 1937
C The Fan - 1949
D Saboteur - 1940

#Q Dorothy Parker never married.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Dorothy Parker grew up in an extremely close family.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Dorothy Parker had an affair with F. Scott Fitzgerald.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q When was Dorothy Parker born?
^ August 1893
A September 1900
B August 1893
C January 1899
D June 1897

#Q Dorothy Parker worked for 4 magazines. Which list shows the correct order in which she worked for them?
^ Vogue, Vanity Fair, The New Yorker, Esquire
A Vogue, Vanity Fair, The New Yorker, Esquire
B Vanity Fair, Esquire, Vogue, The New Yorker
C Esquire, Vanity Fair, The New Yorker, Vogue
D The New Yorker, Vogue, Vanity Fair, Esquire

#Q Dorothy Parker wrote movie reviews for which magazine?
^ Vanity Fair
A The New Yorker
B Vanity Fair
C Vogue
D Esquire

#Q What is the name of the town, where Eragon from the self-titled book lives, until he becomes a dragon rider and makes his journey to the Varden?
^ Carvahall
A Tarnag
B Teirm
C Therinsford
D Carvahall

#Q Which of these cities, described by fantasy fiction writer Christopher Paolini, is not located in Du Weldenvarden?
^ Buragh
A Silthrim
B Kirtan
C Buragh
D Nadindel

#Q Which of these words/phrases of the ancient language, featured in the books Eragon and Eldest, is not paired with its correct meaning?
^ adurna - the morning star
A jierda - break/ hit
B blothr - stop
C adurna - the morning star
D the varden - the warders

#Q In the books Eragon and Eldest, wierda is the ancient language word meaning fate.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q In the novels Eragon and Eldest, zarroc is the ancient language word translated as misery. What else does the word refer to?
^ a sword
A a dragon
B a dragon rider
C a place
D a sword

#Q The first word in the novel Eragon is a proper noun (excluding the prologue).
^ True
A True
B False

#Q The books Eragon and Eldest are from which book series?
^ Inheritance Trilogy
A None of these
B Legacy Trilogy
C Ancient Trilogy
D Inheritance Trilogy

#Q In the novel Left Behind, character Rayford Steele is a pilot for Pan-American Airways.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q What is the name given to the mysterious disappearance of millions of people worldwide by Nicolae Carpathia in the Christian fiction book Left Behind?
^ The Vanishings
A The Vanishings
B Doomsday
C The Great Disappearance
D The Rupture

#Q In the Christian-themed novel Left Behind, Cameron Buck Williams is senior writer for which news magazine?
^ Global Weekly
A Newsweek
B The World Today
C Global Weekly
D Time

#Q Joshua Todd-Cothran is the head of what financial institution from the novel Left Behind?
^ The London Stock Exchange
A The World Stock Exchange
B The London Stock Market
C The New York Stock Exchange
D The London Stock Exchange

#Q In the book Left Behind, Chaim Rozenzweig was a botanist who developed The Eden Formula, that caused the deserts of Israel to bloom.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q In the Christian-themed novel Left Behind, charter pilot Ken Ritz had his own theory on the vanishings. He thought they were caused by aliens abducting the millions of missing people.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Did Rayford Steele ever have an affair with senior flight attendant Hattie Durham in the novel Left Behind?
^ No
A Yes
B No

#Q Left Behind character Buck Williams is drawn into a murder mystery when an old friend of his is mysteriously killed by a sniper.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q In the Christian fiction book Left Behind, Rayford and eventually Buck believe Nicolae Carpathia is the Antichrist described in several books of the New Testament.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q According to Pastor Bruce Barnes from the novel Left Behind, the Tribulation will begin when the Anti-Christ makes a peace treaty between which countries?
^ Israel and all of its enemies
A The United States and the West European countries
B Israel and all of its enemies
C The United States and Russia
D Russia and Israel

#Q Left Behind character Bruce Barnes believes The Tribulation would last how many years?
^ 7
A 7
B 5
C 6
D 3 and a half

#Q Lord Byron was the lusty, adventurous poet of revolt. He wrote once, “I awoke one morning and found myself famous.” What widely popular travel poem did this bohemian baron write which garnered the fame to which he referred?
^ Childe Harold’s Pilgrimage
A So We’ll Go No More A Roving
B Childe Harold’s Pilgrimage
C Stanzas for Music
D Don Juan

#Q This conservative, aristocratic poet and novelist was the pride of both Scotland and England. His martial poetry was an inspiration during war. What author of “Waverly” penned the following poem?

Sound, sound the clarion, fill the fife!
To all the sensual world proclaim,
One crowded hour of glorious life
Is worth an age without a name.
^ Sir Walter Scott
A Thomas DeQuincy
B Rudyard Kipling
C Sir Walter Scott
D Thomas Carlyle

#Q This nature lover felt that poetry should reflect the simple tongue of the common man and that poetry is basically “emotion recollected in tranquility.” Which renowned poet penned “Tintern Abbey” and “I Wandered Lonely as a Cloud.”
^ William Wordsworth
A William Wordsworth
B Samuel Taylor Coleridge
C Charles Lamb
D William Blake

#Q Who wrote these famous lines and in what poem can they be found?

“Beauty is truth, truth beauty,
That is all ye know on earth, 
And all ye need to know.
^ Keats—Ode on a Grecian Urn
A Shelly—Ozymandias
B Keats—Ode on a Grecian Urn
C Keats—Ode to a Nightingale
D Shelly—To a Skylark

#Q What was Lord Byron’s original name?
^ George Gordon
A Byron Thomas Hood
B George Gordon
C William Byron James
D James Manchester

#Q He was a close friend of Wordsworth. He wrote “Kubla Khan” and the following lines from his most popular poem:

The Mariner, whose eye is bright,
Whose beard with age is hoar,
Is gone; and now the Wedding-Guest
Turned from the bridegroom’s door.
^ Coleridge
A Coleridge
B Keats
C Carlyle
D Sir Walter Scott

#Q Coleridge, Southey, and Wordsworth all resided in the Lake Country of England near Grasmere.  What were these three referred to as?
^ The Lake Poets
A The Grasmere Poets
B The Lake Poets
C The Nature Poets
D The Country Poets

#Q He was a close friend of Byron and an incredibly popular singer, songwriter.  Which Irish entertainer and poet, who wrote the lyrics to “The Minstrel Boy,” wrote these lines as well?

The Harp that once through Tara’s halls the soul of music shed,
Now hangs as mute on Tara’s walls as if that soul were fled.
So sleeps the pride of former days, so glory’s thrill is o’er,
And hearts that once beat high for praise now feel that pulse no more.
^ Thomas Moore
A Thomas Moore
B Thomas Peacock
C Thomas Carlyle
D Thomas Campbell

#Q I weep for Adonais—he is dead!
Oh, weep for Adonais! Though our tears
Thaw not the frost which binds so dear a head!

What poet wrote these elegiac lines from “Adonais” in memoriam to John Keats, who died of T.B. at the tender age of only 24 years?
^ Percy Bysshe Shelly
A Lord Byron
B Percy Bysshe Shelly
C William Blake
D William Wordsworth

#Q Who wrote the book Running with Scissors?
^ Augusten Burroughs
A Augusten Burroughs
B David Sedaris
C William S. Burroughs
D Ann Coulter

#Q Barack Obamas first memoir is entitled Dreams from My Father.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q What is the title of William S. Burroughs semi-autobiographical novel depicting the lifestyle of heroin addicts?
^ Junky
A Junky
B Requiem for a Dream
C Crack
D Sex, Drugs and Cocoa Puffs

#Q David Sedaris wrote the book Dry which details his life.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Queer was a memoir penned by Allen Ginsberg.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q This actress, who won an Oscar at the age of 10, wrote a scathing memoir titled A Paper Life.
^ Tatum ONeal
A Angelica Huston
B Murial Hemingway
C Drew Barrymore
D Tatum ONeal

#Q Which Hollywood legends daughter penned the memoir Mommy Dearest?
^ Joan Crawford
A Joan Crawford
B Judy Garland
C Katherine Hepburn
D Betty Davis

#Q Eli Weisels book Night is about the Holocaust.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Manfred Bloor is a character from which novel?
^ Midnight for Charlie Bone
A Midnight for Charlie Bone
B Charmed Life
C Shadowmancer
D Mattimeo

#Q Which novel features the characters King Swishbert and Queen Olympia?
^ Once upon a Marigold?
A Once upon a Marigold?
B The Star of Kazan
C Dragons breath
D The Frog Princess

#Q In which novel does the character Dustfinger appear?
^ Inkheart
A The Purple Emperor
B Inkheart
C The Sphere of Secrets
D The Amulet of Samarkand

#Q Name the first novel of a popular series which has a main character named Twig.
^ Beyond the Deep Woods
A Pure dead magic
B Wizard of Earthsea, A
C Moorchild, The
D Beyond the Deep Woods

#Q Luke is the main character in which of the following books?
^ Among the Hidden
A Turnabout
B Double identity
C Among the Hidden
D Running out of Time

#Q Which novel features the fictional Herdman family?
^ The Best Halloween Ever
A The Imp That Ate My Homework
B Loser
C Rules
D The Best Halloween Ever

#Q Soren is a fictional character depicted in which book??
^ The Capture
A The Capture
B Poppy
C Redwall
D The Field Guide

#Q In which popular hockey novel does the character Nish appear?
^ The Night They Stole the Stanley Cup
A The Night They Stole the Stanley Cup
B Penalty shot
C The Million dollar goal
D Woodsie

#Q Parvana is the protagonist of this Canadian novel.
^ The Breadwinner
A The Minstrels Daughter
B Prisoner in the Promised Land
C Still There Clare
D The Breadwinner

#Q Mrs. Granger is a popular teacher who appears in this novel.
^ Frindle
A My Life as a Fifth-Grade Comedian
B Frindle
C Superfudge
D The Best School Year Ever

#Q Shona Silkfin becomes friends with the title character of which novel?
^ The Tail of Emily Windsnap
A Rani in the Mermaid Lagoon
B Aquamarine
C The Tail of Emily Windsnap
D Sirena

#Q Rocky is the best friend of the protagonist in which novel?
^ Molly Moons Incredible Book of Hypnotism
A Molly Moons Incredible Book of Hypnotism
B The wall and the wing
C The Book of Lies
D Peter  the Starcatchers

#Q Who wrote the collection of stories titled The Canterbury Tales?
^ Geoffrey Chaucer
A Edward Spenser
B Sir Walter Raleigh
C Geoffrey Chaucer
D Christopher Marlowe

#Q Who wrote the poems titled Epithalamion (a song in celebration of a wedding) and Amoretti?
^ Edward Spenser
A Geoffrey Chaucer
B Sir Walter Raleigh
C Edward Spenser
D John Milton

#Q Who wrote The Passionate Sheppard to His Love in 1600?
^ Christopher Marlowe
A John Milton
B Alexander Pope
C Sir Walter Raleigh
D Christopher Marlowe

#Q What poet wrote Farewell False Love and The Nymphs Reply to the Sheppard?
^ Sir Walter Raleigh
A Edward Spenser
B Christopher Marlowe
C Sir Walter Raleigh
D John Milton

#Q Which poet wrote the poems LAllegro and il Penseroso in 1631?
^ John Milton
A William Blake
B Christopher Marlowe
C John Milton
D Alexander Pope

#Q Who wrote the epic poem The Rape of the Lock in 1714?
^ Alexander Pope
A John Milton
B Alexander Pope
C William Wordsworth
D William Blake

#Q What poem was written by William Blake in 1794?
^ The Tyger
A Khubla Khan
B L Allegro
C Amoretti
D The Tyger

#Q In what year did William Wordsworth write the poem Ode, Intimations of Immortality from Recollections of Early Childhood?
^ 1803
A 1800
B 1810
C 1803
D 1799

#Q Samuel Taylor Coleridge wrote the poem She Was a Phantom of Delight in 1803.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Which of these poems was written by Samuel Taylor Coleridge?
^ Khubla Khan in 1798
A Khubla Khan in 1798
B The Tyger in 1794
C She Walks in Beauty in 1814
D Ode to the West Wind in 1819

#Q Ironically, the essay Areopagitica, which dealt with censorship, was banned in England. Who wrote  this essay?
^ John Milton
A Dr. William Bowlder
B John Milton
C Phillip Marlowe
D Felton Edward Lewis

#Q In 1931 the Province of Hunan, China banned this book.
^ Alices Adventures in Wonderland
A 1984
B Go Ask Alice
C Alices Adventures in Wonderland
D Alices Restaurant

#Q This famous anti-war novel by Erik Marie Remarque was banned in Nazi Germany.
^ All Quiet on the Western Front
A To Hell and Back
B 1984
C Dr. Caligari
D All Quiet on the Western Front

#Q Nadine Gordimer won the 1991 Nobel Prize in Literature but many of her works were banned in her  native country. What is her native country?
^ The Union of South Africa
A Romania
B Belgium
C The Soviet Union
D The Union of South Africa

#Q Who wrote the novel Dr. Zhivago which was banned in the Soviet Union until 1988?
^ Boris Pasternak
A Ivan Gogol
B Boris Pasternak
C William F. Buckley
D Leon Trotsky

#Q Who wrote Uncle Toms Cabin, a book which was banned in most of the southern United States?
^ Harriet Beecher Stowe
A Clara Barton
B Harriet Beecher Stowe
C Thaddeus Stevens
D Ambroise Beirce

#Q In Seinfeld, Jerry was accused of having this book overdue at the New York Public Library for over 15  years. It was banned in the USA from the 1930s until the 1950s.
^ The Tropic of Cancer
A Lady Chatterleys Lover
B Moll Flanders
C O
D The Tropic of Cancer

#Q This book, which was in part the basis for the play Pippin, was banned in the USA for obscenity.
^ Candide
A O
B Madame Was Not a Lady
C Candide
D Madame  Bovary

#Q Who wrote the novel The Satanic Verses which was banned in Bangladesh, Iran, Singapore and Indonesia?
^ Salmon Rushdie
A Sameer Mousheff
B Kharam Patel
C David Beck
D Salmon Rushdie

#Q Many communities in California banned this Pulitzer Prize-winning novel and labeled it communist propaganda.
^ The Grapes of Wrath
A The Old Man and the Sea
B The Pearl
C L.A. Land
D The Grapes of Wrath

#Q This book by D. H. Lawrence was banned in the USA, the UK and Australia.
^ Lady Chatterleys Lover
A The Great Gatsby
B Lady Chatterleys Lover
C The Sun Also Rises
D The Day of the Locust

#Q During the missile crisis of the 1960s, this book was banned in the USA and the UK.
^ 1984
A The Lotus Eaters
B 1984
C Brave New World
D Down and Out in London and Paris

#Q When the Nazis came to power they banned this short novel by Franz Kafka.
^ The Metamorphosis
A The Metamorphosis
B The Rights  of  All men
C The Satanic Verses
D All Quiet on the Western Front

#Q This work was banned in Lebanon for showing Jews, Zionism, and Israel in a favorable light.
^ The Diary of a Young  Girl
A The Grapes of Wrath
B The Diary of a Young  Girl
C The Kite Runner
D The Rubiyat of Omar Khayyam

#Q This 18th century erotic novel is one of the most prosecuted and banned books in history.
^ Memoirs of a Woman of Pleasure
A O
B Stella Dallas
C Memoirs of a Woman of Pleasure
D I Was Curious Yellow

#Q Which of these poems was written by Lord George Gordon Byron?
^ She Walks In Beauty
A Ode To A Grecian Urn
B My Lost Youth
C She Was A Phantom Of Delight
D She Walks In Beauty

#Q In what year did Edgar Allan Poe write the poem The City in the Sea?
^ 1831
A Edgar Allan Poe never wrote The City in the Sea
B 1825
C 1831
D 1829

#Q Oliver Wendell Holmes wrote The Chambered Nautilus and The Deacons Masterpiece in the same year.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Who is the author of the poems Meeting at Midnight and Parting in Morning?
^ Robert Browning
A Emily Bronte
B Walt Whitman
C Robert Browning
D Elizabeth Browning

#Q Which poet wrote the poem beginning with the words-Success is counted sweetest...?
^ Emily Dickinson
A Elizabeth Browning
B Carol Channing
C Emily Bronte
D Emily Dickinson

#Q Which of these poems was written by Lord Alfred Tennyson?
^ Ulysses
A A Musical Instrument
B Peter, Peter, Pumpkin Eater
C Ulysses
D Calvary Crossing A Ford

#Q Who wrote the poem Break, Break, Break?
^ Alfred, Lord Tennyson
A Emily Bronte
B Oliver Wendell Holmes
C Elizabeth Browning
D Alfred, Lord Tennyson

#Q Victorian poets Elizabeth Browning and Robert Browning were brother and sister.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Hans Christian Andersen was born on April 2, 1805. What was his nationality?
^ Danish
A Swiss
B German
C Flemish
D Danish

#Q What kind of literary works did Hans Christian Andersen enjoy reading when he was a child?
^ Dramatic works
A Love stories
B Gothic novels
C Dramatic works
D Poems

#Q What was the name of Hans Christian Andersens first story which was published in 1822?
^ The Ghost at Palnatokes Grave
A The Tinder Box
B A Journey on Foot from Holmens Canal to the East Point of Amager
C The Ghost at Palnatokes Grave
D The Princess and the Pea

#Q Which of these statements is true about the childhood of Hans Christian Andersen?
^ All of these
A He wasnt a very good student.
B He suffered from dyslexia.
C He was often abused.
D All of these

#Q What present did Hans Christian Andersen receive from King Frederick VI in 1833?
^ A traveling grant
A A scholarship
B A mansion
C A traveling grant
D A boat

#Q Which of these fairy tales by Hans Christian Andersen starts with a woman who longs to have a child and is given a magic seed by a witch?
^ Thumbelina
A The Angel
B The Wild Swans
C The Princess and the Pea
D Thumbelina

#Q From which Hans Christian Andersens fairy tale are the characters Kai and Gerda?
^ The Snow Queen
A The Steadfast Tin Soldier
B The Red Shoes
C The Little Mermaid
D The Snow Queen

#Q What unforgettable character from the novel David Copperfield by Charles Dickens is believed to be based on Hans Christian Andersens personality and appearance?
^ Uriah Heep
A Edward Murdstone
B David Copperfield
C James Steerforth
D Uriah Heep

#Q Which of these fairy tales by Hans Christian Andersen ends with the death of a poor girl in the streets?
^ The Little Match Girl
A The Little Match Girl
B The Shadow
C The Happy Family
D The Story of a Mother

#Q In the harbor of Copenhagen there is a statue of this enchanting character created by Hans Christian Andersen.
^ The Little Mermaid
A The Little Mermaid
B The Little Match Girl
C The Ugly Duckling
D The Snow Queen

#Q Name the headstrong and sharp-tongued woman whose feisty spirit is tamed by Petruccio in Shakespeares comedy The Taming of the Shrew?
^ Katherina (Kate)
A Ophelia
B Bianca
C Cordelia
D Katherina (Kate)

#Q What Shakespearean character, who is the epitome of honesty and loyalty, is disinherited by her father, King Lear?
^ Cordelia
A Goneril
B Regan
C Cordelia
D MIranda

#Q What Shakespearean heroine elopes with a man of a different race and later becomes an innocent victim of his wrath?
^ Desdemona
A Imogen
B Ophelia
C Anne
D Desdemona

#Q What Shakespearean character is resented by her son for marrying her husbands brother, Claudius?
^ Queen Gertrude
A Lady Macbeth
B Elizabeth Woodville
C Lady Anne Neville
D Queen Gertrude

#Q Having survived a shipwreck, this character from the comedy Twelfth Night poses as a boy, named Cesario, and enters the service of Duke Orsino.
^ Viola
A Viola
B Bianca
C Cordelia
D Olivia

#Q In a sleepwalking scene, depicted in one of the most popular Shakespearean tragedies, this Queen of Scotland, suffering from a guilty conscience, cries Out, damned spot!
^ Lady Macbeth
A Queen Gertrude
B Imogen
C Isabel
D Lady Macbeth

#Q How does young Juliet Capulet die in Shakespeares tragedy Romeo and Juliet?
^ She stabs herself with a dagger.
A She swallows poison.
B She drowns herself.
C She stabs herself with a dagger.
D She is poisoned by Rosaline.

#Q In Shakespeares history play Richard III, this lady asked Richard, Did you not kill my husband? and got the following reply: Your beauty which did haunt me in my sleep could make me undertake the death of all the world.
^ Lady Anne
A Margaret of Anjou
B Queen Elizabeth
C The Duchess of York
D Lady Anne

#Q What Shakespearean tragic heroine is advised by her father to lock herself from Hamlets resort?
^ Ophelia
A Gertrude
B Viola
C Rosaline
D Ophelia

#Q Which Shakespearean heroine is not correctly matched with the play in which she appears?
^ Titania - Twelfth Night
A Titania - Twelfth Night
B The Three Witches - Macbeth
C Beatrice - Much Ado About Nothing
D Lady Capulet - Romeo and Juliet

#Q In Calla Bryn Sturgis, in the book Wolves of the Calla, the ka-tet meet a priest who, together with most of the townsfolk, asks them to protect them against the Wolves. What is the priests name?
^ Father Callahan
A Father Brautigan
B Father Callahan
C Father ONeill
D Father Ted

#Q The priest in the novel Wolves of the Calla has appeared previously in which Stephen King novel?
^ Salems Lot
A Cujo
B Pet Sematary
C Salems Lot
D Carrie

#Q The crystal ball in the novel Wolves of the Calla is used by Roland and his ka-tet to travel to 1977 to a borough of New York. Which Borough did they travel to?
^ Manhattan
A Queens
B New Jersey
C Brooklyn
D Manhattan

#Q In the novel Wolves of the Calla, Roland and the ka-tet team travelled to New York to protect what?
^ A single red rose growing in a vacant lot
A Eddies brother, Henry, from a drug dealer
B The headquarters of the Tet Corporation
C Prevent Jake from being killed by Jack Mort
D A single red rose growing in a vacant lot

#Q Susannah begins to undergo yet another change of character in Wolves of the Calla. What is this characters name?
^ Mia
A Coral
B Rhea
C Mia
D Susan

#Q When the priest first appeared near Calla Bryn Sturgis in the book Wolves of the Calla, he was found by a religious group. What is their name?
^ Manni
A Wolves
B Taheen
C Manni
D Crimson Acolytes

#Q Why are the Wolves such a problem to the people of Calla Bryn Sturgis in the novel Wolves of the Calla?
^ They abduct one twin of a pair from a family whenever they appear.
A They always beat the Bryn Sturgis soccer team when they visit.
B They have awful table manners.
C They come down from the mountains and kill all of the sheep, which are the main livestock in the area.
D They abduct one twin of a pair from a family whenever they appear.

#Q The Wolves in the novel The Wolves of the Calla have an arsenal of weapons, including hand-grenades called what?
^ Sneetches
A Landies
B Starbombs
C Sneetches
D Loopers

#Q This  type of  poem is usually a long poem that tells the story of a significant event or a significant persons life.
^ Epic Poetry
A Hokku
B Lyric Poetry
C Epic Poetry
D Iamb

#Q This type of poem consists of 14 lines with this rhyme pattern: abba cddc effe gg
^ Sonnet
A Acrostic
B Sonnet
C Ode
D Strophe

#Q Which word means a set of two lines in a poem?
^ couplet
A iamb
B caesura
C bisody
D couplet

#Q This type of poem is one that is relatively short and tells a story.
^ Narrative poem
A Prosdic poem
B Lyric poem
C Narrative poem
D Epode

#Q In this type of poem, the first letters of each line help give the meaning of the poem.
^ Acrostic
A Iamb
B Ode
C Lyric
D Acrostic

#Q This is a type of Japanese poem that is made of three parts; the first has five syllables, the second seven and the third have five.
^ Haiku
A Hokku
B Haiku
C Jintishi
D Basho

#Q This is a type of Chinese poetry .
^ Jintishi
A Rubiyat
B Hokku
C Haiku
D Jintishi

#Q This expression means an audible pause that breaks up a line of poetry.
^ Caesura
A Rubiyat
B Hokku
C Shwa
D Caesura

#Q This  type of poem is typified by a great poem by Omar Khayyam
^ Rubiyat
A Jintishi
B Haiku
C Hokku
D Rubiyat

#Q In which book by Mark Twain does the following phrase appear:  Lead us into temptation?
^ The Man That Corrupted Hadleyburg
A The Prince and the Pauper
B A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthurs Court
C The Man That Corrupted Hadleyburg
D The Mysterious Stranger

#Q I wish I owned half of that dog.  Why? somebody asked.  Because I would kill my half is a conversation from what book by Mark Twain?
^ Puddnhead Wilson
A Puddnhead Wilson
B The Adventures of Tom Sawyer.
C The Autobiography of Mark Twain
D Life on the Mississippi

#Q What Mark Twain book is the following quote from: Tom lost his temper.  I notice a person most always does that’s got laid out in an argument. He told us to shut up.?
^ Tom Sawyer Abroad
A Innocents Abroad
B Captain Stormfield Visists Heaven
C Tom Sawyer Abroad
D The Adventures of Tom Sawyer

#Q From which Mark Twain book does the following line come: “I never felt so filled with a blessed peace as I did yesterday - when I learned that Michangelo was dead.?
^ The Innocents Abroad
A The Prince and the Pauper
B Roughing it
C Life on the Mississippi
D The Innocents Abroad

#Q What book by Mark Twain is the following excerpt from: If man could be crossed with a cat - it would improve man - but it would deteriorate the cat.?
^ The Autobiography of Mark Twain
A The Autobiography of Mark Twain
B Puddnhead Wilson
C Life on the Mississippi
D Huckleberry Finn

#Q The difference between a cat and a lie is that the cat only has nine lives. Which book by Mark Twain is this quote from?
^ Pudd nhead Willson
A Pudd nhead Willson
B Tom Sawyer
C Roughing It
D The Innocents Abroad

#Q What book does the following quote come from: You dont know me without you have read a book by the name of The Adventures of Tom Sawyer, but that aint no matter. ?
^ Huckleberry Finn
A Huckleberry Finn
B The Gilded Age
C Letters From the Earth
D Life on the Mississippi

#Q I came in with Halleys Comet...it will be the greatest disappointment of my life if I dont go out with it. is a quote from what book by Mark Twain?
^ The Autobiography of Mark Twain
A The Autobiography of Mark Twain
B Tom Sawyer
C The Gilded Age
D Letters From the Earth

#Q What Mark Twain book is the following line from: All right, then, Ill go to hell!?
^ Huckleberry Finn
A Life on the Mississippi
B Huckleberry Finn
C Captain Stormfield Visits Heaven
D The Diary of Adam and Eve

#Q What book by Mark Twain does this quote come from: In mans heaven...it shall contain each and every thing that is repulsive to a man, and not a single thing he likes....it pays no compliment to the intellect...in fact never even mentions it. ?
^ Letters From the Earth
A Letters From the Earth
B Roughing It
C The Innocents Abroad
D Huckleberry Finn

#Q Which poet wrote the poems The Germ, Listen, A Word to Husbands, and Very Like a Whale?
^ Ogden Nash
A Ogden Nash
B W. H. Auden
C C. Day Lewis
D Langston Hughes

#Q Which of the following poems was not written by C. Day Lewis?
^ The Unknown Citizen
A Almost Human
B The Unknown Citizen
C Newsreel
D Come, Live With Me And Be My Love

#Q Gwendolyn Brooks wrote all of the following poems except one. Can you find the odd one out?
^ The Ballad of Sue Ellen Westerfield
A We Real Cool
B The Ballad of Sue Ellen Westerfield
C Way Out Morgan
D The Chicago Defender Sends A Man To Little Rock

#Q All of these poems were written by Allen Ginsberg except one. Which one was written by poet James Dickey?
^ The Beholders
A My Sad Self
B Howl
C The Beholders
D A Supermarket in California

#Q This poet wrote the poems Moss Gathering and My Papas Waltz in 1948 and Elegy for Jane in 1953.
^ Theodore Roethke
A Theodore Roethke
B Gwendolyn Brooks
C Robert Hayden
D Elizabeth Bishop

#Q Which of these poems was not written by Robert Lowell?
^ Digging for China
A For the Union Dead
B The Mouth of the Hudson
C Grandparents
D Digging for China

#Q Which poet wrote the poems Still I Rise, I Know Why the Caged Bird Sings, and Remembrance?
^ Maya Angelou
A Elizabeth Bishop
B Gwendolyn Brooks
C Anne Sexton
D Maya Angelou

#Q Which 20th century poet wrote the phrase Candy is Dandy, But Liquor is Quicker?
^ Ogden Nash
A Ogden Nash
B James Dickey
C Dylan Thomas
D Allen Ginsberg

#Q John Steinbeck was born in 1902 in this city.
^ Salinas, California
A New York City
B Salinas, California
C Moscow, Soviet Union
D Heiligenhaus, Germany

#Q Which of the following books by John Steinbeck won a Pulitzer prize?
^ The Grapes of Wrath
A East of Eden
B none of these
C Of Mice and Men
D The Grapes of Wrath

#Q Name the sequel to John Steinbecks 1945 book Cannery Row.
^ Sweet Thursday
A The Pearl
B The Wayward Bus
C East of Eden
D Sweet Thursday

#Q What was John Steinbecks first published novel?
^ Cup of Gold
A Tortilla Flat
B The Red Pony
C Cup of Gold
D The Pastures of Heaven

#Q In 1960 John Steinbeck set off on a trip around America, which he described in a book. What name did Steinbeck give to the vehicle he used during the trip?
^ Rocinante
A America
B Rocinante
C Charley
D Don Quihote

#Q Upon its publishing in 1939 this book by John Steinbeck was banned from public schools and libraries in a lot of places in America.
^ The Grapes of Wrath
A To a God Unknown
B In Dubious Battle
C The Moon Is Down
D The Grapes of Wrath

#Q During World War II John Steinbeck worked as a war correspondent for this newspaper.
^ New York Herald Tribune
A New York Herald Tribune
B San Francisco Chronicle
C The New York Times
D Los Angeles Times

#Q George Milton and Lennie Small were characters in which book by John Steinbeck?
^ Of Mice and Men
A The Wayward Bus
B Of Mice and Men
C The Pearl
D Cannery Row

#Q Which of the following women was not married to John Steinbeck?
^ Mary Steinbeck Dekker
A Carol Henning Steinbeck Brown
B Elaine Anderson Scott Steinbeck
C Gwyndolyn Conger Steinbeck
D Mary Steinbeck Dekker

#Q What prize did John Steinbeck receive in 1962?
^ Nobel Prize for Literature
A New York Drama Critics Circle Award
B Nobel Prize for Literature
C Commonwealth Club of California Gold Medal for Best Novel by a Californian
D Pulitzer Prize Fiction Award

#Q He graduated from Harvard in 1916. He wrote The Enormous Room (1922) about a prison camp during WWI.
^ e.e. cummings
A Gary Porter
B e.e. cummings
C Robert Frost
D Ernest Hemingway

#Q He is largely considered to be the most popular American poet of the 19th century as well as the first professional American poet.
^ Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
A Nathaniel Hawthorne
B Edgar Allen Poe
C Robert Frost
D Henry Wadsworth Longfellow

#Q She was born in 1830 in Amherst, Massachusetts, and bore the same first name as her mother.
^ Emily Dickinson
A Jane Austin
B Emily Dickinson
C Sylvia Plath
D Elizabeth Barrett Browning

#Q He was born in 1902 in Joplin, Missouri and began writing in the 8th grade even though his father discouraged him.
^ Langston Hughes
A Thurgood Marshall
B E.G. Marshall
C Langston Hughes
D Barnard Hughes

#Q She wrote Cold Comfort in 1986 and A Space Filled with Movement in 1992.
^ Maggie Anderson
A Maggie Anderson
B Louise McNeil
C Maude Anderson
D Louisa Mae Alcott

#Q Writer and artist Edward St. John Gorey was born on February 22 in what year?
^ 1925
A 1915
B 1925
C 1935
D 1920

#Q Edward Gorey, who gained fame for his illustrative and writing abilities, did not have any formal art education at all.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Writer and illustrator Edward Gorey was fond of animals, which were also the subject of some of his works. What pets did Gorey keep in his house?
^ cats
A ferrets
B lizards
C cats
D dogs

#Q Writer and artist Edward Gorey never married.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Edward Gorey won a Tony Award for Best Costume Design for the 1977 Broadway production Dracula.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Writer and artist Edward Gorey died at the age of 75 at his home in Cape Cod. What caused his death?
^ Heart Attack
A Prostate Cancer
B Car Accident
C Heart Attack
D Natural causes-old age

#Q What are the names of Rolands mother and father in The Dark Tower series?
^ Gabrielle and Steven
A Gabrielle and Roland
B Gillian and Roland
C Gabrielle and Steven
D Gillian and Steven

#Q Which of the following Steven King books is not connected to the Dark Tower series?
^ They are all connected.
A Salems Lot
B They are all connected.
C The Eye of the Dragon
D Rose Madder

#Q What was the name of the book that contained the short story The Little Sisters of Eluria, a prequel to The Gunslinger?
^ Everything’s Eventual
A Nightmares and Dreamscapes
B Skeleton Crew
C Everything’s Eventual
D Different Seasons

#Q John Farson was the gunslinger who brought down the Affiliation in The Dark Tower series.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Oscar Wilde is associated with this art movement that began in the late Victorian period and is considered to have ended with Oscar Wildes trial in in 1895.
^ Aestheticism
A Art Nouveau
B Neo-Classicism
C Symbolism
D Aestheticism

#Q Oscar Wilde was imprisoned for two years after being convicted of this crime.
^ gross indecency
A treason
B domestic abuse
C gross indecency
D sexual assault

#Q This literary work, whose preface ends with the sentence, All art is quite useless, is Oscar Wildes only published novel.
^ The Picture of Dorian Gray
A A Woman of No Importance
B The Importance of Being Earnest
C The Picture of Dorian Gray
D The Canterville Ghost

#Q What drama film, starring Scarlett Johansson as Meg Windermere, is based on Oscar Wildes play Lady Windermeres Fan?
^ A Good Woman
A A Good Woman
B The Nanny Diaries
C The Other Boleyn Girl
D Lost in Translation

#Q This Oscar Wilde tragedy, originally written in French in 1891, was banned in England until 1931.
^ Salome
A A Florentine Tragedy
B Salome
C Vera; or, The Nihilists
D An Ideal Husband

#Q While in prison Oscar Wilde wrote De Profundis, an extended letter in which he expressed his bitter criticism towards this English author, better known as Wildes intimate friend.
^ Lord Alfred Douglas
A Lord Alfred Tennyson
B Lord Alfred Douglas
C Matthew Arnold
D Robert Seymour Bridges

#Q Which characters created by Oscar Wilde are not correctly paired with the literary work?
^ Salome - Simone Grosso, Beatrice
A The Picture of Dorian Gray - Basil Hallward, Sybil Vane
B Lady Windermeres Fan - Mrs Erlynne, Lord Darlington
C The Importance of Being Earnest - Gwendolen Fairfax, Algernon (Algy) Moncrieff
D Salome - Simone Grosso, Beatrice

#Q Name the witty nobleman who conveys to Dorian Gray his view of indulgent hedonism in one of Oscar Wildes most famous works?
^ Henry Wotton
A Henry Wotton
B Basil Hallward
C Alan Campbell
D James Vane

#Q The death penalty is the main theme of this poem by Oscar Wilde which contains the following often quoted lines:
Yet each man kills the thing he loves
By each let this be heard,
Some do it with a bitter look,
Some with a flattering word,
The coward does it with a kiss,
The brave man with a sword!
^ The Ballad of Reading Gaol
A The Sphinx
B The Fisherman and his Soul
C A House of Pomegranates
D The Ballad of Reading Gaol

#Q Complete the following statement made by one of Oscar Wildes characters: Nothing makes one so vain as being told one is ..............
^ a sinner
A a genius
B beautiful
C a sinner
D a good lover

#Q The novel The Dark Tower begins where Song of Susannah left off.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q In the book The Dark Tower, Susannah becomes physically separated from Mia and gives birth to Mordred, while Mia is killed by a group of vampires.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q In Stephen Kings novel The Dark Tower, Mordred has the ability to transform himself into what type of creature?
^ Spider
A Spider
B Wolf
C Crow
D Snake

#Q Once reunited in the book The Dark Tower, the ka-tet travel to a town called Fedic to stop the activity of a group of individuals who use their psychic powers to break apart the beams that hold the Dark Tower and Mid-World together. What is the name given to this group of psychics?
^ Breakers
A Breakers
B The Great Old Ones
C Sanitisers
D Crimson Acolytes

#Q Which member of the ka-tet is mortally wounded in The Dark Tower in the battle to free the psychics of Fedic?
^ Eddie
A Oy
B Eddie
C Jake
D Susannah

#Q In the final novel of The Dark Tower series, Jake, Roland and Oy travel to Maine in 1999 to do what important task?
^ Save the life of Stephen King
A Deliver a rose to Jakes dying mother
B Open the Tet Corporation Tower
C Close a tear between the worlds that was causing strange creatures to enter 1999
D Save the life of Stephen King

#Q On their travels in the book The Dark Tower, the ka-tet come to a place called ODDS LANE (the S had been added by hand). The only person who lived here was an old guy who called himself Joe Collins, but what was his real name?
^ Dandelo
A Dandelo
B Cuthbert
C Walter
D Pennywise

#Q In the novel The Dark Tower, in Joe Collins basement the ka-tet discover a young man named Patrick Danville imprisoned in a cage. What particular skill does Patrick have?
^ He is a gifted artist whose drawings become reality.
A He is blind and cannot be influenced by the all-seeing eye of The Crimson King.
B He can travel between worlds simply by thinking about them.
C He can block the destructive thoughts of the psychics who are destroying the Beams.
D He is a gifted artist whose drawings become reality.

#Q When close to his goal, The Dark Tower, Roland is attacked by Mordred. Who saves Rolands life, but dies in the process?
^ Oy
A Eddie
B Oy
C Jake
D Susannah

#Q In The Dark Tower, Stephen King urges the reader to stop reading at a certain point in the book and not go any further.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Driven by jealousy, anguish and ambition, this character from a history play by Shakespeare uttered the words, I am determined to prove a villain / and hate the idle pleasures of these days.
^ Richard III
A Henry V
B King Lear
C Claudius
D Richard III

#Q What Shakespearean character usurped the throne by murdering his brother and then married the late kings widow?
^ Claudius
A Julius Caesar
B Claudius
C Polonius
D Iago

#Q Name the Scottish King whom Macbeth murdered, led by his thirst for power and desire to obtain the throne.
^ King Duncan
A King Duncan
B King Malcolm II
C King Henry
D King Kenneth

#Q This character, often regarded as one of Shakespeares most malevolent villains, is an expert manipulator, who states, I am not what I am.
^ Iago
A Polonius
B Claudius
C Cassius
D Iago

#Q This complex Shakespearean character, who is a villain at one point and a victim at another, demanded a pound of flesh and rendered no mercy.
^ Shylock
A Horatio
B Tubal
C Antonio
D Shylock

#Q This character, who commits a number of villainous acts throughout the course of the play King Lear, is the illegitimate son of the Earl of Gloucester.
^ Edmund
A Edmund
B Antonio
C Edgar
D Philip

#Q What character from the play Julius Caesar incites the conspiracy against Caesar and plays a leading role in his assassination?
^ Cassius
A Brutus
B Taurus
C Arviragus
D Cassius

#Q Name King Lears brutal son-in-law who gouged out Gloucesters eyes in Shakespeares tragedy King Lear.
^ Duke of Cornwall
A Duke of Burgundy
B Edmund
C Earl of Kent
D Duke of Cornwall

#Q In the play Cymbeline, this dishonest Roman soldier tricked Posthumos into believing that he had seduced his wife, Imogen.
^ Iachimo
A Iachimo
B Philario
C Brutus
D Cassius

#Q In what Shakespearean comedy did Don John acknowledge, though I cannot be said to be a flattering honest man, it must not be denied but I am plain-dealing villain?
^ Much Ado About Nothing
A The Comedy of Errors
B Much Ado About Nothing
C The Taming of the Shrew
D Measure for Measure

#Q Why does the group of eco-terrorists, featured in the book Ark Angel, call themselves Force Three?
^ The Earth is the third nearest planet to the sun.
A It does not say.
B The Earth is the third nearest planet to the sun.
C The group has three main goals.
D When the group was created, there were three members in it.

#Q In the book Ark Angel, what are the nicknames Alex Rider gives to the four men who break into St. Dominics hospital looking for Paul Drevin?
^ Combat Jacket, Spectacles, Steel Watch, Silver Tooth
A Canvas Jacket, Spectacles, Steel Watch, Silver Tooth
B Combat Jacket, Spectacles, Steel Watch, Silver Tooth
C Canvas Jacket, Spectacles, Metal Watch, Silver Tooth
D Combat Jacket, Spectacles, Metal Watch, Steel Tooth

#Q Fictional character Alex Rider says that the leader of Force Three has what parts of the world tattooed on the back of his head?
^ Russia and China
A Brazil and West Africa
B Russia and China
C The US and Canada
D Europe

#Q In the novel Ark Angel, what natural disaster does Alex Rider think would occur if the leader of Force Three was to sneeze?
^ Earthquake
A Landslide
B Earthquake
C Tsunami
D Volcanic Eruption

#Q In the sixth book in the Alex Rider series, what were Force Three going to send with the ransom note to Nikolei Drevin in order to show him that they meant business?
^ One of their captives fingers.
A One of their captives toes.
B A picture of their captive.
C A lock of their captives hair.
D One of their captives fingers.

#Q In Ark Angel, after Force Three find out that the boy they captured is not Paul Drevin, but Alex Rider, they try to kill him by doing what?
^ They lock Alex in a room and set the building aflame.
A They lock Alex in a room and leave him there to starve to death.
B They lock Alex in a room and leave a time bomb right outside.
C They lock Alex in a room and weaken the supports of the building so that it falls down.
D They lock Alex in a room and set the building aflame.

#Q What was the name of Alexs guardian in the novel Ark Angel?
^ Jack Starbright
A Mrs. Jones
B Alan Blunt
C Jack Starbright
D Diana Meacher

#Q Jack Starbright, a recurring character in the Alex Rider books, enjoys cooking.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Living a life of self imposed isolation due to self doubt, fictional Navy officer Hornblower still considered one fellow officer his friend. Who was he?
^ Lt. Bush
A Capt. Jack Aubrey
B Stephen Maturin
C ABS Brown
D Lt. Bush

#Q One aspect of the physical constitution of fictional officer Hornblowers isolates him from a simple human pleasure. What is it?
^ Tone deafness prevents Hornblower from enjoying or even comprehending music.
A Hornblower has no sense of smell or taste resulting in joyless eating.
B Poor eyesight and color blindness result in his inability to comprehend beauty and art.
C Dyslexia, or a dyslexia-like condition, prevents Hornblower from being able to read and write.
D Tone deafness prevents Hornblower from enjoying or even comprehending music.

#Q What was the name of the first wife of fictional British Royal Navy officer Horatio Hornblower?
^ Maria
A Penny
B Maggie
C Mildred
D Maria

#Q Which of these is true about the second wife of fictional British Royal Navy officer Horatio Hornblower?
^ She is the sister of Anglo-Irish statesman Arthur Wellesley, the future victor at Waterloo and Duke of Wellington.
A She is the sister of Marie Antoinette, infamous for excesses, and executed early in the French Revolution.
B She is the sister of Anglo-Irish statesman Arthur Wellesley, the future victor at Waterloo and Duke of Wellington.
C She is the widow of Horatio Nelson, hero of the Nile and Trafalgar.
D She is the illegitimate daughter of Benjamin Franklin.

#Q During the Peace of Amiens,” fictional adventure series character Hornblower is beached and penniless. How does Hornblower make ends meet during this period?
^ Playing whist
A Gambling on horses
B Playing whist
C Prize fighting
D Working as a fishing boat captain

#Q Fictional officer Horatio Hornblower is dispatched round the Horn to assist the Spanish in the Pacific. Hornblower meets and assists a despotic, psychopathic Spanish commander. What is his name?
^ El Supremo
A Hugo Chavez
B Augusto Pinochet
C El Supremo
D El Rey Del Mundo

#Q Where does fictional character Stephanie Plum live?
^ Trenton, New Jersey
A Philadelphia, Pennsylvania
B Albany, New York
C San Francisco, California
D Trenton, New Jersey

#Q What is the occupation of Janet Evanovichs character Stephanie Plum?
^ bounty hunter
A bounty hunter
B police officer
C spy
D pastry chef

#Q Fictional character Stephanie Plum is employed by her cousin.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q In the Stephanie Plum series of novels, what is the name of the plus-sized black woman who sometimes is Stephanies partner?
^ Lula
A Latasha
B Lula
C Lila
D Laila

#Q In Janet Evanovichs series of books, Stephanie Plums relationship with her boyfriend is often overshadowed by her crush on this character.
^ Ranger
A Vinnie
B Alex
C Ranger
D Alfred

#Q Stephanie Plum has different cars throughout the various novels. However, the one that used to belong to her Uncle Sandor was affectionately called by this name.
^ Big Blue
A Big Bertha
B Big Ben
C Big Betsy
D Big Blue

#Q In the Stephanie Plum series of books, Stephanies mother approves of her job as a bounty-hunter.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Stephanie Plums eccentric Grandma Mazur has a weird obsession with attending viewings at the local funeral parlor.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q What is the job of Stephanies boyfriend in the Stephanie Plums series of novels?
^ a police officer
A a police officer
B a lifeguard
C an EMS
D a firefighter

#Q How many children does Harry Potter have as revealed in the last book of the harry Potter series?
^ 3
A 1
B 3
C 5
D 4

#Q Harry Potter kisses Cho Chang.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Harry Potter marries Hermione in the last book of the series.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Who does Hermione Granger kiss in the Battle of Hogwarts, in the final book of the Harry Potter series?
^ Ron
A None of these
B Harry
C Ron
D Krum

#Q What year were fictional characters Harry Potter and Ron Weasley born?
^ 1989
A 1990
B 1982
C 1989
D 1985

#Q Harry Potter once kissed Luna Lovegood.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q In what book of the Harry Potter series do Harry and Ginny kiss for the first time?
^ Harry Potter and the Half Blood Prince
A Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
B Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban
C Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
D Harry Potter and the Half Blood Prince

#Q What potion do Harry Potter, Ron Weasley and Hermione Granger use to infiltrate the Ministry of Magic?
^ Polyjuice Potion
A Amortentia
B Draught of Living Death
C Polyjuice Potion
D Felix Felicis

#Q Which student does Slughorn Horace NOT favour in the Harry Potter series?
^ Ron
A Harry
B Ron
C Zabini
D Hermione

#Q What character does Harry Potter first meet at Madam Malkins?
^ Draco
A Ron
B Dudley
C Draco
D Ginny

#Q In The Silmarillion, Morgoth was a corrupt Ainu, a servant of Iluvatar, responsible for much evil on Middle Earth. What was his original name?
^ Melkor
A Melion
B Mordred
C The Evil One
D Melkor

#Q The epic love story in The Silmarillion held great significance to Tolkien himself. This is evident by the fact that the names of the two lovers were engraved upon the tombstones of J.R.R. and his wife, Edith. What were these names?
^ Luthien and Beren
A Tuor and Idril
B Thingol and Melian
C Perseus and Andromeda
D Luthien and Beren

#Q What was the name of the Great Elven Prince of the Noldor who created the Silmarils described by J. R. Tolkien?
^ Feanor
A Fingon
B Fangorn
C Feanor
D Finarfin

#Q In The Silmarillion, the Elves call themselves this, meaning The Speakers, signifying their value of communication.
^ Quendi
A Quenya
B Quendi
C Quizlings
D Quintet

#Q Known as the Wildman of the Woods, this tragic hero, described in The Silmarillion, was cursed by Morgoth because his father refused to reveal the location of the secret Elvin kingdom of Gondolin.
^ Turin
A Turok
B Tuor
C Turgon
D Turin

#Q What transgression did fictional character Melkor commit to warrant the revenge of the Valor?
^ Creation fo the Orcs
A Creation fo the Orcs
B Seduction of the men of Numenor
C Creation of the Balrogs
D Deception of the Elves

#Q In Tolkiens writings, Numenor was created as a reward to men by the Valar for their part in the War of the Silmarills. The first king was the son of Earendil, a mortal, and Elwing, an Elf, and brother to Elrond. Who was he?
^ Elros
A Elros
B Elendil
C El Cid
D Elfin

#Q What are the names of the Three Kindreds of Elves in Toliens fictional universe?
^ Vanya, Noldor , and Teleri
A Tanya, Ronald, and Valeri
B Noldor, Baldar, and Teleporn
C Vanya, Noldor , and Teleri
D Vanwe, Manwe, and Elwe

#Q At the time of the fictional War of the Ring, who were the only surviving leaders of the Noldor?
^ Galadriel and Celeborn
A Celebrimbor and Cirdan
B Gil-galad and Celegorm
C Galadriel and Celeborn
D Elrond and Celebrian

#Q In Tolkiens book The Silmarillion, the kings of Numenor increasingly became rebellious against the Valar and mounted an attack against them. The result was that the island of Numenor sank into the sea. What was the reason for their revolt?
^ They lusted after immortality.
A They wanted the Silmarils for themselves.
B They were tired of Manna.
C They wanted the riches of the Valor.
D They lusted after immortality.

#Q There were a number of notable inter-racial marriages in The Silmarillion. The first one mentioned was between a mortal and a Maia, a servant of the Valar. What were their names?
^ Thingol and Melian
A Tuor and Idril
B Thingol and Melian
C Earendil and Elwing
D Beren and Luthian

#Q In The Silmarillion, Carcharoth slew Beren after swallowing a Silmaril. What was Carcharoth?
^ wolf
A wolf
B dragon
C spider
D Balrog

#Q In the universe created by J. R. Tolkien, the Valar were gods and were to be worshipped by men and elves alike.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q What is the name of the main character in The Dark Tower?
^ Roland Deschain
A Roland King
B Roland Gilead
C Roland Eld
D Roland Deschain

#Q What is the name of the dog-like billy-bumbler in the Dark Tower series?
^ Oy
A Doggie
B Ogg
C Oy
D Aye

#Q In the Dark Tower series, the woman known as Susannah has a dissociative identity disorder. How many personalities does she have?
^ 4
A 8
B 10
C 6
D 4

#Q In the Dark Towere series of books, Eddie Dean mysteriously resembles which one of Rolands dead friends?
^ Cuthbert Allgood
A Alain Johns
B Jamie de Curry
C Randall Flagg
D Cuthbert Allgood

#Q What is the name of Rolands first love in The Dark Tower?
^ Susan Delgado
A Mia
B Detta Walker
C Susan Delgado
D Susannah Dean

#Q There are a number of evil spheres in the Dark Tower books. What is the name of the most sinister of them?
^ Black Thirteen
A Blue Fog
B White Mist
C Purple Haze
D Black Thirteen

#Q Roland, the protagonist of the Dark Tower books, is a descendant of this great king.
^ Arthur Eld
A Arthur Eld
B The Red King
C The Prim lord
D Steven Deschain

#Q In the Dark Tower series of books, Jake has a very special ability called The Touch. What is it?
^ A kind of telekinesis
A The power to turn things into gold
B A kind of telekinesis
C The power to kill by thought
D The power to start fires

#Q Among the servants of the Red King in the Dark Tower, there are bird-like creatures that can assume a human form. What are they called?
^ Taheen
A Grandfathers
B Prims
C Taheen
D Slow muties

#Q In 2007 Marvel started a series of comic books based on The Dark Tower. What is the name of the first volume?
^ The Gunslinger Born
A Roland The Gunslinger
B The Gunslinger Born
C Roland of Gilead
D The Last Gunslinger

#Q In the beginning of the novel Twilight, Isabella moved from Phoenix, Arizona to what city?
^ Forks, Washington
A Forks, Washington
B Baton Rouge, Louisiana
C Miami, Florida
D Albany, New York

#Q In the Twilight saga, both Edward and James are trackers.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Is Twilight character Edward able to read minds?
^ Yes
A No
B Yes

#Q In the book Breaking Dawn, how many children does Bella have?
^ 1
A 4
B 1
C 3
D 0

#Q In which book of the Twilight series did Edward propose to Bella?
^ Eclipse
A Breaking Dawn
B Eclipse
C Twilight
D New Moon

#Q In the Twilight series, the Cullens love to play football during a thunderstorm.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q The Catcher in the Rye follows Holden Caulfields experiences in this city in the days following his expulsion from a fictional school in Pennsylvania.
^ New York City
A Philadelphia
B New York City
C Boston
D Los Angeles

#Q What word does Holden Caulfield use to refer to everyone and everything he rejects?
^ phony
A crass
B crap
C phony
D junk

#Q The protagonist of what movie is programmed to buy the novel The Catcher in the Rye whenever he sees it?
^ Conspiracy Theory
A Gattaca
B Conspiracy Theory
C The Fifth Element
D The Matrix

#Q Holden Caulfields dream to be a catcher in the rye and to guard children playing in a rye field on the edge of a cliff is based on his mishearing of the poem Comin Through the Rye. What poet, known in Scotland as The Bard, wrote that poem?
^ Robert Burns
A Robert Burns
B William Blake
C Thomas Campbell
D Lord Byron

#Q In the novel The Catcher in the Rye, Holden drops by to see his former English teacher, Mr. Antolini, who offers him advice and a place to sleep. Holden is upset when he wakes up in the middle of the night to find Mr. Antolini doing which of the following?
^ patting Holdens head
A holding Holdens hand
B drinking heavily
C ransacking Holdens luggage
D patting Holdens head

#Q At one point in the novel The Catcher in the Rye, Holden and his sister Phoebe seem to exchange roles as the catcher and the fallen. What is the Catchers symbol that Holden gives Phoebe?
^ his hunting hat
A his hunting hat
B a gold ring
C his diary
D his fishing rod

#Q Mark David Chapman was found with a copy of The Catcher in the Rye on the night he shot this person.
^ John Lennon
A Rebecca Schaeffer
B John Lennon
C Ronald Reagan
D Yoko Ono

#Q What was written on Allies left-handed baseball glove, one of the most significant symbols in the novel The Catcher in the Rye?
^ poems
A the name of his first girlfriend
B poems
C the titles of his favourite books
D the names of his siblings

#Q J. D. Salingers novel The Catcher in the Rye opens in the week before this major holiday.
^ Christmas
A Thanksgiving Day
B Memorial Day
C Christmas
D Easter

#Q In this Academy Award-winning movie, Woody Allens character says that he only has books with the word death or dying in them. Diane Keatons character holds a copy of The Catcher in the Rye and asks, What about this one?.
^ Annie Hall
A Manhattan
B Annie Hall
C Husbands and Wives
D Hannah and Her Sisters

#Q Who was Nero Wolfes right-hand man?
^ Archie Goodwin
A Archie Goodwin
B Theodore Horstmann
C Fritz Brenner
D Nathaniel Parker

#Q Where was fictional detective Nero Wolfe born?
^ Montenegro
A London
B Switzerland
C New York City
D Montenegro

#Q What color shirt did Nero Wolfe invariably wear?
^ Yellow
A Pink
B Yellow
C White
D Blue

#Q Fictional detective Nero Wolfe lived in a brownstone on West 34th Street in New York City.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q What was the name of Nero Wolfes fictional chef who lived in the basement of Wolfes brownstone and also served as majordomo and butler?
^ Fritz Brenner
A Nathaniel Parker
B Archie Goodwin
C Theodore Horstmann
D Fritz Brenner

#Q Who was the newspaperman who helped fictional detective Nero Wolfe on occasion, and was one of the regular poker players.
^ Lon Cohen
A Nathaniel Parker
B Saul Panzer
C Lon Cohen
D Johnny Keems

#Q Which of the following was not one of the regular gang of fictional detectives Nero Wolfe regularly used?
^ Purley Stebbins
A Saul Panzer
B Fred Durkin
C Orrie Cather
D Purley Stebbins

#Q What was Nero Wolfes hobby, which he engaged in for four hours each day?
^ Raising orchids
A Writing detective stories
B Collecting stamps
C Building intricate models
D Raising orchids

#Q Who was the love interest of Nero Wolfes right-hand man?
^ Lily Rowan
A Carla Lovchen
B Sally Colt
C Lily Rowan
D Del Bonner

#Q What was the name of Nero Wolfes nemesis?
^ Arnold Zeck
A Anson Street
B Arnold Zeck
C Albert Hall
D Arthur Dent

#Q What beverage did detective Nero Wolfe consume copious amounts of?
^ Beer
A Coffee
B Beer
C Tea
D Fine wine

#Q Who was the cigar-chomping fictional police inspector who had a love-hate relationship with Nero Wolfe?
^ Cramer
A Cramer
B Noonan
C Rowcliff
D Stebbins

#Q Which short story is listed with the WRONG author?
^ The Devils Advocate-John Grisham
A The Devil and Daniel Webster-Stephen Vincent  Benet
B The Spinoza of Market Street-Isaac Bashevis Singer
C Babylon Reconstructed-F. Scott Fitzgerald
D The Devils Advocate-John Grisham

#Q What is the essential element of a short story?
^ A short period of time is covered.
A The description of scenery  is used to paint a complete picture.
B They open with a historic scene.
C The complete description of  the main characters psyche is used to set  the scene.
D A short period of time is covered.

#Q Which term refers to a prose fiction work that is longer than a short story but shorter than a novel?
^ A novella
A An allegory
B A novella
C An intermediary tale
D A tale

#Q Which short story is  listed with the WRONG author?
^ Death in the Afternoon-John Steinbeck
A The Death of Ivan Ilych-Leo Tolstoy
B The Life in the Iron Mills-Rebecca H. Davis
C The Diamond Lens-Fitz James OBrien
D Death in the Afternoon-John Steinbeck

#Q Which story is listed with the CORRECT author?
^ The Man Without a Country-E. E. Hale
A The Man Without a Country-E. E. Hale
B Marjorie Drew-F. M. Crawford
C The Upper Berth-Mary E. Wilkins
D The Humble Romance-T. B. Aldrich

#Q Which short story ids listed with the WRONG author?
^ A Man Called Horse-Louis LAmour
A Love in Old Clothes-H. C. Bunner
B The Little Countess-Enrico Castlenuovo
C A Man Called Horse-Louis LAmour
D The Attack on the Mill-Emile Zola

#Q Which story is listed with the WRONG author?
^ The Gift of Cochise-Leo G. Carroll
A The Gift of Cochise-Leo G. Carroll
B The Yellow Wallpaper-Charles Perkins Gilman
C Eagles Over Croaked Creek-Max Brand
D Dubliners-James Joyce

#Q What is The Western Star from Agatha Christies short story The Adventure of The Western Star?
^ A jewel
A A jewel
B A ship
C A stage play
D A hotel

#Q Who is the murderer in Agatha Christies The Tragedy at Marsdon Manor?
^ The widow of the dead man
A The lover of the dead mans wife
B The widow of the dead man
C It is a suicide
D The brother of the dead man

#Q How does Mr Bleibner die in Agatha Christies short story The Adventure of the Egyptian Tomb?
^ Blood poisoning
A Killed by a demon
B Blood poisoning
C Heart failure
D Head trauma

#Q What does Miss Violet Marsh have to do in order to inherit her Uncle Andrews possessions in Agatha Christies story The Case of the Missing Will?
^ Prove her wits
A Cut her long beautiful hair
B Live as a beggar for one month
C Prove her wits
D Remain unmarried for the rest of her life

#Q Who killed the French Deputy Paul Deroulard in Agatha Christies short story The Chocolate Box?
^ His mother
A His cousin
B His wife
C His doctor
D His mother

#Q What type of poison does Mrs. Merrowdene use in Agatha Christies short story Accident?
^ Arsenic
A Mouse poison
B Arsenic
C Lead
D Atropine

#Q What does the blue geranium mean according to the fortuneteller in Agatha Christies exciting short story The Blue Geranium?
^ Death
A Death
B Adultery
C Danger
D Warning

#Q What word was written with a capital letter in the middle of a sentence in the letter from some Georgine in Agatha Christies story The Four Suspects?
^ Honesty
A Love
B Again
C Honesty
D Death

#Q What is the plant employed for the murder in Agatha Christies The Herb of Death?
^ Foxglove
A Thornapple
B Hemlock
C Foxglove
D Belladonna

#Q What work by Alexandre Dumas, Sr. inspired Hercules Poirot how to solve the case in  The Augean Stables?
^ The Queens Necklace
A The Gold Thieves
B The Queens Necklace
C The Black Tulip
D The Regents Daughter

#Q Who wrote the novel The Grapes of Wrath?
^ John Steinbeck
A John Ford
B John Steinbeck
C William Faulkner
D Ernest Hemingway

#Q When was the novel The Grapes of Wrath first published?
^ 1939
A 1961
B 1928
C 1950
D 1939

#Q What statement about the novel The Grapes of Wrath is true?
^ The author of the novel won the Pulitzer Prize for Literature and the Nobel Prize for Literature.
A The author of the novel won neither the Nobel Prize for Literature nor the Pulitzer Prize for Literature.
B The author of the novel won the Nobel Prize for Literature but not the Pulitzer Prize for Literature.
C The author of the novel won the Pulitzer Prize for Literature and the Nobel Prize for Literature.
D The author of the novel won the Pulitzer Prize for Literature but not the Nobel Prize for Literature.

#Q How did the author of The Grapes of Wrath come up with the title of the novel?
^ The authors wife suggested he use a line from a song.
A The author picked it out of The Bible.
B The authors wife suggested he use a line from a song.
C Marie Hemingway had published a poem containing the line  .. and the grapes of wrath poured forth from Pandoras box....
D When the author was growing up in Mississippi, it  was a common expression for mans  troubles.

#Q When was the original movie The Grapes of Wrath released?
^ 1940
A 1960
B 1950
C 1940
D 1970

#Q What is the name of the main family in the novel The Grapes of Wrath and in the movie adaptation?
^ Joad
A Galati
B Darwell
C Joad
D Adams

#Q Where do the main characters travel in the novel The Grapes of Wrath?
^ From Oklahoma to California
A From Oklahoma to California
B From rural Mississippi to Texas
C From Chicago, Illinois to San Joaquin, California
D From New York to Texas

#Q In the The Grapes of Wrath, we meet the first character, Tom, as he walks and hitchhikes home. Why is he away from home?
^ He served time in prison for homicide.
A He served time in prison for burglary.
B He served time in prison for homicide.
C He had no money for the subway, so he had to walk home.
D He lost his job in the Chicago slaughterhouses and had to walk the two miles to the Adams home.

#Q The director of the original film version of The Grapes of Wrath won an Oscar.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Which best describes the plot of the novel The Grapes of Wrath?
^ A poor family lose their home and farm and  travel West looking for work.
A A middle-class family lose their home and must move to the Southwest to get work and stability.
B A poor familys city home is foreclosed and they must travel to the mid-west to get work.
C A poor family lose their home and farm and  travel West looking for work.
D A poor family move from their Texas ranch to get work in the agricultural areas of California.

#Q Which of these words best describes the attitudes of the novel The Grapes of Wrath?
^ Pro-labor
A Pro-labor
B Pro-big business
C Anti-union
D Anti-American

#Q In the original movie The Grapes of Wrath, the part of Jim Casey, the ex-minister is played by an actor  with this last name.
^ Carradine
A Carradine
B Fonda
C Alda
D Douglas

#Q One of the characters in the novel and movie The Grapes of Wrath had this unusual name.
^ Rose of Sharon
A Rose of Sharon
B Chicago Louie
C Tainia
D Brooklyn

#Q What animal is used in the novel The Grapes of Wrath to symbolize the familys problems?
^ Turtle
A Turtle
B Wolf
C Dog
D Horse

#Q What two objects are used in the novel The Grapes of Wrath to symbolize evil?
^ the tractor and the slot machine
A the car and the bank
B the telephone and the gun
C the gun and the tractor
D the tractor and the slot machine

#Q What does the name Hudson have to do with the novel The Grapes of Wrath?
^ It is the brand of car the family uses for transportation.
A It is the name of the family the Adams live with in Texas.
B It is the brand of car the family uses for transportation.
C It is the name of the Texas ranch where the family gets part-time labor.
D It is the name of the cruel Illinois governor whose laws force the Darwells out of Chicago.

#Q Find the correct statement about the original movie The Grapes of Wrath.
^ The director refused to let anyone use makeup for the movie.
A The character of Nick Adams was played by Robert J. Douglas.
B The director refused to let anyone use makeup for the movie.
C The producer had to raise $5,000,000 to make this movie.
D Frank Galatai was portrayed by Robert J. Douglas.

#Q Which of the following banned the movie The Grapes of Wrath?
^ Josef Stalin
A Nikita Khrushchev
B Charles de Gaulle
C Josef Stalin
D Adolf Hitler

#Q Which of these performers did not write a song based on the novel The Grapes of Wrath?
^ Bob Dylan
A Woody Guthrie
B Bob Dylan
C Kris  Kristofferson
D Bruce Springsteen

#Q The novel The Grapes of Wrath was made into an opera.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q The Pulitzer Prize, established by newspaper publisher Joseph Pulitzer, is administered by  this American university.
^ Columbia University
A Columbia University
B University of California, Berkeley
C Princeton University
D Harvard University

#Q Newspaper magnates Joseph Pulitzer and William Hearst are regarded as the originators of this type of journalism.
^ yellow journalism
A yellow journalism
B ambush journalism
C Gonzo journalism
D investigating journalism

#Q What author, born in the American South, won the Pulitzer Prize for her only novel?
^ Harper Lee
A Harper Lee
B Geraldine Brooks
C Margaret Leech
D Eudora Welty

#Q In 1918, politician William Cabell Bruce won the Pulitzer Prize for the biography of this Founding Father.
^ Benjamin Franklin
A Benjamin Franklin
B Thomas Jefferson
C John Adams
D John Hancock

#Q What poet, noted for his realistic depictions of rural life, received four Pulitzer Prizes?
^ Robert Frost
A George Dillon
B John Gould Fletcher
C Wallace Stevens
D Robert Frost

#Q This Pulitzer Prize-winning work, written in Cuba by Ernest Hemingway, was also an important factor in Hemingways selection for the 1954 Nobel Prize in Literature.
^ The Old Man and the Sea
A Fiesta
B A Farewell to Arms
C The Old Man and the Sea
D For Whom the Bell Tolls

#Q What Gus Van Sant movie mentions a fictional Pulitzer Prize-winning novel, titled Avalon Landing?
^ Finding Forrester
A My Own Private Idaho
B Psycho
C Good Will Hunting
D Finding Forrester

#Q Who composed Blood on the Fields, the first piece of jazz music to win the Pulitzer Prize for Music?
^ Wynton Marsalis
A Duke Ellington
B Wynton Marsalis
C Don Ellis
D Miles Davis

#Q Who portrays Joseph Pulitzer, the founder of the Pulitzer Prize, in the 1992 Disney film musical, Newsies?
^ Robert Duvall
A Sean Connery
B Christian Bale
C Robert Duvall
D Alan Menken

#Q Which of the following authors is not a recipient of both the Pulitzer Prize and the Nobel Prize?
^ Doris Lessing
A Doris Lessing
B Sinclair Lewis
C William Faulkner
D John Steinbeck

#Q In Phillip Pullmans The Subtle Knife, who does Lyra, the protagonist of the first book, meet first in the new world?
^ Will
A Angelica
B Tullio
C Moxie
D Will

#Q In the book The Subtle Knife what is the name of the city Lyra finds herself in, in the new world?
^ CittGazze
A Oxford
B Bolvanger
C Aeshthaer
D CittGazze

#Q In the book, The Subtle Knife by Phillip Pullman, who is Will Parrys father?
^ Stanislaus Grumman
A Lord Asriel
B Lee Scoresby
C Stanislaus Grumman
D Sir Walter

#Q What does the alethiometer tell Lyra she must do, in the book The Subtle Knife?
^ Help Will find his father
A Find Lord Asriel
B Help Will find his father
C Search for a scholar who knows about dust
D Find The Subtle Knife

#Q In The Subtle Knife” Angelica’s younger brother is Paolo. Who is her older brother?
^ Tullio
A Will
B Oliver Payne
C Asriel
D Tullio

#Q In the second His Dark Materials book, how does the subtle knife indicate who it has chosen to be his bearer?
^ It cuts off the pinky and ring fingers on one hand.
A It gouges out an eye.
B It splits a hair.
C It leaves a scar across his forehead.
D It cuts off the pinky and ring fingers on one hand.

#Q In His Dark Materials trilogy, what can be the subtle knife used for?
^ All of these
A To cut windows between worlds.
B All of these
C To cut through anything, even metals, stones and souls.
D To destroy The Authority.

#Q In The Subtle Knife, what is the name by which the witches call Lyra, that if known by the wrong people, could mean her destruction?
^ Eve
A Metatron
B Lillith
C Eve
D Baroch

#Q Does Will ever find his father in His Dark Materials trilogy?
^ Yes
A Yes
B No

#Q What city does the typical family of four reside in in the classic story Tales of a Fourth Grade Nothing?
^ New York City
A New York City
B Chicago
C Albuquerque
D Boston

#Q In Tales of a Fourth Grade Nothing, what was the name of the turtle Peter got at Jimmy Fargos birthday party?
^ Dribble
A Buster
B Dribble
C Pickle
D speedy

#Q In the book Tales of a Fourth Grade Nothing, what big account did Peters father lose because of Fudge?
^ Juicy-O
A Jelly-Yum
B Juicy-O
C Juice-Pop
D Jell-O

#Q What is Fudges real name in the novel Tales of a Fourth Grade Nothing?
^ Farley Drexel Hatcher
A Frank Oslow Hatcher
B Farley Drexel Hatcher
C Franklin Osmond Hatcher
D Bartholomew Isaac Hatcher

#Q How old is Peter in Tales of a Fourth Grade Nothing?
^ 9
A 9
B 7
C 2
D 8

#Q What did Fudge do to Peters turtle in the book Tales of a Fourth Grade Nothing?
^ He swallowed it.
A He swallowed it.
B He dropped it out of the window.
C He hit it with a hammer.
D He took it for a walk.

#Q What classic line does Fudge say in Tales of a Fourth Grade Nothing when his mom discovers her flowers are missing?
^ ALL GONE yum yum
A ALL GONE yum yum
B Done the hatch
C Not me
D Mmm, mmm, good!

#Q What happened when Fudge fell off the jungle gym in Tales of a Fourth Grade Nothing?
^ He swallowed his top front teeth.
A He got a black eye.
B He bit his lip.
C He swallowed his top front teeth.
D He broke his arm.

#Q Who said there was a missing four-year-old in the building?
^ a security guard
A a fisherman
B Peter and Fudges father
C a security guard
D a waitress

#Q What did Fudges father dump on top of his head in the book Tales of a Fourth Grade Nothing?
^ cornflakes
A chowder
B cheerios
C cornflakes
D chips

#Q What is the protagonists occupation in the novel, The Mezzanine?
^ Office Worker
A Food Services Employee
B Courier
C Office Worker
D Statistician

#Q When does the action in the novel, The Mezzanine take place?
^ During the protagonists lunch hour
A During the protagonists lunch hour
B During the 10 A.M. coffee break
C Spring of 1987
D During the protagonists morning commute to work

#Q Where does most of the action in the novel The Mezzanine take place?
^ In the protagonists mind
A In line at the office supply store.
B In the protagonists mind
C On a park bench outside the office.
D On the escalator in the Mezzanine.

#Q Which of the following does not happen with the protagonist in the novel, The Mezzanine?
^ He eats a hamburger
A He eats a hamburger
B He rides an escalator.
C He buys shoelaces at CVS.
D He sits on a park bench across from the office.

#Q Why does the protagonist buy new shoelaces in the novel, The Mezzanine?
^ He broke one earlier that morning.
A He did it on impulse.
B Hes buying them for a co-worker.
C He broke one earlier that morning.
D His wife asked him to.

#Q What object in the mens room does the author discuss in great detail in the novel The Mezzanine?
^ The hand drying air machine.
A The toilet handle.
B The faucets on the sink.
C The hand drying air machine.
D The mirror above the sink.

#Q How much time elapses diegetically ( within the story )  in the novel The Mezzanine?
^ 2 to 3 minutes.
A 2 - 3 months
B 5 days
C 1  hour
D 2 to 3 minutes.

#Q According to the protagonist in The Mezzanine, how did the world change irrevocably in 1970?
^ Drinking straws switched from being made of paper to being made of plastic.
A New TVs increased the number of pixels, leading to greater picture quality and resolution.
B The rise of the Womens Movement in the US changed workplace ethics in the office forever.
C Drinking straws switched from being made of paper to being made of plastic.
D Introduction of the B-747 jet aircraft shrunk the globe in terms of air travel.

#Q Much attention is paid to the common stapler in the novel The Mezzanine.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q In the novel Nicolae, Nicolae Carpathia begins to establish his one world Government.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q In the novel Nicolae, Rayford Steele is able to gain secret information about Nicolaes plans via a secret one way intercom that had been installed in Nicolaes plane, The Condor 216.  Who placed the intercom in the plane?
^ Earl Halliday
A Pontifex Peter Matthews
B Chloe
C Earl Halliday
D Buck

#Q In the novel Nicolae, Buck Williams travels to Israel to rescue Tsion Ben-Judah, who is in hiding after his wife and children were murdered.  During a wild chase through the Israeli desert, they are aided aided by an angel.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Who tells Buck about Tsions family being murdered in the novel Nicolae?
^ Chaim
A Rayford
B Hattie
C Chaim
D Nicolae

#Q Hattie considers terminating her pregnancy once she finds out she is carrying Nicolaes child.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q A massive earthquake effects the entire world simultaneously in the novel Nicolae.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q During the Wrath of the Lamb, how does Tsion get separated from Buck in the novel Nicolae?
^ The shelter Tsion is hiding in is caved in
A Buck is arrested
B The shelter Tsion is hiding in is caved in
C Tsion is arrested
D Buck gets lost looking for his wife

#Q In the novel Nicolae, where is Amanda during The Wrath of the Lamb?
^ She is flying back to New Babylon when the wrath of the lamb occurs
A She is on a train when the wrath of the lamb occurs
B She is on a ship when the wrath of the lamb occurs
C She is on the ground when the wrath of the lamb occurs
D She is flying back to New Babylon when the wrath of the lamb occurs

#Q Among the new characters introduced in the novel Nicolae is Mac Macullum.  What is Macs job?
^ He is First Officer of the Condor 216
A He is First Officer of the Condor 216
B He is Minister of Propaganda for Nicolae Carpathia
C He is a military advisor
D He is employed as a peace keeper

#Q As the novel Nicolae ends, which 2 members of the Tribulation Force are unaccounted for?
^ Chloe and Amanda
A Amanda and Buck
B Chloe and Amanda
C Chloe and Rayford
D Chloe and Buck

#Q Who are Dr. Malones new friends in The Amber Spyglass?
^ Mulefa
A Gallevespians
B Tualapi
C Consistorial Court
D Mulefa

#Q What role will Dr. Malone play in Lyras destiny, in The Amber Spyglass?
^ The Serpent
A Adam
B The Serpent
C Eve
D God

#Q In the novel The Amber Spyglass, Father Gomez was sent by the Consistorial Court to guide Lyra to Dr. Malone.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Who are Lyra and Wills new guardians in The Amber Spyglass?
^ Chevalier Tialys and Lady Salmakia
A Chevalier Tialys and Lady Salmakia
B Dr. Malone and Father Gomez
C Serafina Pekkala  and Ruta Skadi
D Iorek Byrnisen and Lee Scoresby

#Q How does Lyra betray Pantalaimon in the book The Amber Spyglass?
^ She travels to the land of the dead without him.
A She gives him to Mrs. Coulter to fight Lord Asriel.
B She travels to the land of the dead without him.
C She gives him to Lord Asriel to fight Metatron.
D She has him severed from her.

#Q Which character of the book The Amber Spyglass sacrifices his/her life to save Lyra?
^ Both Lord Asriel and Mrs. Coulter
A Lord Asriel
B Both Lord Asriel and Mrs. Coulter
C Neither of them
D Mrs. Coulter

#Q How does Dr. Malone tempt Lyra in The Amber Spyglass?
^ With Stories of Love
A With Stories of Love
B With Stories Of Strength
C With Stories of Power
D With Stories of Knowledge

#Q Which character of the novel The Amber Spyglass calls Lyra to the Land of the Dead?
^ Roger
A Roger
B John Parry
C Lee Scoresby
D Stanislaus Gruuman

#Q What/who helps Lyra and Will get onto the boat of the dead in The Amber Spyglass?
^ Her death
A Her death
B Her father
C Her daemon
D Her angel

#Q How do Lyra and Will bring an end to death in The Amber Spyglass?
^ They open a door to a new world for the dead to escape.
A They open a door to a new world for the dead to escape.
B They discover the fountain of everlasting life.
C They seal the doorway to the land of the dead forever.
D They destroy the boatsmen to the land of the dead.

#Q What is the price the dead must pay for the Harpys guidance in The Amber Spyglass?
^ True stories of their life
A A kiss
B True stories of their life
C Two silver pieces; one for each eye
D Their soul

#Q Who does Lyra inadvertently destroy in The Amber Spyglass when trying to help him?
^ The Authority
A The Authority
B Balthamos
C Metatron
D Baruch

#Q Do Lyra and Will end up together at the end of The Amber Spyglass?
^ No
A No
B Yes

#Q What final form does Pantalaimon take at the end of The Amber Spyglass?
^ A pine marten
A A pine marten
B an ermine
C A cat
D A hummingbird

#Q What was the code name of the former head of the British Secret Service, who died of a heart attack a year prior to the events outlined in the book Tinker, Tailor, Soldier, Spy?
^ Control
A Chief
B M
C Control
D C

#Q In the novel Tinker, Tailor, Soldier, Spy, what was the name of the Operation launched by the former Head of the British Secret Service in a desperate attempt to root out the traitor in the Service?
^ Testify
A Testify
B Eagle
C Vengeance
D Witchcraft

#Q What does the phrase Tinker, Tailor, Soldier, Spy refer to in the novel of the same name?
^ code names for the British Intelligence Officers suspected of being the traitor
A code names for the British Intelligence Officers suspected of being the traitor
B a pass phrase used to identify friendly agents.
C an encryption key used to decipher intelligence material
D names of safe-houses used by the British Secret Service.

#Q Central to the plot of the novel Tinker, Tailor, Soldier, Spy is the fact that the New Head of the Service, Percy Alleline has come across a source supplying Soviet Intelligence. The name of the Intelligence supplied is codenamed Witchcraft, but what is the codename of the source supplying it?
^ Merlin
A Gandalf
B Witch of the East
C Genie
D Merlin

#Q Is it true that in the novel Tinker, Tailor, Soldier, Spy, the name of the Soviet spymaster running the Mole is Karlov?
^ No
A No
B Yes

#Q What is wrong with Meggies mother in the novel Inkspell?
^ She became mute.
A She cannot hear.
B She became mute.
C She is mentally disable.
D She is retarted.

#Q What is Meggies mothers name in the book Inkspell?
^ Resa
A Diane
B Sally
C Resa
D Jenny

#Q In the novel Inkspell, what animal always goes around with the black prince?
^ A bear
A A tiger
B A dog
C A bear
D A snake

#Q In the book Inkspell, whose house do Meggie and her parents live in?
^ Elinors house
A A house that they own
B Meggies aunts house
C Meggies uncles house
D Elinors house

#Q What does Farid secretly call Orpheus in the book Inkspell?
^ Cheeseface
A Moonhead
B Junkface
C Cheeseface
D Fatty

#Q What is Capricorns mothers name in the book Inkspell?
^ Mortola
A Julie
B Tori
C Mortola
D Meggie

#Q What is the name of the famous tight rope walker described in the novel Inkspell?
^ Cloud-Dancer
A Sheer-Pearl
B Cloud-Dancer
C Billy
D Ravenclaw

#Q What does Inkspell character Dustfinger call Meggies father?
^ Silvertongue
A Smelly
B Silvertongue
C Killertongue
D Bigfoot

#Q Who is the author of the novel Inkspell?
^ Cornelia Funke
A Frank Baum
B Cornelia Funke
C Judy Blume
D Clive Barker

#Q Jules Verne is often referred to as the Father of Science Fiction, along with what other author?
^ H.G. Wells
A George Orwell
B Charles Dickens
C William Golding
D H.G. Wells

#Q When he was twelve, Jules Verne crept onto a ship that was bound for India, and was caught and whipped by his father. What famous phrase did Jules Verne say after that?
^ I shall from now on only travel in my imagination.
A This shall not stop me, for it is pain that makes man grow stronger.
B You shall be sorry for this one day, father.
C Being curious really, really hurts.
D I shall from now on only travel in my imagination.

#Q What language did Jules Verne study at the boarding school at the Saint Donatien College, where he was sent at the age of nine?
^ Latin
A Greek
B English
C Latin
D Spanish

#Q What did Jules Verne study in Paris after completing his studies at the Lyceum?
^ Law
A Medicine
B Zoology
C Law
D Mathematics

#Q With what great French writer did Jules Verne establish a close friendship?
^ Alexandre Dumas, Sr.
A Alexandre Dumas, Sr.
B George Sand
C Stendhal
D Alexandre Chatrian

#Q This novel by Jules Verne, often called his lost novel, was written in 1863 and published for the first time in 1994. It tells the story of a young man who lives in a highly technologically advanced world.
^ Paris in the 20th Century
A The Will of an Eccentric
B Paris in the 20th Century
C Back to the Future
D The Flight to France

#Q What was the reason for Jules Vernes permanent limp with his left leg?
^ He was shot.
A He was shot.
B He tripped in his cat and broke his leg.
C He fell down a staircase.
D He was born with it.

#Q Jules Vernes publisher, Pierre-Jules Hetzel suggested that Verne make what kind of major changes in all of his works?
^ Introducing a more optimistic tone
A Employing more female characters
B Using shorter sentences.
C Introducing a more optimistic tone
D Simplifying his statements

#Q Which of these inventions did Jules Verne predict in his novels written in the 19th century?
^ All of these
A Air conditioning
B Jukeboxes
C The Internet
D All of these

#Q What novel by Jules Verne was used as a base for a 2008 3-D science fiction movie directed by Eric Brevig?
^ Journey to the Center of the Earth
A From the Earth to the Moon
B Twenty Thousand Leagues Under the Sea
C Off on a Comet
D Journey to the Center of the Earth

#Q What do the initials T. S. stand for in the name of the famous poet T. S. Eliot?
^ Thomas Stearns
A Tory Saunders
B Terry Stephens
C Theodore Sallings
D Thomas Stearns

#Q T. S. Eliot was the last of 6 children surviving. How old were his parents when he was born?
^ 44
A 44
B 28
C 33
D 38

#Q T. S. Eliots father, who came from a prominent New England family, was on the Board of Directors of Washington University. He was also a Chairman at Hydraulic-Press Brick Company in St. Louis, a successful business man and a chemist. He married Eliots mother in 1868. What was her occupation?
^ A poet and a social worker
A A homemaker
B A chemist and a painter
C A poet and a social worker
D A music teacher at Washington University

#Q T. S. Eliot attended this prestigious Ivy League college, editing its literary magazine with Pulitzer- winning poet Conrad Aiken.
^ Harvard
A Dartmouth
B Harvard
C Duke
D Yale

#Q While a doctoral student, T. S. Eliot studied Buddhism and Indic philology, learning Sanskrit and Pāli to read the religious texts. What languages did Eliot study/learn in prep school and college?
^ Latin, Greek, French, and German
A Latin and Greek
B German, Polish, Russian
C Latin, Greek, French, and German
D Spanish, Italian, Latin

#Q In April 1915, T. S. Eliot met  Vivienne Haigh-Wood, a governess in Cambridge. They were married on 26 June 1915. Where were they married?
^ In a local register office
A At the Eliot family church outside of Boston
B At Eliots family home in St. Louis
C In a local register office
D At a church in Oxford

#Q After marriage, T. S. Eliot gave up writing his dissertation, and never received his PhD.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q After leaving college in Oxford, T. S. Eliot took a teaching job at Highgate School. There he taught this future British Poet Laureate, documentarian of Metro-land, and self-described poet and hack.
^ Sir John Betjeman
A Scofield Thayer
B James Joyce
C Collin Brooks
D Sir John Betjeman

#Q While a student at Harvard, T. S. Eliot befriended this Spanish-born philosopher, essayist, poet, and novelist who wrote in Reason in Common Sense, Those who cannot remember the past, are condemned to repeat it.
^ George Santayana
A Ezra Pound
B Bertrand Russell
C Alexis de Tocqueville
D George Santayana

#Q What famous poem by T. S. Eliot was considered offensive and upsetting because of its opening lines describing the dusky sky as a patient etherised upon a table.?
^ The Love Song of J. Alfred Prufrock
A The Hollow Men
B The Love Song of J. Alfred Prufrock
C The Waste Land
D The Cocktail Party

#Q First published in 1915, this poem by T. S. Eliot portrays upper class society as quite empty and lonely. Its epigraph is from Marlowes The Jew of Malta-
 ...but that was in another country, / And besides, the wench is dead.
^ Portrait of a Lady
A Portrait of a Lady
B The Love Song of J. Alfred Prufrock
C Sweeney Among the Nightingales
D The Hollow Men

#Q In 1920, T. S. Eliot published the collection Poems. It included the poem Gerontion. What famous phrase, often used to describe espionage and counter-intelligence, comes from this poem?
^ wilderness of mirrors
A a tumid river
B three trees against a low sky
C wilderness of mirrors
D this was all folly

#Q In his book Lies and the Lying Liars Who Tell Them, Al Franken refers to this radio talk show host as a Big Fat Idiot.
^ Rush Limbaugh
A Sean Hannity
B Ed Schultz
C Rush Limbaugh
D Bill OReilly

#Q In his book Lies and the Lying Liars Who Tell Them, Franken writes that these two words are Bill OReillys answer to any intelligent liberal comment.
^ shut up
A wrong again
B dream on
C no chance
D shut up

#Q Al Franken is critical of this veteran news journalist, famous as managing editor of the Fox News Channel.
^ Brit Hume
A Brit Hume
B Rupert Murdoch
C Tony snow
D Fred Barnes

#Q Who is Al Franken talking about when he says, He had us all supporting him and united after 9/11 and then he created a war in Iraq and he will never really have Mission Accomplished?
^ George W. Bush
A George W. Bush
B Dick Cheney
C Rush Limbaugh
D Bill Clinton

#Q Why did Al Franken choose to run as a Democrat according to Franken himself?
^ They care more about the poor than the Republicans
A Ann Coulter will never say she likes me again.
B They care more about the poor than the Republicans
C Rush is a Republican.
D Paul Wellstone would have wanted me to do that.

#Q What is the name of the church that Rayford Steele, Chloe Steele, Buck Williams and Bruce Barnes are members of in the second novel in the Left Behind series?
^ New Hope Village Church
A New Hope Christian Church
B Hope Christian Church
C New Beginnings Church
D New Hope Village Church

#Q Who coined the name Tribulation Force for the group portrayed in the second book of the series Left Behind?
^ Chloe
A Rayford
B Bruce
C Chloe
D Buck

#Q Fictional characters Both Buck and Rayford go to work for Nicolae Carpathia in Tribulation Force.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Hattie Durham becomes romantically involved with which character in Tribulation Force?
^ Nicolae
A Ken Ritz
B Nicolae
C Rayford
D Buck

#Q One of the most interesting characters introduced in Tribulation Force is Rabinnacal Scholar Tsion (pronounced Zee-own) Ben-Judah, who made a startling announcement to the whole world that put him and his family in jeopardy. What was his announcement?
^ He believed Jesus was the promised Messiah.
A He believed Jesus was the promised Messiah.
B He believed Nicolae was the Messiah promised in the Torrah.
C He believed Nicolae was the Anti-Christ.
D He believed Nicolae would unite the world into a glorious utopia.

#Q Both Rayford and his daughter Chloe are married in Tribulation Force
^ True
A False
B True

#Q The American Military moves against Nicolae in the book Tribulation Force
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Nicolae Carpathia, the main antagonist in the Left Behind series, institutes a one-world religion.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q What stunning announcement does Hattie make near the end of Tribulation Force?
^ She is pregnant with Nicolaes child.
A Her and Nicolae are getting married.
B She is pregnant with Rayfords child.
C She is pregnant with Nicolaes child.
D She is becoming a Christian.

#Q Which member of the Tribulation Force dies at the end of the self-titled novel?
^ Bruce
A Buck
B Bruce
C Chloe
D Rayford

#Q What was Dick Franciss profession before he became a writer?
^ Jockey
A Jockey
B Pharmacist
C Bookmaker
D Accounting clerk

#Q What was the first novel Dick Francis wrote?
^ Dead Cert
A Nerve
B Second Wind
C Bolt
D Dead Cert

#Q In what novel by Dick Francis does the popular character Sid Halley first appear?
^ Odds Against
A Blood Sport
B Odds Against
C Flying Finish
D For Kicks

#Q Sid Halley, the protagonist of several novels by Dick Francis, is disabled. What is the nature of his disability?
^ He has only one hand.
A He is deaf.
B He has only one hand.
C He is a paraplegic.
D He is blind.

#Q Only two Dick Francis characters appear as the protagonist of more than one book. Sid Halley is one of them. Who is the other?
^ Kit Fielding
A Kit Fielding
B William Derry
C David Cleveland
D Andrew Douglas

#Q What is the profession of Charles Todd in the novel In the Frame?
^ Painter
A Pilot
B Painter
C Architect
D Jockey

#Q How many non-fiction books did Dick Francis write in the 20th century?
^ two
A three
B two
C five
D none

#Q Why didnt Dick Francis win the 1956 Grand National when he was a jump jockey for the Queen Mother?
^ His horse fell.
A He didnt ride in it.
B He fell off.
C His horse fell.
D It wasnt held that year.

#Q What was the popular rumor that circulated about Dick Franciss books?
^ His wife wrote them.
A He paid a ghostwriter to write them.
B His son wrote them.
C His wife wrote them.
D They contained subliminal messages.

#Q What did Dick Francis do after the death of his wife?
^ He began collaborating with his younger son Felix.
A He began training racehorses.
B He began collaborating with his older son Merrick.
C None of these
D He began collaborating with his younger son Felix.

#Q The members of the Pretty Committee, described in the novel The Clique, get kicked out of school.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Kristen Gregory from the book The Clique is rich and always wears designer clothes.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q In the novel The Clique, what school do the members of the Pretty Committee go to?
^ OCD
A DDR
B OCD
C WHMS
D CCD

#Q Who is the Pretty Committees second in command in the book The Clique?
^ Dylan
A None of these
B Massie
C Dylan
D Alicia

#Q Who comes back with Alicia from Spain in Lisi Harrisons The Clique?
^ Nina
A Spencer
B Nina
C None of these
D Jose

#Q What movie does The Clique character Claire get a part in?
^ Dial L for Loser
A Dial P for Popular
B Dial D for Dead
C Dial L for Loser
D Dial A for Alive

#Q The Clique protagonist Massie Block has a pet in the book.
^ True
A False
B True


#Q Call me Ishmael.
With the above line, the narrator of this 1851 novel by Herman Melville laconically introduces himself in the very first sentence, making it one of the best-known opening sentences in English literature.
^ Moby-Dick
A Mardi: And a Voyage Thither
B Moby-Dick
C Redburn
D The Confidence-Man

#Q There were four of us. 
This is the beginning of a humorous story of 1889 by Jerome K. Jerome, which has some real-life characters and was initially intended to be a serious work, but ended up one of the most successful comedy books, with a humour that has proven to be fresh and witty even nowadays.
^ Three Men in a Boat
A The Diary of a Pilgrimage
B They and I
C The Idle Thoughts of an Idle Fellow
D Three Men in a Boat

#Q It was a pleasure to burn.
This popular novel by Ray Bradbury, depicting a fictional world of the near future, is in fact an indirect condemnation of the present and a considerate warning about the forthcoming fate of human society.
^ Fahrenheit 451
A Vanity Fair
B The Good Life
C Fahrenheit 451
D The Martian Chronicles

#Q No one would have believed, in the last years of the nineteenth century, that human affairs were being watched keenly and closely by intelligences greater than mans and yet as mortal as his own; that as men busied themselves about their affairs they were scrutinized and studied, perhaps almost as narrowly as a man with a microscope might scrutinize the transient creatures that swarm and multiply in a drop of water. 
This is the beginning of this Herbert Wells intense and suspenseful novel, where the existence of the world and human kind has been put in jeopardy.
^ The War of the Worlds
A Little Wars
B The Invisible Man
C The Chronic Argonauts
D The War of the Worlds

#Q It was the best of times, it was the worst of times. is the beginning of this famous Dickens historical novel, concerning the French Revolution and dealing with some timeless moral issues, such as guilt, treachery and patriotism.
^ A Tale of Two Cities
A Great Expectations
B David Copperfield
C Nicholas Nickleby
D A Tale of Two Cities

#Q It can hardly be a coincidence that no language on Earth has ever produced the expression as pretty as an airport.
As is typical for author Douglas Adams, this 1988 detective novel begins with a humorous and unusual line, grabbing attention from the very first sentence.
^ The Long Dark Tea-Time of the Soul
A The Long Dark Tea-Time of the Soul
B The Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy
C Life, the Universe and Everything
D The Restaurant at the End of the Universe

#Q If you really want to hear about it, the first thing youll probably want to know is where I was born, and what my lousy childhood was like, and how my parents were occupied and all before they had me, and all that David Copperfield kind of crap, but I dont feel like going into it, if you want to know the truth. 
Being one of the most controversial and widely disputed literary works of the 20th century, this novel by J. D. Salinger has been banned several times in the United States for inappropriate and immoral content.
^ The Catcher in the Rye
A The Catcher in the Rye
B Franny and Zooey
C The Laughing Man
D The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn

#Q It is a truth universally acknowledged that a single man in possession of a good fortune must be in want of a wife.
Name the famous Jane Austens novel, beginning with those words, concerning the problems of love and marriage, which was initially entitled First Impressions?.
^ Pride and Prejudice
A Pride and Prejudice
B Lady Susan
C Emma
D Sense and Sensibility

#Q This happened in 1932, when the state penitentiary was still at Cold Mountain. And the electric chair was there, too, of course.
In this Stephen King novel, these are the leading character and narrators first words of the story of his life, and the unusual encounter which changes it forever.
^ The Green Mile
A It
B Insomnia
C The Eyes of the Dragon
D The Green Mile

#Q Happy families are all alike; every unhappy family is unhappy in its own way.
Arguably the best of his works, Tolstoy severely criticizes the highest circles of Russian society through this tragic love story of two of its members, one of them being Alexei Vronsky.
^ Anna Karenina 
A Anna Karenina
B A Confession
C The Power of Darkness
D Family Happiness

#Q Both in the year when Mark Twain was born and the year when he died, the Halleys Comet passed by Earth.
-Mark borrowed his pseudonym from Mississippi riverboat terminology, where calling “mark twain? marked safe water.
^ Samuel Langhorne Clemens
A Don Novello
B Samuel Langhorne Clemens
C Charles Farrar Browne
D Johann Kaspar Schmidt

#Q This romantic hero is a wealthy gentleman who at first feels superior to Elizabeth Bennet and ignores her. Later, however, he falls in love with her, which is a blow to his pride.
^ Mr. Darcy
A Colonel Forster
B Paul Morel
C Mr. Bingley
D Mr. Darcy

#Q This literary character from the only novel of Emily Bronte is passionately and intensely in love with Cathrine Earnshow, but she marries someone else because of her desire for social advancement.
^ Heathcliff
A Edward Rochester
B Arthur Morel
C Heathcliff
D Roger Chillingworth

#Q This literary character has an obssessive love affair with Mildred Rogers, a shallow and self-centerd woman he encounters in London.
^ Philip Carey
A Philip Carey
B Dorian Gray
C Nick Caraway
D Atticus Finch

#Q This fictional hero falls in love with his employee, the governess Jane Eyre, but their wedding ceremony is interrupted by the announcement that he has a wife who lives in the attic of his manor, Thornfield Hall.
^ Edward Rochester
A William Lucas
B Fitzgerald Darcy
C Edward Rochester
D Edward Gardiner

#Q This romantic hero is obsessed with the beautiful Fermina Daza. He waits more than 50 years for her husband to die and declares his love for her.
^ Florentino Ariza
A Pedro Tercero
B Esteban Trueba
C Juvenal Urbino
D Florentino Ariza

#Q This mysterious literary hero acquired an immense wealth in order to win back his beloved Daisy, who had married Tom Buchanan.
^ Jay Gatsby
A Jordan Baker
B George Wilson
C Jay Gatsby
D Nick Caraway

#Q This American officer, the literary creation of Ernest Hemingway, deserts World War I  and escapes to Switzerland with his beloved Catherine Barkley.
^ Frederic Henry
A Nick Caraway
B Frederic Henry
C Jake Barnes
D Nick Carter

#Q This romantic literary character loves passionately Estella, a beautiful girl, brought up by the cold, wealthy and eccentric Miss Havisham.
^ Pip
A David Copperfield
B Pip
C Oliver Twist
D Wilkins Micawber

#Q This pragmatic and opportunistic literary hero is attracted by the pretty and coquettish Scarlett OHara.
^ Rhett Butler
A Oliver Mellors
B Rhett Butler
C Angel Clare
D Gerald O’Hara

#Q This literary character, depicted by the Victorian writer Thomas Hardy, escapes with Tess, the woman he loves, although she had committed a murder.
^ Angel Clare
A Philip Carey
B Oliver Mellors
C Angel Clare
D Alec dUrberville

#Q In this novel the main character, Rodion Razkolnikov, who lives in St. Petersburg, murders an old pawnbroker and her younger sister, and later, gets overwhelmed by feelings of paranoia and self-loathing.
^ Crime and Punishment
A War and Peace
B Ana Karenina
C Sleeping Murder
D Crime and Punishment

#Q In this novel, American millionaire Samuel Edward Ratchett is found stabbed to death during a journey. The case is investigated by detective Hercule Poarot, who is also among the passengers.
^ ‘Murder on the Orient Express’
A ‘Fatal Vision’
B ‘Murder on the Orient Express’
C ‘Death Upon the Nile’
D ‘A Carribean Mystery’

#Q In the novel ‘A Study In Scarlet’, the word ‘RACHE’ is written in blood on the wall of a deserted house beside a dead body. Name the literary detective who investigates the case.
^ Sherlock Holmes
A Sherlock Holmes
B Drury Lane
C Hercule Poirot
D Perry Mason

#Q In this famous play Claudius murders his brother, the King of Denmark, and marries the widowed Queen Gertrude.
^ Hamlet
A ‘The Merchant of Venice’
B King Lear
C ‘The Tempest’
D Hamlet

#Q In this novel, private eye Philip Marlowe is arrested on suspicion of the murder of Terry Lenox’s wife. After Marlowe is released, he finds out that Terry Lenox, himself, has committed suicide in Mexico. When Marlowe gets home, he finds a cryptic note from Lenox and a $5000 bill.
^ ‘The Long Goodbye’
A ‘The Purloined Letter’
B ‘The Moving Finger’
C ‘The Long Goodbye’
D ‘Playback’

#Q In this book, based on a true story, Truman Capote recounts the murders of Herb Clutter, a rich farmer from Kansas, his wife Bonnie, his sixteen-year-old daughter Nancy, and his fifteen-year-old son, Kenyon.
^ ‘In Cold Blood’
A ‘In Cold Blood’
B ‘The Glass Key’
C ‘The Moving Target’
D ‘Red Harvest’

#Q In this bestseller, based on a real case and written by Joe McGinnis, Jeffrey MacDonald is accused of killing his pregnant wife and two young daughters.
^ ‘Fatal Vision’
A ‘Red Harvest’
B ‘The Thin Man’
C ‘The Big Knockover’
D ‘Fatal Vision’

#Q This author wrote ‘The Road to Gandolfo’, a story in which the former General MacKenzie Hawkins makes up an outrageous plan to kidnap the Pope and to demand a ransom of $400 million – a dollar for every Catholic in the world.
^ Robert Ludlum
A Robert Ludlum
B Daniel de Silva
C Dan Brown
D Michael Avallone

#Q This novel is narrated by the fictional character Frank Chambers, a drifter who stops at a roadside diner and meets ‘femme fatale’, Cora. After starting an affair, Cora and Frank murder Cora’s husband, Nick Papadakis, who is the owner of the diner.
^ ‘The Postman Always Rings Twice’
A ‘Death in the Afternoon’
B ‘Woman in the Dark’
C ‘The Partridge Family’
D ‘The Postman Always Rings Twice’

#Q In this novel, written by Agatha Christie, the Banty family discover in their library the dead body of a young woman. Later, the remains of another dead girl are found in a nearby quarry. Which detective investigates the case?
^ Miss Jane Marple
A Father Brown
B Auguste Dupin
C Miss Jane Marple
D Hercule Poirot

#Q How many works did Stephen King write under the pseudonym Richard Bachman?
^ 6
A 5
B 3
C 6
D 4

#Q In the horror novel From a Buick 8, strange reptiles crawled out of the trunk of a car.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q What is the name of Jacks werewolf friend in the novel The Talisman?
^ Wolf
A Wolf
B Mike
C Harry
D Jojo

#Q What was one of Randall Flaggs nicknames in Stephen Kings novel The Stand?
^ the walking dude
A the running man
B Mutimbo
C el diablo
D the walking dude

#Q In Stephen Kings novel The Girl Who Loved Tom Gordon, what position did Tom Gordon play for the Boston Red Sox?
^ relief picher
A relief picher
B shortstop
C catcher
D right field

#Q In the novel Dolores Claiborne, what is the name of Dolores Claibornes daughter?
^ Selena St. George
A Selena Claiborne
B Crystal Claiborne
C Anita Claiborne
D Selena St. George

#Q What is the name of the mouse in the book The Green Mile?
^ Mr. Jingles
A Mr. Mousie
B Mr. Bojangles
C Mr. Delacroix
D Mr. Jingles

#Q In which of the parts that Tolkien originally divided the book in do Aragorn, Gimli, and Legolas decide to go after Merry and Pippin in The Two Towers?
^ First
A Seventh
B Second
C Third
D First

#Q In the book Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers,  does Gollum ever decide to be on Frodos side?
^ No
A Yes
B No

#Q In the book, Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers, does Eowyn have romantic interest in Aragorn?
^ Yes
A No
B Yes

#Q Does Aragorn ever really have a doubt about his place on the throne of Gondor In the book, Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers?
^ No
A No
B Yes

#Q Is Wormtongue really sad when he sees the army of Uruk-Hai in the book, Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers?
^ Not in the least
A Maybe
B Yes
C A little
D Not in the least

#Q In the book, Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers, does Aragorn fall off of a cliff?
^ No
A Yes
B No

#Q Do the orcs ride wolves in the book, Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers?
^ Yes
A Yes
B No

#Q They hand in hand, with wandering steps  and slow,
Through Eden took their solitary way is from a work by this author.
^ John Milton
A John Milton
B James Joyce
C Geoffrey Chaucer
D William Shakespeare

#Q The Diary of a Madman
^ Guy de Maupassant
A Edgar Allan Poe
B Allen Adler
C Guy de Maupassant
D Sheridan le Fanu

#Q Servant of the Bones
^ Anne Rice
A Agatha Christie
B Leo Tolstoy
C Anne Rice
D James Patterson

#Q The Hellbound Heart
^ Clive Barker
A Clive Barker
B Edgar Allan Poe
C None of these
D Richard Matheson

#Q The Tell-tale Heart
^ Edgar Allan Poe
A Richard Christian Matheson
B none of these
C Edgar Allan Poe
D Clive Barker

#Q The Talisman; Black House
^ Both
A Peter Straub
B Both
C Neither
D Stephen King

#Q As I Lay Dying
^ William Faulkner
A Mark Twain
B Edgar Rice Burroughs
C none of these
D William Faulkner

#Q Battlefield Earth
^ None of these
A None of these
B Henry Kissinger
C Tom Robbins
D Charles Beaumont

#Q The Dunwich Horror; The Colour Out of Space; The Dream-Quest of Unknown Kadath
^ H.P. Lovecraft
A Lord Dunsany
B Poppy Z. Brite
C C.J. Cherryh
D H.P. Lovecraft

#Q The Devils Dictionary
^ Ambrose Bierce
A Stephen King
B Ambrose Bierce
C Beelzebub
D Truman Capote

#Q The Doll Who Ate His Mother
^ Ramsey Campbell
A Chucky
B Ramsey Campbell
C Clive Barker
D Jack Kerouac

#Q Which Scottish poet, born in 1759, wrote the famous song Auld Lang Syne which goes like this:
Should auld acquaintance be forgot,
and never brought to mind?
Should auld acquaintance be forgot,
and auld lang syne.
^ Robert Burns
A Robert Burns
B Walter Scott
C Oscar Wilde
D Bob Dylan

#Q How old was the prominent English poet John Keats when he died in 1821?
^ 26 years old
A 26 years old
B 56 years old
C 46 years old
D 16 years old

#Q Which one of these plays by English poet and playwright William Shakespeare is not a comedy?
^ Macbeth
A Macbeth
B A Midsummer Nights Dream
C Loves Labours Lost
D As You Like It

#Q Which one of these poems was written by American Modernist poet T. S. Eliot and describes his feeling of depression and pessimism about society after World War I?
^ The Hollow Men
A Childe Harold
B The Times They Are a-Changin
C The Hollow Men
D The Road Not Taken

#Q This American poet, born in 1874, won the Pulitzer Prize four times and recited his poem The Gift Outright at the inauguration of U.S. President John F. Kennedy.
^ Robert Frost
A Robert Nesta Marley
B Robert Louis Stevenson
C Robert Frost
D Robert Burns

#Q Which Anglo-Scottish poet, author of Childe Harolds Pilgrimage, died in Greece where he participated in the fight for the countrys independence?
^ George Gordon Byron
A Oscar Wilde
B George Gordon Byron
C William Blake
D Walt Whitman

#Q Which famous work by American poet Henry W. Longfellow was based on the legends of the Ojibway Indians?
^ The Song of Hiawatha
A Paul Reveres Ride
B The Evening Star
C The Song of Hiawatha
D Evangeline

#Q Which Norwegian band used William Blakes influential poem The Marriage of Heaven and Hell as lyrics for their 1998 album Themes from William Blakes The Marriage of Heaven and Hell?
^ Ulver
A Immortal
B Isengard
C Ulver
D Dimmu Borgir

#Q Which one of these poems from Walt Whitmans masterpiece collection Leaves of Grass was dedicated to U.S. President Abraham Lincoln?
^ O Captain! My Captain!
A O Captain! My Captain!
B Out of the Cradle Endlessly Rocking
C Song of Myself
D I Sing the Body Electric

#Q The title of the 2004 movie Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind was taken from the poem Eloisa to Abelard written by which English poet?
^ Alexander Pope
A Percy Bysshe Shelley
B Edgar Allan Poe
C Alfred Tennyson
D Alexander Pope

#Q And Richard Cory, one calm summer night,
Went home and put a bullet through his head.
^ Edwin Arlington Robinson
A Edwin Arlington Robinson
B Randall Jarrell
C John Berryman
D Luke Havergall

#Q From my mothers sleep, I fell into the State.
I hunched in its body till my wet fur froze.
Sis miles from earth, loosed from its dream of life...
When I died they washed me out of the turret with a hose.
^ Randall Jarrell
A Wallace Stevens
B Randall Jarrell
C John Crowe Ransom
D Robinson Jeffers

#Q Success is counted sweetest
by those who never succeed.
To comprehend a nectar
requires the sorest need.
^ Emily Dickinson
A Hilda Doolittle
B Gertrude Stein
C None of these
D Emily Dickinson

#Q A heap of broken images, where the Sun beats...
I will show you fear in a handful of dust.
^ T.S. Eliot
A T.S. Eliot
B Gertrude Stein
C Ezra Pound
D Allen Ginsberg

#Q I spit upon this dreadful bankers grave
who shot his heart out in a Florida dawn
O ho alas alas
When will indifference come, I moan  rave
Id like to scrabble till I got right down
away down under the grass
^ John Berryman
A Philip Booth
B None of these
C John Berryman
D Hart Crane

#Q I saw a man pursuing the horizon;
 Round and round they sped.
 I was disturbed at this;
 I accosted the man.
 It is futile, I said.
 You can never —
 You lie, he cried,
 And ran on.
^ Stephen Crane
A Stephen Crane
B Walt Whitman
C Denise Levertov
D Robert Lowell

#Q I have gone out, a possessed witch, 
haunting the black air, braver at night; 
dreaming evil, I have done my hitch 
over the plain houses, light by light: 
lonely thing, twelve-fingered, out of mind. 
A woman like that is not a woman, quite. 
I have been her kind.
^ Anne Sexton
A Gwendolyn Brooks
B Sylvia Plath
C Anne Sexton
D Emily Dickinson

#Q I was ten when they buried you.
At twenty I tried to die
And get back, back, back to you.
I thought even the bones would do.
But they pulled me out of the sack,
And they stuck me together with glue.
And then I knew what to do.
I made a model of you,
A man in black with a Meinkampf look
^ Sylvia Plath
A Joyce Carol Oates
B Anne Sexton
C June Jordan
D Sylvia Plath

#Q In which book by Mark Twain is Jim a major character?
^ Huckleberry Finn
A The Celebrated Jumping Frog of Calaveras County
B Huckleberry Finn
C The Adventures of Tom Sawyer
D Puddnhead Wilson

#Q In which novel does the evil Injun Joe appear?
^ The Adventures of Tom Sawyer
A The Adventures of Tom Sawyer
B A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthurs Court
C The Man That Corrupted Hadleyburg
D Letters From the Earth

#Q In which work by Mark Twain do we find Adam and Eve writing their diaries?
^ Letters from the Earth
A Innocents Abroad
B The Mysterious Stranger
C Letters from the Earth
D The Gilded Age

#Q Which story features a character named Jim Smiley who was responsible for one of the tallest tales of the Old West?
^ The Celebrated Jumping Frog of Calaveras County
A Roughing It
B Innocents Abroad
C The Celebrated Jumping Frog of Calaveras County
D At Adams Tomb

#Q Sir Boss is the protagonist of which novel?
^ A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthurs Court
A A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthurs Court
B Letters from the Earth
C Roughing It
D The Prince and the Pauper

#Q Aunt Polly is a character from which book?
^ The Adventures of Tom Sawyer
A Roughing it
B Life on the Mississippi
C Huckleberry Finn
D The Adventures of Tom Sawyer

#Q In which novel did Mark Twain- Special Travelling Correspondent of the Alta appear?
^ The Innocents Abroad
A The Innocents Abroad
B Life on the Mississippi
C The Damned Human Race
D The Gilded Age

#Q In this novel we find Cal Higbie and Mark Twain celebrating the curious time when the two were millionaires for ten days?
^ Roughing It
A Life on the Mississippi
B Innocents Abroad
C The Gilded Age
D Roughing It

#Q In which novel do the Duke and the King do their best to swindle god-fearin folk?
^ Huckleberry Finn
A A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthurs Court
B Huckleberry Finn
C A Tramp Abroad
D The Mysterious Stranger

#Q In which story does Danl Webster appear as a leading character?
^ The Celebrated Jumping Frog
A The Celebrated Jumping Frog
B The Prince and the Pauper
C Innocents Abroad
D Letters from the Earth

#Q This history play by Shakespeare, focusing on a kings Machiavellian rise to power and subsequent reign of terror, contains the following exchange:
No beast so fierce but knows some touch of pity. 
But I know none, and therefore am no beast.
^ Richard III
A Henry V
B Julius Caesar
C Richard III
D King John

#Q This pastoral comedy contains one of Shakespeares most quoted monologues, which opens with the lines, All the worlds a stage,
And all the men and women merely players.
^ As You Like It
A The Winters Tale
B The Merry Wives of Windsor
C As You Like It
D A Midsummer Nights Dream

#Q Dying is an art like everything else. I do it so it feels like hell. I do it so it feels real.
^ Sylvia Plath
A Gregory Corso
B Anne Sexton
C Emily Dickenson
D Sylvia Plath

#Q I saw the best minds of my generation destroyed by madness, starving, hysterical, naked
^ Allen Ginsburg
A Maye Swenson
B Allen Ginsburg
C Gregory Orr
D Lawrence Ferlenghetti

#Q Preface to a Twenty Volume Suicide Note
^ Immamu Amiri Baraka
A Anne Sexton
B Immamu Amiri Baraka
C Sylvia Plath
D Hart Crane

#Q Penetrating a Fresh Abyss
^ David Payne, Jr.
A David Payne, Jr.
B Robert Haas
C Robert Frost
D Edgar Allan Poe

#Q This is the way they ring the bells in Bedlam
^ Anne Sexton
A Theodore Roethke
B Anne Sexton
C T.S. Eliot
D Dylan Thomas

#Q Why talk of beauty? What could be more beautiful than these heroic happy dead who rushed like lions to the roaring slaughter? They did not stop to think--they died instead. Then shall the voice of liberty be mute?
^ E. E. Cummings
A None of these
B Allen Ginsberg
C E. E. Cummings
D Sharon Olds

#Q In the desert I saw a creature naked, bestial. Squatting on the ground he held his heart in his hands and ate of it. I asked Is it good, friend? It is bitter--bitter he replied but I like it because it is bitter and because it is my heart.
^ Stephen Crane
A Stephen Crane
B William Carlos Williams
C Elizabeth Bishop
D Hilda Doolittle

#Q We are the hollow men. We are the stuffed men. Leaning together-- headpiece filled with straw--alas! Our dried voices when we whisper together are meaningless as wind in dry grass or rats feet over broken glass in our dry cellar....This is the way the world ends not with a bang but a whimper.
^ T.S. Eliot
A T.S. Eliot
B June Jordan
C Robert Penn Warren
D Stephen King

#Q The Book of Nightmares
^ Galway Kinnel
A Galway Kinnel
B Gary Snyder
C David Bottoms
D James Tate

#Q In the novel Twilight, Bellas dad Charlie buys her an old Chevy truck as a homecoming gift. What colour is it?
^ Red
A Blue
B Silver
C Black
D Red

#Q Though it is girls choice, who asks Bella to the spring dance in the book Twilight?
^ All of these
A Tyler Crowley
B Mike Newton
C Eric Yorkie
D All of these

#Q In the book Twilight, Edward says he is 17, but admits he has been 17 for a while. In what year was he actually born?
^ 1901
A 1917
B 1901
C 1801
D 1918

#Q Bella, the protagonist of the novel Twilight, is tracked by a vampire intent on killing her. What is his name?
^ James
A Laurent
B George
C John
D James

#Q In the novel Twilight, Jasper is the newest member of the Cullen family and the last to adopt their vegetarian diet.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q During his round of questions in the novel Twilight, Edward asks Bella what her favourite gemstone is, to which she immediately answers Topaz, the colour of Edwards eyes. Until recently she would have given a different answer. What did her favourite gemstone use to be?
^ Garnet
A Ruby
B Onyx
C Amethyst
D Garnet

#Q In chapter 6 of the novel Twilight, Mike Newton organises a beach trip to this beach.
^ First Beach
A First Beach
B Forks Beach
C Forrest Beach
D La Push Beach

#Q In the novel Twilight, Carlisle found Edward whilst working in a hospital in Chicago. What was Edward dying of?
^ Spanish Influenza
A Tuberculosis
B Spanish Influenza
C Typhoid Fever
D Scarlet Fever

#Q What game do the Cullens play in the thunderstorm in the novel Twilight?
^ Baseball
A Basketball
B Football
C Cricket
D Baseball

#Q In the novel Twilight, who accompanied Bella, when she went to Phoenix to try escape the tracker?
^ Alice and Jasper
A Esme and Carlisle
B Alice and Jasper
C Edward and Carlisle
D Rosalie and Emmett

#Q What American hero does Henry Wadsworth Longfellow write about in this poem:
Through all our history, to the last,
In the hour of darkness, and peril, and need,
The people will waken and listen to hear
The hurrying hoof-beats of that stead
And the midnight message of?
^ Paul Revere
A Patrick Henry
B Ethan Allen
C Paul Revere
D George Washington

#Q This poet, who is famous for his use of lowercase letters and word space, wrote the following:
in Just-
spring  when the world is mud
luscious the little lamebaloonman
whistles
              far
                    and    wee.
^ e e cummings
A e e cummings
B A. E houseman
C Carl Sandburg
D T. S Elliot

#Q What is the name of this poem by Edna St. Vincent Millay:
My candle burns at both ends;
It will not last the night;
But ah, my foes, and oh, my friends-
It gives a lovely light!?
^ First Fig
A Candlelight
B Friends and Foes
C First Fig
D Before Morning

#Q In 2008, EW.com asked readers for their choice for favorite author of the last 25 years. Which author
received the most votes?
^ J. K. Rowling
A Nora Roberts
B J. K. Rowling
C John Grisham
D Steven King

#Q Lestat was made into a vampire by Marius.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q In The Vampire Chronicles Akasha was known as the Mother of all Vampires
^ Yes
A No
B Yes

#Q What is the full name of Bastian, the main character in the book The Neverending Story?
^ None of these
A Bastian Burrthar Buc
B Bastian Benlazar Buz
C None of these
D Bastian Balzazar Bux

#Q In Michael Endes novel, The Neverending Story, Bastian stole The Neverending Story from Mr. Smith.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Atreyu, one of the characters in the book The Neverending Story, is what kind of warrior?
^ Greenskin warrior
A Greenskin warrior
B Orangeskin warrior
C Blueskin warrior
D Purpleskin warrior

#Q What is Ygramuls secrete in the fantasy novel, The Neverending Story?
^ It has magic poison.
A It is afraid of fire.
B It is an elfs servant.
C If direct sunlight hits it, it dies.
D It has magic poison.

#Q What kind of dragon is Falkor in Michael Endes novel The Neverending Story?
^ A Luck dragon
A A Holy dragon
B A Mystic dragon
C A Luck dragon
D A Moon-light dragon

#Q Where did Atreyus horse die in the fantasy novel, The Neverending Story?
^ in the Swamps of Sadness
A in the Swamp of Misfortune
B None of these
C in the Swamp of Death
D in the Swamps of Sadness

#Q In the book The Neverending Story, what kind of creature is Engywook?
^ Gnome
A Goblin
B Gnome
C Elf
D Troll

#Q Uyulala, is a character in the novel The Neverending Story, that only speaks in rhymes.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q How many wind giants are there in the book The Neverending Story?
^ 4
A 5
B 3
C 4
D 2

#Q What name does Bastian give to the Childlike Empress in The Neverending Story?
^ Moon Child
A Moon Child
B none of these.
C Sun Child
D Star Child

#Q This conservative, aristocratic poet and novelist was the pride of both Scotland and England. His martial poetry was an inspiration during war. What author of “Waverly” penned the following poem?
Sound, sound the clarion, fill the fife!
To all the sensual world proclaim,
One crowded hour of glorious life
Is worth an age without a name.
^ Sir Walter Scott
A Rudyard Kipling
B Sir Walter Scott
C Thomas Carlyle
D Thomas DeQuincy

#Q Who wrote these famous lines and in what poem can they be found?
“Beauty is truth, truth beauty,
That is all ye know on earth, 
And all ye need to know.
^ Keats—Ode on a Grecian Urn
A Shelly—Ozymandias
B Shelly—To a Skylark
C Keats—Ode to a Nightingale
D Keats—Ode on a Grecian Urn

#Q He was a close friend of Wordsworth. He wrote “Kubla Khan” and the following lines from his most popular poem:
The Mariner, whose eye is bright,
Whose beard with age is hoar,
Is gone; and now the Wedding-Guest
Turned from the bridegroom’s door.
^ Coleridge
A Coleridge
B Keats
C Carlyle
D Sir Walter Scott

#Q He was a close friend of Byron and an incredibly popular singer, songwriter.  Which Irish entertainer and poet, who wrote the lyrics to “The Minstrel Boy,” wrote these lines as well?
The Harp that once through Tara’s halls the soul of music shed,
Now hangs as mute on Tara’s walls as if that soul were fled.
So sleeps the pride of former days, so glory’s thrill is o’er,
And hearts that once beat high for praise now feel that pulse no more.
^ Thomas Moore
A Thomas Carlyle
B Thomas Peacock
C Thomas Campbell
D Thomas Moore

#Q I weep for Adonais—he is dead!
Oh, weep for Adonais! Though our tears
Thaw not the frost which binds so dear a head!
What poet wrote these elegiac lines from “Adonais” in memoriam to John Keats, who died of T.B. at the tender age of only 24 years?
^ Percy Bysshe Shelly
A William Wordsworth
B Percy Bysshe Shelly
C Lord Byron
D William Blake

#Q Which of the following books, published in 1903, brought everlasting fame to Jack London?
^ The Call of the Wild
A White Fang
B The Iron Heel
C The Call of the Wild
D The Sea-Wolf

#Q The life of which character, depicted by Jack London, resembles very much the authors life?
^ Martin Eden
A Martin Eden
B Dick Forrest
C Humphrey van Weyden
D Wolf Larsen

#Q Which of the following novels by Jack London tells the story of the intellectual Humphrey van Weyden, who is forced to become a common seaman?
^ The Sea-Wolf
A Burning Daylight
B The Sea-Wolf
C The Little Lady of the Big House
D The Iron Hill

#Q Which novel by Jack London depicts the rise of a fascist-like regime in America?
^ The Iron Heel
A The Sea-Wolf
B The Iron Heel
C The Valley of the Moon
D The Scarlet Plague

#Q What breed is the dog Buck, the protagonist in The Call of the Wild by Jack London?
^ St. Bernard/Collie mix
A St. Bernard/Collie mix
B Wolf/Alaskan husky mix
C St. Bernard/Wolf mix
D Alaska Malamute/Alaskan husky mix

#Q Which of the following tales is not part of the collection Children of the Frost (1902) by Jack London?
^ To Build a Fire
A The Master of Mystery
B Li-Wan the Fair
C To Build a Fire
D In the Forests of North

#Q In 1910 Jack London bought a ranch in Glen Ellen, California, and since then he began to write mostly to finance it.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q Which of the following novels played a decisive role in Jack Londons life according to his own words, and turned him to literature when he was only eight years old?
^ Ouidas Signa
A Henry Adamss Democracy
B John Esten Cookes The Youth of Jefferson
C Ouidas Signa
D Louisa May Alcotts Little Men

#Q The main story in The Little Lady of the Big House  (1916) by Jack London focuses on what?
^ A love triangle
A The gold rush
B A love triangle
C The life of a widow
D Human rights

#Q In Song of Susannah, Susannah is pregnant with whose baby?
^ Roland
A Roland
B Eddie
C Oy
D Jake

#Q Song of Susannah takes place mostly in our world, in New York and which other US State?
^ Maine
A Maine
B Colorado
C Illinois
D Maryland

#Q Once born, the child carried by Susannah/Mia was called what?
^ Mordred
A Stephen
B Arthur
C Mordred
D Galahad

#Q Jake and Father Callahan travel to New York of 1999 and store the Wizards Glass known as Black Thirteen in a deposit box under which famous building?
^ World Trade Center
A World Trade Center
B Chrysler Building
C Empire State Building
D Trump World Tower

#Q In Song of Susannah, Roland and Eddie travel to New York of 1977 in an attempt to buy a plot of land from which man?
^ Calvin Tower, a bookstore owner
A John Cullum, a retired businessman
B Enrico Balazar, a gangster
C Calvin Tower, a bookstore owner
D Jack Andolini, a gangster

#Q While in Maine, Roland and Eddie hear that they are near the home of the author Stephen King, a name that interests them because of the link with which book in their possession?
^ Salems Lot
A The Stand
B Desperation
C Salems Lot
D Hearts in Atlantis

#Q When he meets Stephen King, Roland the gunslinger hypnotises him.  What does Roland use to hypnotise people?
^ A bullet
A A bullet
B A pendant in the shape of an eye
C A watch
D A pendulum

#Q While he has Stephen King hypnotised, Roland implants an instruction in the authors mind, what is it?
^ To continue writing the Dark Tower series of novels
A To collect a package from a location in New York City
B To write an epic poem about Susan Delgado
C To read Charlie the Choo-Choo
D To continue writing the Dark Tower series of novels

#Q Jake and Father Callahan attempt to rescue Susannah from a restaurant in New York, where she is being held by the soldiers of The Crimson King. What is the name of the restaurant?
^ The Dixie Pig
A The Manhattan Restaurant of The Mind
B The Dixie Pig
C The Tower View
D Mystic Pizza

#Q Susannah had left a scrimshaw ornament behind before she was taken into the restaurant, which gave Jake and Father Callahan hope when they found it.  What animal shape had the scrimshaw been carved into?
^ Turtle
A Bear
B Crow
C Turtle
D Billy-Bumbler

#Q Where was Edgar Allan Poe born?
^ Massachusetts
A England
B Italy
C Virginia
D Massachusetts

#Q What was Edgar Allan Poes first poem to be published?
^ The Raven
A The Raven
B Eldorado
C The Haunted Palace
D A Dream Within A Dream

#Q What branch of the military did Edgar Allan Poe enlist in?
^ US Army
A Marines
B Air Force
C Coast Guard
D US Army

#Q What was Edgar Allan Poes only completed novel?
^ The Narrative of Arthur Gordon Pym of Nantucket
A The Balloon Hoax
B The Narrative of Arthur Gordon Pym of Nantucket
C Eureka: A Pose Poem
D The Philosophy of Composition

#Q What Edgar Allan Poe poem are the following lines from?
Come up, in despite of the lion,
To shine on us with her bright eyes.
Come up, through the lair of the lion,
with love in her luminous eyes.
^ Ulalume
A The Bells
B Lenore
C Eldorado
D Ulalume

#Q Which of the following poems was not written by Edgar Allan Poe?
^ I Carry Your Heart With Me
A I Carry Your Heart With Me
B Annabel Lee
C The Raven
D The City In The Sea

#Q At what age did Edgar Allan Poe die?
^ 40
A 60
B 30
C 80
D 40

#Q What was the name of Edgar Allan Poes last book to be published?
^ Eureka
A Eureka
B The Masque of the Red Death
C The Pit and the Pendulum
D Berenice

#Q The death penalty is the main theme of this poem by Oscar Wilde which contains the following often quoted lines:
Yet each man kills the thing he loves
By each let this be heard,
Some do it with a bitter look,
Some with a flattering word,
The coward does it with a kiss,
The brave man with a sword!
^ The Ballad of Reading Gaol
A The Fisherman and his Soul
B A House of Pomegranates
C The Sphinx
D The Ballad of Reading Gaol

#Q What is the name of the main characters daemon in the novel The Golden Compass?
^ Pantalaimon
A Prantolemon
B Pantalaimon
C Prentaleman
D Pancedelamon

#Q What is the mysterious substance that is being researched in the North by Lord Asriel in Phillip Pullmans book The Golden Compass?
^ Dust
A Dust
B Fairy Blood
C Smoke
D Glimmer

#Q In the novel The Golden Compass, the Master gives the main character an Alethiometer and instructs her to deliver it to Lord Asriel.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q Who takes the main character of The Golden Compass as a personal assistant?
^ Mrs. Coulter
A The Master
B Lord Asriel
C Mr. Scoresby
D Mrs. Coulter

#Q In the book The Golden Compass, who is the main characters best friend that turns up missing?
^ Roger
A Roger
B Tony
C Iorek
D Billy

#Q The story of the novel The Golden Compass begins in the fictional Jordan College in Oxford.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q In the novel The Golden Compass, are the main character and her friends often at war with the local children of Oxford?
^ Yes
A No
B Yes

#Q In The Golden Compass, what is Lyras daemons favorite form to sleep in?
^ Ermine
A Canary
B Tiny Lion
C Ermine
D Moth

#Q In the novel The Golden Compass, what do the storytellers call those on the General Oblation Board?
^ Gobblers
A The Skraelings
B Gobblers
C Panserbjorne
D Oblates

#Q Who is Lyras uncle in Philip Pullmans novel The Golden Compass?
^ Lord Asriel
A Lord Asriel
B The Librarian
C Tony Makarios
D The Master

#Q In the book The Golden Compass, can adult daemons change into any form they want?
^ No
A No
B Yes

#Q In which English city was author Clive Barker born?
^ Liverpool
A Manchester
B London
C Chester
D Liverpool

#Q In Clive Barkers book Weaveworld, what is the name of the magical world which lies woven within a rug?
^ The Fugue
A The Fugue
B The Scourge
C The Kingdom
D The Ararat

#Q The novel Weaveworld was made into a comic series in 1991, published by which comic house?
^ Epic Comics
A Marvel Comics
B Crossgen Comics
C Epic Comics
D D C Comics

#Q What is the name of the magic sea in the book The Great and Secret Show?
^ Quiddity
A Ataraxia
B Quiddity
C Aquaratine
D Meritania

#Q The 1987 movie Hellraiser was based upon the Clive Barker novella The Damnation Game.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q In the Hellraiser film series, what is the name of the puzzle-box used to open the gateway to the other world?
^ Lament configuration
A Midnight configuration
B Lacrimal configuration
C Lament configuration
D Pandemonium configuration

#Q Complete the title of this Clive Barker novel, written as a fable for children: The Thief of _________.
^ Always
A Time
B England
C Baghdad
D Always

#Q Which Clive Barker novel tells a Hollywood ghost story?
^ Coldheart Canyon
A Absolute Midnight
B Everville
C Tortured Souls
D Coldheart Canyon

#Q Clive Barker had his screenplay for the remake of the Japanese monster film Gojira rejected because it was too dark and disturbing.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q This book that launched the Discworld series was first published in the U.K. in 1983.
^ The Colour of Magic
A Pyramids
B The Light Fantastic
C The Colour of Magic
D Sourcery

#Q Which surly, jaded denizen of Ankh-Morpork, depicted by Terry Pratchett, is Commander of the Night Watch?
^ Samuel Vimes
A Fred Colon
B Samuel Vimes
C Mustrum Ridcully
D Lord Vetinari

#Q Which one of these is not a guild from the fictional city of Ankh-Morpork?
^ Sewer Workers Guild
A Sewer Workers Guild
B Seamstresses Guild
C Assassins Guild
D Fools Guild

#Q In Terry Pratchetts Discworld series, Death once took over The Hogfathers job and attempted to deliver his version of holiday presents to all the children of Discworld, much like in Tim Burtons film, The Nightmare Before Christmas.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q Cohen the Barbarian, the greatest hero that Discworld has ever produced, is about 90 years old. He thinks that which one of these is not one of the greatest things in life?
^ A lovely bit of music
A Good dentistry
B Hot water baths
C A lovely bit of music
D Soft lavatory paper

#Q What popular musical was parodied by Terry Pratchetts 18th Discworld book, Maskerade?
^ The Phantom of the Opera
A Oklahoma
B Cats
C The Sound of Music
D The Phantom of the Opera

#Q Bloody Stupid Johnson, Discworlds famous dyslexic architect, is Terry Pratchetts version of Leonardo da Vinci.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Discworld, the fictional planet on which Terry Pratchetts famous series of novels is set, is carried on the back of four great space elephants. What are the elephants standing on?
^ ATuin, the star turtle
A Four space mice
B Nothing
C ATuin, the star turtle
D The Milky Way

#Q How many books of the Discworld series were published prior to 2007?
^ 35
A 35
B 30
C 29
D 32

#Q What pen name did Isaac Asimov use for his science fiction series for teenagers titled Lucky Starr?
^ Paul French
A Paul French
B Ivan Efremov
C Richard Philips
D John Riverside

#Q Isaac Asimov and these other two writers were considered the Big Three science-fiction writers during Asimovs lifetime.
^ Robert A. Heinlein and Arthur C. Clarke
A Robert Heinlein and Frank Herbert
B Robert A. Heinlein and Arthur C. Clarke
C H. G. Wells and Arthur C Clarke
D Frank Herbert and H.G. Wells

#Q Which of these series was not written by Isaac Asimov?
^ Dune series
A Foundation series
B Dune series
C Galactic Empire series
D Robot series

#Q Isaac Asimov suffered from which of the following disorders?
^ fear of flying
A fear of flying
B claustrophobia
C Frankenstein complex
D agyrophobia

#Q Which of these entries from the Oxford English dictionary is not a word created by Isaac Asimov?
^ cyberspace
A robotics
B cyberspace
C positronic
D psychohistory

#Q What was the name of the first science fiction short story Isaac Asimov wrote?
^ Cosmic Corkscrew
A Robbie
B Liar!
C Marooned Off Vesta
D Cosmic Corkscrew

#Q Which of these is not a science fiction novel co-written by Isaac Asimov and Robert Silverberg?
^ The Shrouded Planet
A The Ugly Little Boy
B Nightfall
C The Shrouded Planet
D The Positronic Man

#Q In what genre of literature other than science fiction did Isaac Asimov write?
^ mystery
A mystery
B biography
C historical fiction
D horror

#Q This book penned by Isaac Asimov won the Hugo (1972), Nebula (1973) and Locus (1973) Awards for best science fiction novel.
^ The Gods Themselves
A The Caves of Steel
B The Gods Themselves
C The End of Eternity
D Nemesis

#Q What is the full name of English writer Terry Pratchett born in 1948?
^ Terence David John Pratchett
A Terry Joseph Pratchett
B Terence Joseph Elias Pratchett
C Terrance Dewar John Pratchett
D Terence David John Pratchett

#Q What was the title of Terry Pratchetts first published work, a short story printed in his school magazine?
^ The Hades Business
A Night Dweller
B Mort
C The Carpet People
D The Hades Business

#Q Which of these books by Terry Pratchett does not belong to his Discworld series?
^ The Unadulterated Cat
A Feet of Clay
B Guards! Guards!
C The Unadulterated Cat
D Equal Rites

#Q What is fantasy writer Terry Pratchetts astrological sign?
^ Taurus
A Sagittarius
B Libra
C Leo
D Taurus

#Q In Terry Pratchetts Discworld series, the lines of what  character are usually  typed in capital letters?
^ Death
A Samuel Vimes
B Death
C Magrat Garlick
D Rincewind

#Q When was Terry Pratchett appointed an Officer of the Order of the British Empire for services to literature?
^ 1998
A 1998
B Never.
C 1963
D 2001

#Q Which of these four books of Terry Pratchetts Discworld series was published first?
^ The Colour of Magic
A Soul Music
B Pyramids
C The Colour of Magic
D Reaper Man

#Q Terry Pratchett supports this organization in many ways, one of which is fundraising by auctions where people bid money in order to get a Discworld character named after them in the writers next book.
^ The Orangutan Foundation
A Save the Newchurch Guinea Pigs
B The Great Ape Project
C The Shark Trust Organization
D The Orangutan Foundation

#Q Which British artist worked on the UK covers of Terry Pratchetts books of the Discworld series until 2001?
^ Josh Kirby
A Frank Frazetta
B Josh Kirby
C Harry Clarke
D Norman Rockwell

#Q What is the name of writer Terry Pratchetts daughter, born in 1976?
^ Rhianna
A Mariah
B Rhianna
C Joan
D Dorothy

#Q How did Bilbo Baggins come across the One Ring in the novel The Fellowship of the Ring?
^ When he gets lost in the goblins cave, he finds it in the dirt.
A Gollum gives it to him after their riddles.
B When he gets lost in the goblins cave, he finds it in the dirt.
C Thorin Oakenshield gave it to him as a gift after the Battle of Five Armies.
D He found it in the dragons lair during his journey.

#Q Tolkiens character Frodo was 33 when he left for Rivendell.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Which elf did the Hobbits talk to on their way to Bree in the novel The Fellowship of the Ring?
^ Gildor
A Glorfindel
B Finarfin
C Gildor
D Gil-Galad

#Q Which character helped Frodo and Sam rescue Merry and Pippin from the trees?
^ Tom Bombadil
A Beorn
B Bard the Bowman
C Barliman Butterbur
D Tom Bombadil

#Q In the book The Fellowship of the Ring, Arwen was the elf that brought Frodo Baggins across the river into the land of Rivendell.
^ False
A False
B True

#Q What was the name of the river that Glorfindel took Frodo Baggins across?
^ Bruinen
A Bruinen
B Baranduin
C Isen
D Anduin

#Q 24 October was the day that Tolkiens character Frodo awoke in Rivendell after his ailment.
^ True
A True
B False

#Q It is stated in The Fellowship of the Ring that the emblems of Durin are wrought of ithildin that mirrors only starlight and moonlight.
^ True
A False
B True

#Q What gift did Lady Galadriel give to Samwise Gamgee in The Fellowship of the Ring?
^ A wooden box with a silver rune
A Three hairs from her golden head
B Lembas bread
C A wooden box with a silver rune
D A dagger

#Q The Uruk-hai, which were described in The Fellowship of the Ring, could only run in the light of the moon.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q Thorne Smiths Topper series consists of how many novels?
^ Three
A Four
B Five
C Two
D Three

#Q In the Topper novels by Thorne Smith, who is Cosmo Topper?
^ A banker
A A banker
B An undertaker
C A ghost
D An accountant

#Q Which of these best describes the plot line of the novel Turnabout by Thorne Smith?
^ The husband and wifes bodies are magically interchanged.
A A voodoo witch places a curse on a vain young man.
B The husband and wifes bodies are magically interchanged.
C A skeleton is returned to life.
D A 17th century witch is transported to the 20th Century.

#Q In the novel The Glorious Pool by Thorne Smith, what happens to the middle-aged man, his wife, and his mistress?
^ They become young again.
A They are made invisible by an alien.
B They are turned into a lion, a monkey and a donkey.
C They become young again.
D They die and become spirits.

#Q The protagonist of which Thorne Smith novel has the ability to turn statues into living people?
^ The Night Life of the Gods
A The Glorious Pool
B The Night Life of the Gods
C Rain in the Doorway
D Skin and Bones

#Q In the novel The Bishops Jaegers by Thorne Smith, what are the jaegers?
^ Underwear
A Animals
B Paintings
C Underwear
D Communion wafers

#Q Which of these is the most accurate description of plot line of Thorne Smiths novel Passionate Witch?
^ A 17th Century witch is transported into the 20th Century.
A A witch is reborn as a man who seeks revenge on those who killed him.
B A 17th Century witch is transported into the 20th Century.
C A curse by a witch follows a elderly couple through life.
D A living statue of Aphrodite complicates the life of a mild-mannered accountant.

#Q In Night life of the Gods by Thorne Smith what object is responsible for the transformations that occur throughout the story?
^ A ring
A A ring
B A magic amulet
C A voodoo doll
D A magic wand

#Q In which novel by Thorne Smith do all the main characters end up in court before a totally befuddled judge?
^ all of these
A Nightlife of the Gods
B Topper
C The Glorious Pool
D all of these

#Q The main character of which novel by Thorne Smith is turned into a skeleton?
^ Skin and Bones
A Skin and Bones
B Bats in the Belfry
C Topper Takes a Trip
D Did She Fall?

#Q First published in 1915, this poem by T. S. Eliot portrays upper class society as quite empty and lonely. Its epigraph is from Marlowes The Jew of Malta-
 ...but that was in another country, / And besides, the wench is dead.
^ Portrait of a Lady
A The Love Song of J. Alfred Prufrock
B Portrait of a Lady
C Sweeney Among the Nightingales
D The Hollow Men

#Q William Shakespeare had two daughters and one son, named Susanna, Judith, and Hamlet.
^ False
A True
B False

#Q From what Shakespeare play did Aldous Huxley derive the title of his famous novel, Brave New World?
^ The Tempest
A Richard III
B The Winters Tale
C A Midsummer Nights Dream
D The Tempest

#Q The popular Globe Theatre was owned by actors in what famous playing company of the Elizabethan age?
^ Lord Chamberlains Men
A Shakespeares Troupe
B The Burbage Players
C King Jamess Merry Men
D Lord Chamberlains Men

#Q Shakespeare died on April 23, 1616. What other famous author died on the same day?
^ Miguel de Cervantes Saavedra
A Miguel de Cervantes Saavedra
B Dante Alighieri
C Ben Jonson
D Christopher Marlowe

#Q What character from the play Hamlet made famous the line, Something is rotten in the state of Denmark!?
^ Marcellus
A Horatio
B Ophelia
C King Claudius
D Marcellus

#Q Which Shakespeare comedy contains the following lesser known characters:  Quince, Snug, Snout, Flute, Bottom, and Starveling?
^ A Midsummer Nights Dream
A As You Like It
B Much Ado About Nothing
C The Tempest
D A Midsummer Nights Dream

#Q The drama, My Own Private Idaho, starring Keanu Reeves and the late River Phoenix, is adapted from this Shakespeare play.
^ Henry IV
A Richard III
B Henry IV
C King John
D Henry VI

#Q For what role did Laurence Olivier win a Best Actor Oscar in 1948?
^ Hamlet
A Richard III
B Hamlet
C Henry V
D Othello

#Q The famous Wedding March is incorporated in the music that German composer Felix Mendelssohn wrote in 1842 for what Shakespeare play?
^ A Midsummer Nights Dream
A Romeo and Juliet
B King Lear
C Much Ado About Nothing
D A Midsummer Nights Dream

#Q What English poet wrote the poem In the Bleak Midwinter in which Snow had fallen, snow on snow,
Snow on snow?
^ Christina Rossetti
A Elizabeth Barret Browning
B Christina Rossetti
C Robert Browning
D Matthew Arnold

#Q What American Modernist poet wrote the poem The Snow Man, which opens with the lines, 
One must have a mind of winter
To regard the frost and the boughs
Of the pine-trees crusted with snow;?
^ Wallace Stevens
A Emily Dickinson
B Ezra Pound
C Walt Whitman
D Wallace Stevens

#Q Name the play by William Shakespeare in which the character Sir Andrew Aguecheek appears.
^ Twelfth Night
A Twelfth Night
B Alls Well That Ends Well
C The Taming of the Shrew
D Much Ado about Nothing

#Q In which play by William Shakespeare is the character King Claudius introduced?
^ Hamlet
A Henry VIII
B Hamlet
C The Tempest
D King Lear

#Q Shylock is a character depicted in this Shakespearean play.
^ The Merchant of Venice
A The Taming of the Shrew
B The Merchant of Venice
C The Two Noble Kinsmen
D Loves Labours Lost

#Q Angelo is a character from this famous play by William Shakespeare.
^ Measure for Measure
A As You Like It
B Titus Andronicus
C Measure for Measure
D Macbeth

#Q Iago is the antagonist of which play by William Shakespeare?
^ Othello
A A Midsummer Nights Dream
B The Comedy of Errors
C Hamlet
D Othello

